SUSTAINABLE,  ENERGY-EFFICIENT

TRANSPORTATION  INFRASTRUCTURE

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

JUNE  24,  2008

Serial No. 110–110

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

42–962PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2008

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
PAUL  KANJORSKI,  Pennsylvania
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
JO  BONNER,  Alabama
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

HON.  DAVID  WU,  Oregon,  Chairman

JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLIE  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
MIKE  ROSS,  Arizona
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

MIKE  QUEAR  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

RACHEL  JAGODA  BRUNETTE  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member

MEGHAN  HOUSEWRIGHT  Democratic  Profession  Staff  Member
TIND  SHEPPER  RYEN  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

PIPER  LARGENT  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S

June  24,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  David  Wu,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Tech-
nology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.  House
of Representatives ................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Phil  Gingrey,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Prepared  Statement  by  Representative  Laura  Richardson,  Member,  Sub-
committee  on  Technology  and  Innovation,  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................................

Witnesses:

Mr.  Paul  R.  Brubaker,  Administrator,  Research  and  Innovative  Technology

Administration, U.S. Department of Transportation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Randell  H.  Iwasaki,  Chief  Deputy  Director,  California  Department  of

Transportation

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Robert  L.  Bertini,  P.E.,  Director,  Oregon  Transportation  Research  and
Education  Consortium  (OTREC);  Associate  Professor,  Portland  State  Uni-
versity

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Mr.  Gerald  F.  Voigt,  P.E.,  President  and  CEO,  American  Concrete  Pavement

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Christopher  M.  Poe,  P.E.,  Assistant  Agency  Director;  Senior  Research
Engineer,  Research  and  Implementation  Division–Dallas,  Houston,  Texas
Transportation Institute, Texas A&M University System

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Association

7
8

9
10

11

12
13
20

21
23
34

34
37
59

60
62
68

70
72
78
79

(III)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

IV

Appendix  1:  Answers  to  Post-Hearing  Questions

Mr.  Paul  R.  Brubaker,  Administrator,  Research  and  Innovative  Technology
Administration, U.S. Department of Transportation ........................................
Mr.  Randell  H.  Iwasaki,  Chief  Deputy  Director,  California  Department  of
Transportation ......................................................................................................
Dr.  Robert  L.  Bertini,  P.E.,  Director,  Oregon  Transportation  Research  and
Education  Consortium  (OTREC);  Associate  Professor,  Portland  State  Uni-
versity ...................................................................................................................
Mr.  Gerald  F.  Voigt,  P.E.,  President  and  CEO,  American  Concrete  Pavement
Association ............................................................................................................
Dr.  Christopher  M.  Poe,  P.E.,  Assistant  Agency  Director;  Senior  Research
Engineer,  Research  and  Implementation  Division–Dallas,  Houston,  Texas
Transportation Institute, Texas A&M University System ...............................

Page

96

101

106

112

116

Appendix  2:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement by the Arizona Department of Transportation ...................................
Statement  by  Mike  Acott,  President,  National  Asphalt  Pavement  Association
(NAPA) ..................................................................................................................

120

125

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

SUSTAINABLE,  ENERGY-EFFICIENT

TRANSPORTATION  INFRASTRUCTURE

TUESDAY,  JUNE  24,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:00  a.m.,  in  Room
2318 of the Rayburn House Office Building, Hon. David Wu [Chair-
man of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

Sustainable, Energy-Efficient
Transportation Infrastructure

TUESDAY, JUNE 24, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

I. Purpose

On Tuesday, June 24, 2008, the Subcommittee on Technology and Innovation will
hold  a  hearing  to  review  ongoing  federal,  State,  academic,  and  industry  research
and development activities related to reducing life cycle energy consumption, reduc-
ing  fuel  use  and  promoting  sustainability  for  surface  transportation  infrastructure.
The  hearing  will  also  address  technical,  regulatory,  social,  and  financial  challenges
to implementing new measures and integrating new materials and technologies into
existing transportation networks.

II. Witnesses
Mr.  Paul  Brubaker  is  the  Administrator  of  the  Research  and  Innovative  Tech-
nology Administration (RITA) of the U.S. Department of Transportation.
Mr.  Randell  Iwasaki  is  the  Chief  Deputy  Director  of  the  California  Department
of Transportation (Caltrans).
Dr.  Robert  Bertini,  P.E.,  is  the  Director  of  the  Oregon  Transportation  Research
and Education Consortium (OTREC).
Mr. Gerald Voigt, P.E., is the President and CEO of the American Concrete Pave-
ment Association.
Dr.  Christopher  Poe,  P.E.,  is  the  Assistant  Agency  Director  and  Director  of  the
Center on Tolling Research at the Texas Transportation Institute.

III. Brief Overview

• The  surface  transportation  sector  is  a  major  contributor  to  energy  use  and
pollution, accounting for 33 percent of carbon emissions in the U.S. annually.
In addition to energy use and pollution from vehicles, infrastructure construc-
tion,  maintenance,  and  destruction  have  high  fuel  costs  and  require  signifi-
cant  materials  manufacturing.  Transportation  infrastructure  also  is  a  factor
in heat, noise, and water pollution.
• Materials  and  technologies  currently  exist  to  combat  pollution  and  energy
waste from transportation infrastructure. Recycled or high performance pave-
ment  materials  reduce  manufacturing  and  maintenance  needs  and  can  also
cut  fuel  use  by  reducing  friction.  Sophisticated  traffic  management  and  data
collection technologies reduce congestion, which resulted in 2.9 billion gallons
of wasted fuel in 2007, according to the Texas Transportation Institute.
• Many State and local governments are beginning to adopt innovative surface
transportation  infrastructure  materials  and  technologies  reduce  energy  costs
and  promote  sustainability,  but  widespread  implementation  remains  slow.
Some  impediments  include  lack  of  performance  data,  high  costs,  lack  of
trained engineers and planners, and industry reluctance to embrace new con-
struction  techniques  and  materials.  Additionally,  new  materials  and  tech-
nologies  must  be  integrated  with  existing  transportation  systems,  requiring
cooperation between researchers and planners.
• Research,  development,  testing,  and  evaluation  (RDT&E)  carried  out  by  fed-
eral  and  State  agencies,  academia,  and  industry  is  helping  advance  knowl-
edge  in  the  field  of  innovative  surface  transportation  materials  and  tech-
nologies,  but  additional  technology  transfer  and  education  efforts  are  needed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

to  engage  policy-makers  and  the  public.  Strong  partnerships  between  the  re-
search  and  user  communities  are  vital  to  ensure  that  R&D  efforts  are  tied
to  user  needs  and  that  demonstration  projects  prove  the  effectiveness  of  var-
ious technologies and materials.

IV. Issues and Concerns
What research and development efforts are needed to address current chal-
lenges in the surface transportation sector? How should the research com-
munity  determine  R&D  priorities?  What  data  collection  needs  currently
exist,  and  how  do  researchers  measure  whether  new  materials  and  tech-
nologies  have  the  desired  impact  of  reducing  energy  use  and  promoting
sustainability?  Researchers  have  established  a  strong  link  between  surface  trans-
portation  infrastructure  and  a  host  of  negative  environmental  impacts,  including
wasted  fuel,  urban  heat  island  effects,  carbon  emissions,  noise  pollution,  and  de-
mand on virgin materials for pavement. The R&D community addressing these chal-
lenges is diverse, ranging from federal agencies such the U.S. Department of Trans-
portation’s  Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA)  and  Research  and  Innovative
Technology  Administration  (RITA)  and  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  uni-
versities,  and  industry.  While  entities  such  as  the  Transportation  Research  Board
exist to help bridge gaps between the research and user communities, the R&D com-
munity  further  benefits  from  formal  and  informal  connections  to  their  immediate
communities in order to understand users’ research priorities. Additionally, data col-
lection  helps  frame  the  environmental,  economic,  and  safety  challenges  and  influ-
ences research priorities by identifying the areas of greatest need.
What  are  the  roles  of  the  Federal  Government,  State  agencies,  academia,
and industry in technology transfer? How should these entities help policy-
makers find a balance between environmental impact and safety, cost, and
efficiency? Because transportation infrastructure needs vary by region, technology
transfer  is  most  effective  when  it  involves  partnerships  between  local  experts  and
policy-makers. Many universities involved in transportation research convene formal
and  informal  meetings  to  discuss  how  available  technologies  might  be  integrated
into  transportation  networks.  The  Federal  Government  also  engages  in  technology
transfer  activities  through  partnerships,  training,  and  demonstration  projects.
FHWA  offers  courses  through  the  National  Highway  Institute,  some  of  which  cover
innovative  technologies.  FHWA  and  the  EPA  also  participate  in  the  Green  High-
ways Partnership, which coordinates outreach and education efforts and demonstra-
tion projects to promote use of environmentally friendly materials and technologies.
However, acceptance and use of new transportation technologies remains slow. Deci-
sions on the use of innovative technologies are made by State or local transportation
officials who may or may not have access to data on their efficacy and cost.
What  standards  development  activities  are  needed  in  both  materials  and
intelligent transportation systems? What is the impact of the lack of stand-
ards?  Stakeholders  have  engaged  in  some  standards  development  activities  for
pavement  materials  and  intelligent  transportation  systems,  but  the  community  has
identified a need for further efforts. In the materials field, the expanded use of recy-
cled  materials  and  industrial  byproducts  in  pavement  to  cut  landfill  waste  requires
characterization  of  products  (such  as  fly  ash,  slag,  or  even  construction  waste  like
drywall) that may not be uniform in size, shape, or composition. The National Insti-
tute  of  Standards  and  Technology  (NIST)  has  done  some  work  in  characterization
and  hosts  a  virtual  lab  to  allow  researchers  to  test  their  mixture  of  recycled  mate-
rials  via  computer  simulation  To  meet  users’  performance  requirements,  manufac-
turers  need  standards  that  specify  the  percentage  of  each  type  of  recycled  material
that can be safely incorporated into cement. For data collection and traffic manage-
ment  systems,  end-users  have  identified  a  need  for  technical  standards  that  allow
inter-operability  of  systems  across  jurisdictions  to  ensure  that  the  benefits  of  these
technologies are seen region-wide.

V. Background
Environmental Challenges in Surface Transportation

The  surface  transportation  sector  is  a  major  contributor  to  energy  use  and  pollu-
tion. Vehicle use, construction, maintenance, and destruction all result in significant
energy  costs,  and  the  production  of  pavement  materials  uses  valuable  natural  re-
sources.  Transportation  infrastructure  can  also  contribute  to  noise  and  heat  pollu-
tion, increasing its environmental impact. Currently, the U.S. Department of Energy

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

estimates that the transportation sector accounts for 33 percent of carbon emissions
in the United States annually.

The  United  States  consumes  approximately  128  million  tons  of  cement  annually,
with a significant share being used for transportation infrastructure. Though the in-
dustry  has  effectively  cut  energy  use  and  carbon  emissions  over  the  last  few  dec-
ades,  the  scope  of  cement  manufacturing  means  that  the  environmental  impact  re-
mains noteworthy, accounting for 1.5 percent of carbon emissions. According to a re-
port by the American Concrete Pavement Association, this translates to 52,800 tons
of  carbon  dioxide  emitted  for  the  construction  of  a  typical  100  kilometer  highway.
In  addition,  the  construction  of  infrastructure  also  carries  considerable  fuel  costs,
ranging from nearly 2000 to over 10,000 gallons of fuel per lane-mile, depending on
the material used for pavement.

Vehicle  use  also  results  in  fuel  use  and  emissions,  especially  in  congested  areas.
The  Texas  Transportation  Institute  estimated  that  traffic  congestion  in  the  United
States  in  2.9  billion  gallons  of  wasted  fuel  in  2007.  In  a  study  of  85  urban  areas
with  serious  congestion  problems,  TTI  also  found  that  travel  delays  that  result  in
idling, and thus fuel waste and extra emissions, have grown since 1982.

Research and development activities

Research  and  development  activities  to  combat  the  negative  environmental  im-
pacts  of  surface  transportation  have  been  ongoing  in  the  U.S.  for  several  decades,
with  contributions  from  federal  agencies,  academia  (especially  U.S.  DOT-funded
University Transportation Centers), and industry. State transportation agencies also
participate  in  data  collection  activities  to  help  frame  challenges  and  determine  the
efficacy  of  various  measures.  Current  research  covers  traffic  management  and  data
collection  activities  through  the  use  of  intelligent  transportation  systems,  materials
characterization,  design,  and  manufacturing  research,  and  urban  planning  and
transportation system design studies.

Specific  research  activities  addressing  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  range
from  intelligent  transportation  system  (ITS)  design  and  data  collection  technologies
to paving materials design. ITS technologies help reduce fuel consumption and emis-
sions by managing traffic flow to cut congestion and keep vehicles moving smoothly.
Specific  projects  include  traffic  signal  timing,  highway  on-ramp  management,  truck
scales  embedded  in  travel  lanes,  and  other  traffic  management  tools.  Additionally,
ITS  technology  can  be  used  for  data  collection  to  identify  problem  areas  or  deter-
mine  the  effectiveness  of  traffic  management  technologies.  Many  of  these  tech-
nologies  also  have  further  safety  benefits  in  addition  to  ensuring  smoother  traffic
flow by helping avoid collisions.

Materials  research  focuses  on  promoting  sustainability  and  reducing  energy  use
in the manufacturing process by incorporating recycled materials into paving mate-
rials or by designing high performance paving materials that reduce friction and re-
quire  less  maintenance.  Industrial  byproducts  such  as  fly  ash  from  coal  power
plants  promote  sustainability  and  energy  savings  by  reducing  the  need  for  pro-
ducing  new  materials  while  also  cutting  landfill  waste.  Academic  and  industry  re-
searchers  are  working  to  determine  the  types  of  materials  that  can  be  safely  incor-
porated  into  cement,  such  fiberglass  or  drywall.  They  are  also  studying  the  max-
imum percentage of the mix that these byproducts can comprise.

Extending  the  life  cycle  of  pavement  is  another  important  goal  for  researchers
working  to  improve  energy  efficiency  in  the  transportation  structure.  Doing  so  re-
duces  maintenance  and  construction  needs,  thus  cutting  energy  costs.  Researchers
address  this  challenge  through  multiple  approaches,  including  developing  pervious
pavements  to  reduce  erosion  or  designing  stronger  pavements  that  are  less  vulner-
able  to  cracking  and  potholes.  Some  of  the  smoother  high  performance  pavements
also  help  cut  fuel  use  by  reducing  friction,  especially  for  large  vehicles.  A  study  by
the National Research Council of Canada found that fuel consumption by fully load-
ed trucks can be reduced by one to six percent when traveling on smooth pavement.
Finally,  some  materials  research  efforts  also  address  heat  pollution.  Dark  pave-
ment absorbs heat from the sun and has been found to raise ambient temperatures
in urban areas by 9°F and increase demand for energy for air conditioning. Lighter
colored pavements reflect sunlight, thus reducing the urban heat island effect.

Technology transfer and implementation issues

Technology  transfer  in  transportation  infrastructure  typically  faces  particular
challenges  related  to  regulations,  cost,  education  and  training,  and  industry  reluc-
tance to embrace new construction techniques. The Federal Government, academia,
and  industry  all  play  a  role  in  demonstrating  the  effectiveness  of  new  technologies,
training engineers on their use, and helping meet regulatory requirements.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

A  lack  of  standards  is  a  key  impediment  to  the  implementation  of  pavements
using  recycled  materials  and  intelligent  transportation  systems.  For  pavements,
State and local regulatory performance requirements related to the mix of materials
comprising cement mean that byproducts must be characterized to understand their
effect  on  the  strength  and  performance  of  the  pavement.  Because  there  are  not
standards  for  the  size,  composition,  or  other  characteristics  of  byproducts  such  as
fly  ash,  manufacturers  and  researchers  have  a  difficult  time  proving  the  perform-
ance  of  their  materials  from  batch  to  batch.  Technical  standards  for  intelligent
transportation  systems  (ITS)  are  also  a  key  requirement  prior  to  implementation.
Especially  in  dense  areas,  such  as  the  DC  area,  where  multiple  local  governments
oversee a broad transportation system, ITS technology must be inter-operable to en-
sure that the benefits are seen region wide.

The  cost  of  technologies  and  materials  also  prevents  their  manufacture  and  use.
Concrete  manufacturers  must  locate  and  ship  byproducts  to  be  incorporated  into
their  mixes,  increasing  initial  capital  costs.  Additionally,  engineers  and  architects
require  further  training  for  new  materials,  resulting  in  additional  expenditures.
Similarly,  end-users  may  pay  more  initially  for  innovative  materials  and  tech-
nologies  for  managing  traffic.  Researchers  and  the  Federal  Government  can  help
promote  technology  transfer  in  the  face  of  cost  concerns  by  providing  further  infor-
mation  on  costs  over  the  life  cycle  of  the  infrastructure,  rather  than  initial  costs.
Life  cycle  costs  are  typically  reduced  through  the  use  of  innovative  materials  and
technology.

Demonstration  projects  play  an  invaluable  role  in  encouraging  implementation  of
new  materials  and  technologies.  The  Federal  Government  funds  some  local  dem-
onstrations  of  new  technologies,  which  prove  to  engineers  and  policy-makers  that
new  technologies  can  be  effective  in  spite  of  training  needs  and  high  initial  costs.
Specifically, the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) and Federal Highway
Administration (FHWA) partner with State governments and industry on the Green
Highway Partnership to demonstrate environmentally-friendly highway construction
methods.  University  Transportation  Centers  also  work  with  local  agencies  to  dem-
onstrate technologies suited to their region’s specific needs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

Chairman WU. This hearing will now to order.
I  appreciate  everyone’s  patience  this  morning  and  thank  you
very,  very  much  for  being  here.  I  would  like  to  welcome  everyone.
Right now, I can think of very few topics that are of greater inter-
est to the American public than the pocketbook impact of refueling
our cars and still trying to hold within each household’s budget. Ac-
cording to the Department of Energy, the average price of gasoline
in  the  United  States  as  of  yesterday  was  $4.08  per  gallon  at  the
pump.  At  the  gas  station  closest  to  here,  the  number  that  strikes
me  is  the  number  that  is  north  of  $4.50.  One  thing  we  all  agree
on is that we must take action to help reduce the costs of transpor-
tation overall for families across this nation.

Thus  far,  the  national  focus  has  been  on  cutting  or  restraining
the  rise  of  the  cost  of  fuel.  However,  any  of  the  proposed  solutions
will not have a palpable impact for years to come but there are im-
portant steps that many cities and states are already taking to re-
duce fuel consumption and promote sustainability through changes
in this transportation infrastructure which includes roads and free-
ways,  networks  of  stoplights,  public  transportation  systems  and
overall  urban  planning  and  design.  Around  the  country,  research-
ers  in  academia,  industry,  State  and  federal  agencies  have  been
working  on  developing  innovative  materials  and  technologies  that
reduce  the  life  cycle  energy  costs  of  transportation  infrastructure
and  promote  sustainability.  Pavements  that  incorporate  waste  ma-
terials that would otherwise be landfilled, traffic signal timing sys-
tems  that  cut  congestion  and  monitoring  devices  that  can  warn
drivers  to  take  alternate  routes  around  traffic  jams  are  just  a  few
of the examples of innovations in transportation infrastructure and
technology that can help protect our environment.

The  potential  benefits  of  these  innovative  materials  and  tech-
nologies  are  impressive.  Currently,  the  surface  transportation  sec-
tor  accounts  for  33  percent  of  carbon  emissions  in  the  United
States.  Additionally,  according  to  the  Texas  Transportation  Insti-
tute,  congestion  alone  accounted  for  2.9  billion  gallons  of  wasted
fuel  in  2007.  The  Federal  Highway  Administration  estimates  that
five percent of that congestion is due to poorly timed traffic signals.
Intelligent  transportation  systems  can  eliminate  congestion  due  to
poor  signal  timing.  That  is  a  potential  fuel  savings  of  145  million
gallons of fuel per year.

What  is  even  more  striking  is  that  many  of  the  technologies  we
need  to  bring  about  these  fuel  savings  already  exist.  So  why  isn’t
every  community  in  America  using  them?  I  am  very  interested  to
hear  our  witnesses’  thoughts  on  why  policy-makers  opt  not  to  use
innovative  materials  and  technologies  as  part  of  their  transpor-
tation  systems,  and  what  the  Federal  Government  can  do  to  help
spur technology transfer.

I  am  proud  that  in  Portland,  Oregon,  and  in  the  First  Congres-
sional  District,  which  I  am  pleased  to  represent,  we  have  been
leaders in using energy-efficient and sustainable transportation in-
frastructure.

With  technologies  such  as  transit  signal  priorities  that  reduce
idling  by  buses  by  linking  on-board  computers  to  traffic  lights,
ramp  meters  that  cut  congestion  on  our  freeways  and  real-time
traffic information so that drivers can avoid backups, the State and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

local  departments  of  transportation  in  Oregon  have  worked  effec-
tively  to  identify  and  implement  innovative  solutions  to  important
transportation  challenges.  These  efforts  are  coordinated  regionally,
not  just  city  by  city,  so  that  energy  savings  benefit  taxpayers  and
gasoline purchasers and other fuel purchasers throughout the area.
Dr. Robert Bertini, who is Director of the Oregon Transportation
Research  and  Education  Consortium,  will  tell  us  more  about  how
the  research  and  policy  communities  collaborate  to  make  these
projects a reality.

Soon the Congress will be considering the next surface transpor-
tation  reauthorization,  and  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Tech-
nology  plans  to  play  an  important  role  in  defining  our  transpor-
tation  research  priorities  for  the  future.  Sustainability  and  energy
efficiency  are  no  longer  just  buzzwords  in  the  transportation  com-
munity.

They  are  crucial  components  of  a  working  national  transpor-
tation infrastructure. Building more roads alone is not the answer.
We must use our resources carefully and wisely, and that requires
a  commitment  to  reducing  the  creation  of  new  materials  and  find-
ing  simple  innovative  ways  to  conserve  fuel.  I  am  confident  that
our  panel  today  will  give  us  some  solid  ideas  for  moving  forward
on a sustainable energy-efficient transportation policy.

[The prepared statement of Chairman Wu follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN DAVID WU

This  hearing  will  come  to  order.  I’d  like  to  welcome  everyone  to  this  morning’s
hearing. I can think of few topics that are of greater interest to the American public
than the impact of filling up our cars on the household budget. According to the De-
partment  of  Energy,  the  average  price  of  gas  in  the  U.S.  as  of  yesterday  was  $4.08
per  gallon  at  the  pump.  One  thing  we  all  agree  on  is  that  we  must  take  action  to
help reduce the cost of transportation for families across the country.

Thus  far,  the  national  focus  has  been  on  cutting  the  cost  of  fuel.  However,  any
of  the  proposed  solutions  will  not  have  a  measurable  impact  for  years.  But  there
are  important  steps  that  many  cities  and  states  are  already  taking  to  reduce  fuel
consumption  and  promote  sustainability  through  changes  to  the  transportation  in-
frastructure, which includes roads, freeways, networks of stoplights, public transpor-
tation systems, and overall city planning.

Around the country, researchers in academia, industry, and federal agencies have
been  working  on  developing  innovative  materials  and  technologies  that  reduce  the
life  cycle  energy  cost  of  transportation  infrastructure  and  promote  sustainability.
Pavements  that  incorporate  waste  materials  that  would  otherwise  be  landfilled,
traffic  signal  timing  systems  that  cut  congestion,  and  monitoring  devices  that  can
warn drivers to take alternate route around traffic jams are just a few of the exam-
ples of innovations in transportation infrastructure and technology that help protect
the environment.

The  potential  benefits  of  these  innovative  materials  and  technologies  are  impres-
sive.  Currently,  the  surface  transportation  sector  accounts  for  33  percent  of  carbon
emissions in the United States. Additionally, according to the Texas Transportation
Institute,  congestion  alone  accounted  for  2.9  billion  gallons  of  wasted  fuel  in  2007.
The Federal Highway Administration estimates that five percent of that congestion
is due to poorly timed traffic signals. If intelligent transportation systems can elimi-
nate congestion due to poor signal timing, that’s a potential fuel savings of 145 mil-
lion gallons of fuel per year.

What’s even more striking is that many of the technologies we need to bring about
these  fuel  savings  already  exist.  So  why  isn’t  every  town  in  America  using  them?
I’m  very  interested  to  hear  our  witnesses’  thoughts  on  why  policy-makers  opt  not
to use innovative materials and technologies as part of their transportation systems,
and what the Federal Government can to do to help spur technology transfer.

I’m proud that the First District of Oregon has been a leader in using energy effi-

cient and sustainable transportation infrastructure.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

9

With  technologies  such  as  a  transit  signal  priority  project  that  reduces  idling  by
buses  by  linking  on-board  computers  to  traffic  lights;  ramp  meters  that  cut  conges-
tion  on  our  freeways;  and  real  time  traffic  information  for  travelers  so  they  can
avoid  backups,  the  State  and  local  departments  of  transportation  in  Oregon  have
worked  effectively  to  identify  and  implement  innovative  solutions  to  important
transportation  challenges.  These  efforts  are  coordinated  regionally,  not  just  city  by
city, so that energy savings benefit taxpayers throughout the area.

Dr.  Robert  Bertini,  who  is  the  Director  of  the  Oregon  Transportation  Research
and Education Consortium, will tell us more about how the research and policy com-
munities collaborate to make these projects a reality.

Soon,  the  Congress  will  be  considering  the  next  surface  transportation  reauthor-
ization,  and  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology  plans  to  play  an  important
role  in  defining  our  transportation  research  priorities  for  the  future.  Sustainability
and energy efficiency are no longer just buzzwords in the transportation community.
They  are  crucial  components  of  a  working  national  transportation  infrastructure.
Building  more  roads  alone  is  not  the  answer.  We  must  use  our  resources  carefully
and  wisely,  and  that  requires  a  commitment  to  reducing  the  creation  of  new  mate-
rials  and  finding  simple,  innovative  ways  to  conserve  fuel.  I’m  confident  that  our
panel  today  will  give  us  some  solid  ideas  for  moving  forward  on  a  sustainable,  en-
ergy-efficient transportation policy.

Chairman  WU.  Now  I  would  like  to  recognize  my  colleague  and
friend,  the  Ranking  Member  from  Georgia,  Dr.  Gingrey,  for  an
opening statement. Dr. Gingrey.

Mr.  GINGREY.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  good  morning
to  our  distinguished  panel  of  witnesses.  I  want  to  first  thank  you
for  holding  this  hearing  today  and  this  hearing  that  touches  the
lives  of  so  many  Americans  on  a  daily  basis.  I  am  pleased  to  work
with you as we continue this subcommittee’s efforts to improve our
nation’s  transportation  infrastructure  through  innovative  research
and  development  activities  that  will  hopefully  result  in  a  windfall
of cost savings for our nation.

While the importance of our roads and highways to our economy
and our way of life are self-evident, I would like to take a moment
to document for the Subcommittee the extent of their impact. There
are  approximately  four  million  miles  of  roads  in  this  country  and
Americans  drive  approximately  four  trillion  miles  per  year.  Fur-
thermore,  there  are  over  200  million  cars  and  light  trucks  on  the
road and a further eight million trucks on the roads supporting our
businesses, so overall transportation-related activities currently ac-
count for 10 percent of our gross domestic product.

To support all this traffic, government expenditures on our high-
ways  are  approximately  $140  billion  a  year.  Unfortunately,  even
with this constant influx of revenue, our infrastructure cannot sup-
port our growing traffic needs.

According  to  the  Urban  Mobility  Report  published  by  Dr.  Poe’s
Texas  Transportation  Institute,  TTI,  drivers  in  the  Atlanta  metro-
politan area spend an average of 60 hours per year stuck in traffic
and  they  waste  approximately  44  gallons  of  fuel  in  the  process.
This  is  my  hometown,  by  the  way.  With  gas  prices  currently  at
$4.08  per  gallon,  as  the  Chairman  said,  for  regular  gasoline,  this
equates to almost $200 per driver that is wasted when families are
struggling to pay for rising energy costs.

Metropolitan Atlanta has similar congestion to Washington, D.C.,
and  San  Francisco,  and  only  Los  Angeles  has  a  greater  congestion
problem. Congestion, as we know, it is not limited to our major cit-
ies. Nationally, TTI estimates that congestion on our nation’s roads
resulted in 2.9 billion gallons of wasted fuel in 2007 and a $78 bil-
lion drain on our economy.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

Congestion  aside,  our  transportation  infrastructure  accounts  for
a  significant  portion  of  our  total  energy  consumption.  Civilian
transportation  consumes  nearly  nine  million  barrels  of  petroleum
per  day  for  gasoline,  twice  the  amount  of  industrial  uses.  With  oil
prices  now  at  about  $135  per  barrel,  the  total  cost  is  a  staggering
$1.2 billion per day.

Despite the numerous challenges presented by our transportation
infrastructure,  researchers  across  America  are  working  right  now
on  reducing  our  energy  consumption  and  easing  our  congestion
problems.  Our  panel  will  describe  many  technologies  that  can  im-
prove  the  condition  and  sustainability  of  our  highways  both  in  the
short- and long-term.

The  priority  of  research  and  development  in  the  transportation
sector has lagged behind construction and rehabilitation. The chal-
lenges  that  now  face  our  transportation  infrastructure  will  require
innovative design and technologies. So I am eager to hear the pan-
el’s thoughts on how effective R&D activities have been in the past
and  how  R&D  should  be  included,  as  David  just  mentioned,  the
next transportation bill.

Chairman  Wu,  again  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing.  It
couldn’t be more timely. I look forward to the panel and their testi-
mony, and I yield back the balance of my time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Gingrey follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE PHIL GINGREY

Good  morning  Mr.  Chairman.  I  want  to  first  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing
today  that  touches  the  lives  of  so  many  Americans  on  a  daily  basis.  I  am  pleased
to work with you as we continue this subcommittee’s efforts to improve our nation’s
transportation  infrastructure  through  innovative  research  and  development  activi-
ties that will hopefully result in a windfall of cost savings for our nation.

While  the  importance  of  our  roads  and  highways  to  our  economy  and  way  of  life
are  self-evident,  I  would  like  to  take  a  moment  to  document  for  the  Subcommittee
the  extent  of  their  impact.  There  are  approximately  four  million  miles  of  roads  in
this  country  and  Americans  drive  approximately  four  trillion  miles  per  year.  Fur-
thermore, there are over 200 million cars and light trucks on the road, and a further
eight million trucks on the roads supporting our businesses. Overall, transportation
related activities currently account for 10 percent of our GDP.

To support all this traffic, government expenditures on our highways are approxi-
mately $140 billion annually. Unfortunately, even with this constant influx of reve-
nues, our infrastructure cannot support our growing traffic needs.

According  to  the  Urban  Mobility  Report  published  by  Dr.  Poe’s  Texas  Transpor-
tation  Institute  (TTI),  drivers  in  the  Atlanta  Metropolitan  area  spend  an  average
of  60  hours  per  year  stuck  in  traffic  and  waste  approximately  44  gallons  of  fuel  in
the  process.  With  gas  prices  currently  at  $4.07  per  gallon  for  regular  gas,  this
equates  to  almost  $200  per  driver  that  is  wasted  when  families  are  struggling  to
pay for the rising energy costs.

Metropolitan  Atlanta  has  similar  congestion  to  the  Washington,  DC  and  San
Francisco  areas,  and  only  Los  Angeles  has  a  greater  congestion  problem.  Conges-
tion—as we know—is not limited to our major cities. Nationally, TTI estimates that
congestion on our nation’s roads resulted in 2.9 billion gallons of wasted fuel in 2007
and a $78 billion drain on the U.S. economy.

Congestion aside, our transportation infrastructure accounts for a significant por-
tion  of  our  total  energy  consumption.  Civilian  transportation  consumes  nearly  nine
million  barrels  of  petroleum  per  day  for  gasoline,  twice  the  amount  of  industrial
uses.  With  oil  prices  at  $135  per  barrel  the  total  cost  is  a  staggering  $1.2  billion
per day.

Despite  the  numerous  challenges  presented  by  our  transportation  infrastructure,
researchers  across  America  are  working,  right  now,  on  reducing  our  energy  con-
sumption  and  easing  our  congestion  problems.  Our  panel  will  describe  many  tech-
nologies that can improve the condition and sustainability of our highways, both in
the short- and long-term.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

The  priority  of  research  and  development  in  the  transportation  sector  has  lagged
behind  construction  and  rehabilitation.  The  challenges  that  now  face  our  transpor-
tation  infrastructure  will  require  innovative  designs  and  technologies.  I  am  eager
to  hear  the  panel’s  thoughts  on  how  effective  R&D  activities  have  been  in  the  past
and how R&D should be included in the next transportation bill.

Chairman Wu, again, thank you for holding this hearing and I yield back the bal-

ance of my time.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Gingrey.
If there are other Members who wish to submit additional open-
ing statements, your statements will be added to the record at this
point.

[The prepared statement of Ms. Richardson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE LAURA RICHARDSON

Thank  you  Chairman  Wu  for  holding  this  very  important  hearing  today,  and  our
witnesses for their appearance. The purpose of today’s hearing is to examine current
efforts  in  transportation  infrastructure  research  that  will  reduce  energy  consump-
tion and improve energy efficiency.

Fact of the matter is highway construction and maintenance consumes a lot of en-
ergy.  From  the  amount  of  fuel  that  is  consumed  by  cement  trucks  and  other  con-
struction  related  vehicles,  to  the  cars  that  waste  fuel  sitting  idly  in  traffic  due  to
lane  closures  as  a  result  of  highway  construction,  plenty  of  energy  is  consumed  on
a daily basis.

In  my  home  State  of  California,  where  there  are  more  registered  vehicles  than
there are registered drivers; and where we have been dealing with traffic congestion
and  the  environmental  impacts  for  years,  the  heads  of  the  State  DOT  (Department
of Transportation) have already begun to tackle this issue.

Indeed, one of the individuals testifying today is Mr. Randell Iwasaki, Chief Dep-
uty  Director  of  the  California  Department  of  Transportation.  Under  his  leadership
the State of California has pursued a number of projects to address energy efficiency
through our transportation infrastructure. This includes the use of old tires in rub-
berized asphalt, the installation of LED red lights saving the State taxpayers more
than  $2  million  a  year  in  power  costs,  and  conversion  of  the  Caltrans  equipment
fleet to clean burning fuels.

Furthermore,  under  Executive  Order  S–3–05,  which  established  climate  change
emission  reduction  targets  for  the  state,  Caltrans  has  embarked  on  an  effort  to
lower  fuel  consumption,  and  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions  (GHG)  by  imple-
menting  several  programs.  The  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  manages  traffic
flow;  the  Cold  Foam  Recycle  Project  (which  won  an  award  from  Green  Technology)
recycles  in-place  materials  on  high  speed,  high  traffic  volume  roadways,  and  Waste
Tires  which  as  mentioned  earlier,  establishes  a  variety  of  uses  for  waste  tire  prod-
ucts  including  shredded  waste  tires  which  are  used  as  lightweight  fill  for  embank-
ments.

Likewise the State of California uses environmentally friendly cement, in addition
to  establishing  the  Long-life  Pavement  Rehabilitation  Strategies  program.  The  pur-
pose  of  this  program  is  to  reduce  the  need  for  future  repairs  on  our  highways,  by
building highways that last as long as thirty years with minimal maintenance.

With  the  rise  in  gas  prices,  coupled  with  overall  rise  in  the  cost  of  living,  the  re-
search  being  done  at  the  University  Transportation  Centers  across  the  country  is
vital to the sustainability of our national economy.

I look forward to a productive discussion, Mr. Chairman I yield back my time.
Chairman  WU.  I  am  delighted  to  have  such  an  expert  group  of
witnesses before the Subcommittee today to discuss this very, very
important  and  timely  topic.  Mr.  Paul  Brubaker  is  the  Adminis-
trator of the Research and Innovative Technology Administration of
the U.S. Department of Transportation. Mr. Randell Iwasaki is the
Chief  Deputy  Director  of  the  California  Department  of  Transpor-
tation.  My  good  friend,  Dr.  Robert  Bertini,  I  especially  welcome
here  in  Washington,  is  the  Director  of  the  Oregon  Transportation
Research  and  Education  Consortium,  a  university  transportation
center  comprised  of  researchers  from  Portland  State  University,
Oregon State University, the University of Oregon and the Oregon

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

Institute  of  Technology.  Next  we  have  Mr.  Gerald  Voigt,  President
and CEO of the American Concrete Pavement Association, and Dr.
Christopher  Poe,  Assistant  Director  and  Director  of  the  Center  on
Tolling Research at the Texas Transportation Institute.

As our witnesses already know, your spoken testimony should be
timed for about five minutes. Your written testimony will be taken
into  the  record  in  its  entirety,  and  after  your  testimony,  Members
of  the  Committee  will  have  five  minutes  for  each  round  to  ask
questions,  and  we  will  begin  with  Administrator  Brubaker.  Please
proceed.
STATEMENT  OF  MR.  PAUL  R.  BRUBAKER,  ADMINISTRATOR,
RESEARCH  AND  INNOVATIVE  TECHNOLOGY  ADMINISTRA-
TION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Wu,  Dr.  Gingrey,  distin-
guished  Members  of  the  Committee.  I  have  the  privilege  of  rep-
resenting  the  Research  and  Innovative  Technology  Administration
at  the  United  States  Department  of  Transportation.  Our  job  at
RITA  is  to  coordinate  research  across  all  the  various  modes,  and
one  of  the  things  that  we  are  interested  in  doing  is  to  make  sure
that  we  have  mechanisms  in  place  to  ensure  the  appropriate  level
of investment across the Department in a variety of different areas,
particularly  those  materials  that  can  reduce  life  cycle  energy  costs
and ensure sustainability for our transportation infrastructure.

Mr. Chairman, our theme for the Research and Innovative Tech-
nology  Administration  is  something  we  like  to  say,  our  tag  line,  if
you  will,  our  bumper  sticker  is,  ‘‘Innovation  for  a  Nation  on  the
Move,’’  and  the  key  there  is  to  ensure  that  we  continue  to  be  on
the  move,  and  the  points  you  raised  in  your  opening  statement
about  intelligent  transportation  systems  and  the  ability  to  reduce
fuel consumption just by keeping traffic moving is a really excellent
one  and  it  is  one  that  we  have  devoted  significant  amount  of  re-
search  dollars  into  and  we  have  got  a  number  of  university  trans-
portation  centers  across  the  country  including  those  at  Portland
State  and  those  at  Georgia  Tech  that  are  engaged  in—as  well  as
other  areas  in  the  country  that  are  engaged  in  that  type  of  re-
search  to  ensure  that  we  are  developing  modern  technology,  the
latest technology, taking advantage of commercial developments as
well as researching ways that we can integrate existing and future
technologies  including  things  like  nanotechnology  to  ensure  that
those  developments  are  incorporated  into  the  infrastructure  over
time. That is on the intelligent transportation system side.

We  also  are  conducting  significant  research  into  recycled  mate-
rials  and  those  innovative  materials  and  methods  that  can  signifi-
cantly reduce life cycle energy costs and make use of recycled mate-
rials. We have got a number of efforts underway, particularly those
that  we  are  working  with  industrial  and  commercial  waste  prod-
ucts  trying  to  figure  out  the  best  way  to  use  waste  material  and
industrial  byproducts  to  achieve  this  objective,  and  one  example  is
that  we  currently  see  over  71  million  tons  of  pulverized  coal  by-
products, also known as fly ash, produced in the United States and
only  about  39  percent  of  that  fly  ash  is  recycled  or  used  for  other
purposes. Most of what is currently produced winds up in landfills,
which as we know, is a very environmentally unfriendly option. So

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

pavements made with fly ash offer the potential for providing lower
costs  and  in  fact  more  durable  pavement  and  we  are  very  inter-
ested in that type of research and we are going to do that and sup-
port that through the Department.

Recycled  tire  fibers  are  also  another  technology  that  show  great
potential,  and  today,  as  we  know,  most  old  automobile  tires  wind
up  in  landfills  or  they  get  incinerated  which,  is  again,  not  exactly
a  very  environmentally  friendly  option,  and  what  we  are  sup-
porting right now based on our experience with rubberized asphalt,
we  are  supporting  the  use  of  recycled  materials  and  trying  to  use
recycled  rubber  to  see  if  the  performance  that  we  experience  with
our  rubberized  asphalt  projects  using  virgin  synthetic  fibers  has
the  same  durability  and  quality  as  that  made  with  the  virgin  syn-
thetic fibers.

Also, we are looking at nanotechnology, like I mentioned, another
cutting-edge  innovation  that  may  show  some  promise  in  reducing
long-term energy consumption and dramatically increasing the sus-
tainability. For example, at the Missouri University of Science and
Technology  in  Rolla,  Missouri,  they  are  conducting  a  field  test  of
bridge decking made with fiber-reinforced composites. What that is
going  to  do,  it  eliminates  the  need  for  steel  rebar,  which  obviously
is  energy  intensive  to  produce  that  rebar  for  reinforcement,  but  it
also can significantly extend the life of the bridge, cutting down on
replacement  costs  and  the  need  to  conduct  repair  of  the  bridge
decking. Georgia Tech has some self-consolidating concretes that is
going  to  reduce  the  maintenance  costs  and  improve  the  durability
and  longer  life  of  bridge  structure.  Federal  Highway  Administra-
tion  is  involved  in  a  demonstration  project  for  advanced  material
called ultra high performance concrete, and we view those as pretty
critical developments.

There  are  also  some  challenges  though,  which  you  asked  us  to
address  in  the  letter  of  invitation,  and  we  view  those  in  two  par-
ticular  areas.  One  is  standards  development:  are  there  sufficient
standards  that  exist  to  encourage  the  use  of  sustainable  products
and high-energy-efficient products, both in the construction and the
repair  of  these  materials,  and  then  the  second  is  the  procurement
process  itself,  is  the  procurement  process—and  as  you  know,  most
of the actual implementation is done at the State and local level—
is  the  procurement  process  supportive  in  requiring  these  sustain-
able products, and those are the two areas that we see as the most
significant challenges.

So  that  concludes  my  testimony  and  I  would  be  delighted  to  an-

swer any questions.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Brubaker follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF PAUL R. BRUBAKER

Thank you, Chairman Wu, Ranking Member Gingrey, and distinguished Members
of  the  Subcommittee.  I  have  the  privilege  of  serving  as  the  Administrator  for  the
Department of Transportation’s (DOT) Research and Innovative Technology Admin-
istration (RITA), and I am grateful to have the opportunity to come before you today
to testify on RITA’s role in coordinating and facilitating research into fuel efficiency
and sustainability in our transportation infrastructure.

With his signature on the Federal-Aid Highway Act of 1956, President Dwight D.
Eisenhower  committed  the  U.S.  Government  to  investing  in  the  development  of  a
transportation  system  that  would  revolutionize  the  American  economy  and  way  of
life  for  decades  to  come.  However,  no  one  could  have  anticipated  the  sheer  volume

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

of passenger and freight movement that the transportation infrastructure must sup-
port  yearly.  Our  roads  handled  nearly  three  trillion  vehicle  miles  in  2005  alone—
a  74  percent  increase  from  1990.  As  America’s  economy  and  population  continues
to  grow,  it  will  push  even  greater  demand  on  our  highways,  interstates  and  roads
in  the  decades  to  come.  A  safe,  reliable,  and  sustainable  transportation  system  is
key to our nation’s continued prosperity.

New  construction,  operational  improvements,  and  routine  maintenance  of  our
transportation  infrastructure  have  an  enormous  cost,  and  are  straining  federal,
State  and  local  resources.  America  has  162,373  miles  of  National  and  Interstate
Highways,  with  nearly  one-third  needing  extensive  upgrades.  Innovative,  sustain-
able  materials  and  systems  provide  us  with  the  opportunity  to  construct  new
bridges  and  overpasses,  expand  capacity  and  make  necessary  operational  improve-
ments, with less resources and better long-term durability. Various factors, such as
lagging  national  and  State  materials  standards,  technical  barriers  and  budgetary
constraints,  have  impeded  the  progress  of  the  development  and  use  of  innovative
materials,  coatings,  and  planning  processes  that  can  increase  the  sustainability  of
our  transportation  infrastructure.  It  is  clearly  in  our  nation’s  best  interest  to  have
a  transportation  infrastructure  that  supports  greater  fuel  efficiency,  and  is  more
sustainable.  The  Department  of  Transportation  is  committed  to  collaborating  with
stakeholders  in  government,  industry  and  the  academic  community  to  overcome
these challenges.

Today,  I  will  be  discussing  current  research  and  programmatic  activities  of  RITA
and  the  University  Transportation  Centers  (UTC)  program  within  the  areas  of  en-
ergy efficiency and infrastructure sustainability; the processes that guide our prior-
ities  in  these  areas;  and  the  challenges  to  the  research,  development  and  national
deployment of innovative materials and technologies.

Research  and  Development  Activities  in  Energy  Efficiency  and  Infrastruc-

ture Sustainability

Since its creation in 2004, RITA has sought to effectively prioritize transportation
research  programs,  identify  innovation  gaps,  and  coordinate  research  and  tech-
nology  efforts  within  the  Department,  and  throughout  the  transportation  commu-
nity.  While  there  are  challenges  to  effectively  promoting  both  the  research  and  de-
velopment, and widespread deployment of more energy efficient and sustainable ma-
terials  and  technologies,  there  has  been  a  lot  of  progress  as  well.  The  Secretary  of
Transportation’s  seven  priorities  for  national  transportation  have  driven  Depart-
mental  research  and  development  in  the  areas  of  energy  efficiency  and  sustain-
ability—specifically  by  focusing  on  Reduced  Congestion,  Energy  Independence  and
Environmental Sustainability.

Under  the  guidance  of  these  priorities,  the  Federal  Highway  Administration’s
Turner-Fairbank Highway Research Center (TFHRC), ,and the University Transpor-
tation  Centers,  have  made  great  progress  in  researching  and  developing  innovative
materials  and  technologies  that  offer  the  potential  for  increasing  the  sustainability
of our transportation infrastructure.

University Transportation Centers

First, I would like to discuss a few of the University Transportation Center (UTC)
research  and  development  activities  in  the  areas  of  energy  efficiency  and  sustain-
ability. The UTC Program is a great example of an effective partnership that brings
together State transportation agencies and private sector stakeholders with the aca-
demic  community  to  find  solutions  to  pressing  transportation  challenges.  UTCs  are
mandated to address regional issues that impact their states, and bridge the institu-
tional  divide—providing  outstanding  opportunities  for  technology  transfer  and  de-
ployment.

DOT seeks to tap into the vast pool of expertise, and existing research portfolios,
of  our  nation’s  academic  community  by  funding  UTC  transportation  research—in-
cluding energy efficiency and sustainability.

There are several great examples of the important work UTCs are engaged in:

• The Missouri University of Science and Technology at Rolla conducted a field
test of a bridge deck made with fiber reinforced composites. Using composites
precludes  the  use  of  steel  bars  as  reinforcement,  which  will  significantly  ex-
tend the service life of the bridge, and eliminate the need to replace steel re-
inforcements at some point in the future. Missouri S&T is involved in numer-
ous  projects  to  study  fiber  reinforced  composites,  and  their  potential  for  up-
grading aging bridges.
• The University Transportation Center for Materials in Sustainable Transpor-
tation  Infrastructure  (MiSTI)  at  Michigan  Technological  University  conducts

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

research  in  the  areas  of  recycled  and  beneficial  use  materials  in  transpor-
tation  infrastructure.  For  example,  Portland  cement  production  is  a  signifi-
cant  contributor  to  total  global  greenhouse  emissions.  Reducing  Portland  ce-
ment consumption is the simplest way to reduce this greenhouse gas produc-
tion.  MiSTI  is  researching  new  methods  of  constructing  concrete  highways
and  bridges  using  less  Portland  cement,  which  will  greatly  reduce  the  envi-
ronmental impacts of Portland cement production.
• University  of  California–Davis’  Institute  of  Transportation  Studies  is  evalu-
ating  modified  binder  mixes,  comparing  overlays  with  mixes  using  a  new
process  for  rubberizing  asphalt  binders.  The  results  were  extremely  prom-
ising.  Caltrans  is  reviewing  the  results  and  the  recommendation  to  move  to
pilot  projects  and  how  to  incorporate  results.  This  research  should  lead  to
more  use  of  rubberized  asphalt,  and  longer  lives  for  pavement  maintenance
and rehabilitation overlays, which will save money and reduce use of crushed
stone.
• At  the  Georgia  Institute  of  Technology,  research  has  developed  three  accept-
able mixtures for self-consolidating concretes for use in precast bridge girders.
The  use  of  these  self-consolidating  concretes  will  result  in  better  quality
bridge  girders  which  require  less  construction  labor  and  time  on  site,  signifi-
cantly  reducing  project  costs.  The  improved  materials  properties  will  also  re-
sult in more reliable, longer-lived bridge spans with reduced maintenance and
repair costs.

U.S. DOT

Departmentally,  there  has  been  very  good  progress  in  pushing  innovative  mate-
rials technologies as well. Turner-Fairbank Highway Research Center is conducting
research  into  developing  methods  for  using  more  fly  ash,  a  by  product  of  coal  com-
bustion,  in  concrete  mixtures  for  road  paving.  Fly  ash  is  typically  land-filled  after
it is produced, and using more of it in concrete mixtures recycles fly ash with little
environmental  impact.  Pavements  made  with  fly  ash  offer  the  potential  for  pro-
viding  lower-cost,  more  durable  pavement,  which  uses  less  energy  to  manufacture.
Turner-Fairbank is also working on testing procedures, construction guidelines, and
supportive software applications to promote greater use of fly ash in paving applica-
tions.

While  Turner-Fairbank  is  exploring  ways  to  use  more  fly  ash  in  concrete  mix-
tures,  the  FHWA  is  involved  in  a  demonstration  project  for  an  advanced  concrete
material  called  Ultra  High  Performance  Concrete  (UHPC).  This  project  is  a  part  of
the President’s National Nanotechnology Initiative, and has broad energy efficiency
and  sustainability  implications  for  transportation  construction  and  maintenance.
UHPC  is  composed  of  a  special  mixture  of  minerals  and  fibers  that  is  lightweight,
impermeable  and  resistant  to  freezing.  This  material  offers  the  potential  to  reduce
energy consumption across the life cycle, as it is a precast concrete that can be con-
structed  away  from  the  worksite,  and  subsequently  transported—reducing  the  im-
pact on driving costs, reducing congestion created by construction projects, and low-
ering  maintenance  costs.  In  2006,  the  first  highway  bridge  built  in  North  America
with  UHPC  was  opened  in  Wapello  County,  Iowa—this  bridge  was  the  result  of  a
collaboration  of  FHWA,  Iowa  DOT,  the  Iowa  State  University  Bridge  Engineering
Center, and private industry.

Partnerships  such  as  this,  and  other  collaborative  relationships,  are  essential  to
our  success  in  effectively  facilitating  research  and  development,  and  deploying  re-
search  results  in  these  areas.  The  multi-state,  multi-agency,  public-private  makeup
of  our  national  transportation  infrastructure  necessitates  cooperative  research  in
order for us to be successful innovators.

Coordinating  the  U.S.  DOT  Research,  Development  and  Technology  Port-

folio

While  there  have  been  very  good  outcomes  from  RITA’s  current  research  and  de-
velopment activities and investments, we are actively seeking to improve these proc-
esses.  The  U.S.  DOT,  through  RITA,  is  instituting  a  new,  Research  Planning  and
Investment Coordination (RPIC) process for coordinating, facilitating and reviewing
the  Department’s  research  and  development  programs  and  activities.  It  will  allow
the Department to:

• Align research investments with National transportation goals;
• Track  performance  and  net  benefits  of  Departmental  RD&T  dollars  invested;
• Create  visibility  and  transparency  for  all  directed  and  discretionary  research

funding;

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

• Identify potential redundancies and eliminate unnecessary duplication; and
• Leverage  available  research  resources  including  those  within  the  U.S.  DOT,

at the UTCs, in the State DOTs, and in the private sector.

The goal is to achieve greater transparency and bring into one database all of the
RD&T  data  that  are  currently  scattered  among  many  agencies,  as  recommended  in
the GAO report Transportation Research: Opportunities for Improving the Oversight
of  DOT’s  Research  Programs  and  User  Satisfaction  with  Transportation.1 When
completed,  the  database  will  allow  policy-makers,  researchers,  and  other  users  to
search  for  RD&T  information  by  research  topic,  funding  level,  grant  description,
contractor, State, and more. It will be a critical tool for coordinating research invest-
ments, and for sharing knowledge.

Additionally,  we  believe  strongly  in  promoting  Communities  of  Interest  (COI)
among  the  Department’s  modal  administrations,  external  partners  and  relevant
transportation  stakeholders.  COI  allow  agencies,  organizations,  institutions  and  in-
dividuals  to  exchange  information  and  resources  through  multiple  knowledge  sys-
tems.  COI  offer  an  excellent  opportunity  for  organic  peer  review  and  collaboration,
expanding the pool of expertise readily available to enhance progress across priority
RD&T areas.

The Department’s plan for achieving a safe, sustainable and more efficient trans-
portation  system,  Transportation  Vision  2030,  defined  an  initial  list  of  seven  pri-
ority,  multi-modal  Communities  of  Interest  (COI)  that  have  a  significant  impact  on
the future of energy efficiency and sustainability:

• Multi-modal policy and transportation systems research;
• Environmental stewardship and energy independence;
• Physical infrastructure;
• Surveillance infrastructure;
• Human factors research and applications;
• Materials; and
• Intelligent Transportation Systems.

Modal RD&T Collaboration within the U.S. DOT

While  each  administration  has  unique,  mission-related  research  areas  and  topics
it  must  pursue,  the  Communities  of  Interest  model  will  ensure  that  priority  cross-
cutting  areas  will  be  addressed  through  collaborative  processes,  encouraging  better
knowledge sharing and leveraging of RD&T dollars. Specifically, Communities of In-
terest  in  Physical  Infrastructure  and  Materials  are  driving  cross-cutting  research
and  development  activities  in  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  across  U.S.  DOT
modal offices.

Intermodal  research  working  groups  and  online  forums  are  being  established  on
these  topics  to  cultivate  ongoing  collaboration  among  Departmental  operating  ad-
ministrations,  University  Transportation  Centers  (UTCs),  and  U.S.  DOT  Centers  of
Excellence.  Communities  of  Interest  will  help  to  ensure  that  related  research  is  co-
ordinated,  fostering  technology  transfer  through  more  effective  sharing  of  outcomes
and products.

Facilitating RD&T with External Partners

The U.S. DOT engages in cooperative research with stakeholders across the trans-
portation  sector,  including  other  federal  agencies,  State  and  local  governments,  the
academic community, industry, and not-for-profit institutions. RITA has been work-
ing to build closer ties between individual UTCs and U.S. DOT programs to ensure
that UTC research is targeted toward the critical transportation challenges as man-
dated.

The  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue  Commission  rec-
ommended  that  ‘‘funding  of  RD&T  . . .  be  subject  to  careful  planning  and  review
by  the  transportation  industry.’’ 2 The  RD&T  planning  team  has  reviewed  the  stra-
tegic  research  documents  of  key  stakeholders  and  will  continue  to  work  with  them
to  ensure  consistent  and  substantive  input  into  the  research  investment  planning
process.  By  providing  greater  visibility  and  transparency  into  the  U.S.  DOT’s  re-
search programs, the U.S. DOT seeks to foster greater collaboration and leveraging

1 Government  Accountability  Office,  ‘‘Transportation  Research:  Opportunities  for  Improving
the Oversight of DOT’s Research Programs and User Satisfaction with Transportation,’’ August
2006, http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d06917.pdf

2 Transportation for Tomorrow: Report of the National Surface Transportation Policy and Rev-

enue Study Commission, p. 31, http://www.transportationfortomorrow.org/final¥report/

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

of  resources  with  State  and  local  governments,  the  Transportation  Research  Board
(TRB), and other relevant entities.

Challenges to the Broad Deployment of Effective Technologies

The Department’s primary role in facilitating the broad deployment of innovative
technologies  is  to  provide  the  necessary  support  to  demonstrate  the  viability  of
emerging technologies, and to establish the regulatory framework, standards and ar-
chitectures  to  safely  and  effectively  integrate  new  technologies  into  the  transpor-
tation infrastructure.

The  Department  does  not  do  this  in  a  vacuum—across  all  of  the  modal  adminis-
trations, U.S. DOT experts serve on over 300 technical committees of 48 Standards
Developing  Organizations  (SDOs),  seeking  to  ensure  that  new  technologies  and  ap-
plications  may  be  deployed  to  enhance  transportation  safety,  security  and  mobility.
These  standards  become  the  basis  for  DOT  safety  regulations  and  planning  guid-
ance.  U.S.  DOT  experts  also  serve  on  countless  research  panels  and  technical  ex-
change  committees  to  enable  implementation  of  significant  technological  and  oper-
ational innovations.

Many  current  construction  and  operational  standards,  and  State  transportation
agency  contracting  procedures  do  not  adequately  support  or  incentivize  greater  use
of  innovative  materials.  Our  friends  at  NIST  are  currently  reevaluating  existing
standards and best practices, and developing standards for new materials, high-per-
formance and adaptive concrete technologies, to determine how standards and speci-
fications can be revised to reflect national priorities for the use of innovative mate-
rials in construction and maintenance.

More  difficult  is  encouraging  the  deployment  of  incremental  improvements  in
operational  concepts,  procedures  and  technology  that  do  not  rise  to  the  level  of  a
standard. In many ways, these smaller steps, often the result of U.S. DOT or State
DOT  research,  are  just  as  crucial  to  improving  safety  and  efficiency.  However,  due
to their incremental nature, sharing information on these advances across the many
levels of government, multiple systems operators, and the contractor and consulting
engineering  community  is  difficult.  This  is  where  RITA’s  development  of  Commu-
nities  of  Interest  is  vital  in  expanding  our  processes  for  knowledge  sharing,  tech-
nology  transfer  and  research  implementation.  Under  the  COI  model,  every  project
is required to have a mechanism for technology transfer and deployment by includ-
ing State, institutional and industry stakeholders in the planning process.

The  multi-state,  multi-agency,  public-private  makeup  of  America’s  transportation
infrastructure,  its  providers  and  users,  requires  strong  institutional  arrangements
and partnerships to ensure successful cooperation when planning, evaluating or im-
plementing  research  results.  State  and  local  DOTs,  transit  agencies,  port  authori-
ties,  railroads,  trucking  firms,  carriers  and  shippers  need  to  be  aware  of  research
results,  implementing  contracting  and  internal  operating  practices  that  encourage
the use of new research and technology, as so much of the implementation of trans-
portation  infrastructure  research  is  conducted  at  those  levels  of  government,  often
through cooperation with the private sector. We believe that Public-Private Partner-
ships offer a practical, effective vehicle for overcoming many of these barriers.

Conclusion

RITA  has  made  great  strides  in  our  young  life  towards  coordinating  DOT  trans-
portation research priorities, and we are working towards a national transportation
research strategy and strategic plan. Innovative materials and Intelligent Transpor-
tation Systems will be two of the key priority areas we will address as we continue
to advance in this direction.

Examples  of  Current  U.S.  DOT  and  UTC  Research  and  De-
velopment  Activities  with  Energy  Efficiency  and  Sustain-
ability Applications

U.S. DOT Activities
Development  Of  Portland  Cement  Concrete  Pavement  (PCCP)  Mixtures
Containing High Fly Ash Contents
FHWA/Office  of  Infrastructure  R&D,  Pavement  Materials  &  Construction
Team

Verify,  integrate,  and  refine  software,  guidance  and  test  procedures  to  facilitate
the use of high fly ash content concrete mixtures for highway paving. The products

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

of this research will contribute to both greater use of fly ash in highway paving ap-
plications and improved performance of the pavement.
Greatly Increased Use of Fly Ash in Hydraulic Cement Concrete (HCC) for
Pavement Layers and Transportation Structures
FHWA/Office  of  Infrastructure  R&D,  Pavement  Materials  &  Construction
Team and Contractor(s) to be Identified (Solicitation in Process)

To  more  than  double  the  use  of  fly  ash  in  HCC  and  halve  the  use  of  Portland
cement. The high payoffs are decreases in energy content of the cementitious phase,
amount  of  CO2 given  off,  and  amount  of  fly  ash  land-filled—also  elimination  of  the
need  for  more  cement  production  and  imports  and  the  productive  use  of  an  other-
wise  wasted  material.  Once  technology  is  in  place,  initial  costs  may  be  lowered  in
those  areas  where  fly  ash  haul  distances  are  less  than  Portland  cement  and  due  to
energy  and  disposal  savings.  Extended  service  life  is  also  a  realistic  objective  due
to  the  recognized  quality  of  fly  ash  in  making  concrete  better—with  less  perme-
ability,  porosity,  and  microcracking,  and  the  potential  capability  to  heal  due  to  ex-
tended hydration reactions.
Recycled Materials Resource Center
University of New Hampshire

Expand  the  extent  of  use  of  industrial  byproduct  materials  in  highway  construc-
tion through training, technology transfer, and research to support agency use of re-
cycled materials.
Warm Mix Asphalt
FHWA/Office  of  Pavement  Technology  with  support  from  the  Office  of  In-
frastructure R&D

Efforts to implement high priority findings from the international scan completed
last year and field demonstration projects to better understand the use and benefits
of  the  technology.  Warm  mix  asphalt  technology  will  allow  for  increased  levels  of
recycled asphalt materials in the production of hot mix asphalt.
Use of Reclaimed Asphalt Pavement
FHWA/Office of Pavement Technology

Advancement of increased usage of recycled asphalt (RAP) in asphalt mix design.
These  efforts  are  focusing  on  support  efforts  with  states  to  use  much  higher  levels
of  RAP  (>  25  percent)  in  hot  mix  asphalt  applications.  FHWA  has  helped  in  spon-
soring  workshops  with  industry,  we  have  formed  an  Expert  Task  Group  that  has
worked hard to conduct demonstration/pilot projects, and we have conducted on site
support of high RAP mixes through the use of our mobile lab.
In-Place Pavement Recycling
FHWA/Office of Pavement Technology with support from the Resource Cen-
ter

FHWA recently supported a workshop in Utah on in-place pavement recycling and
we are working with industry and State representatives to update training and de-
sign references on the use of this technology.
Use of Industrial Byproducts
FHWA/Office of Infrastructure R&D with Recycled Materials Resource Cen-
ter (Designated Program)

FHWA  in  partnership  with  EPA  recently  helped  support  a  workshop  in  Denver
on  the  use  of  industrial  byproducts  as  a  material  resource  to  design  and  produce
pavements.
Green Highways Partnership
FHWA/Office of Pavement Technology

FHWA  has  continued  to  support  the  Mid-Atlantic  Green  Highway  Partnership
which  includes  the  use  of  Recycled/Re-Use  Materials  as  a  major  theme  within  the
partnership. This partnership has encouraged the delivery of pilot projects using re-
cycled materials on a few highway projects in the Mid-Atlantic area.

UTC Activities

University  Transportation  Centers  across  the  Nation  engage  in  a  wide  variety  of

research projects. Here is a sampling from some of these centers.
Fibers from Recycled Tires as Reinforcement in Hot Mix Asphalt
Texas Transportation Institute (Texas A&M University)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

High-quality  long-lasting  hot  mix  asphalt  (HMA)  pavements  are  essential  to  the
sustainability of the U.S. economy. Previous research and construction projects have
demonstrated  that  virgin  synthetic  fibers  can  provide  excellent  reinforcing  aids  in
asphalt  paving  mixtures.  Fibers  from  scrap  tires  offer  an  excellent  low-cost  alter-
native supplement to virgin fibers. As no good use has been found for these byprod-
uct  fibers  from  the  tire  grinding  process,  they  are  currently  being  disposed  of  in
landfills or, in some cases, incinerated.

The  proposed  researchers  have  successfully  incorporated  virgin  synthetic  fibers
into  HMA  and  demonstrated  the  benefits  in  the  laboratory  and  even  in  the  field,
on a limited basis. Virgin fibers can improve the resistance of HMA to cracking and
rutting. This promising work needs to be continued to determine the value of using
fibers from the tire recycling process in HMA. Equipment is available to incorporate
fibers into HMA.

A  laboratory  study  will  be  developed  and  implemented  to  examine  the  utility  of
byproduct  tire  fibers  in  HMA  for  paving  purposes.  Researchers  will  incorporate  the
waste fibers into HMA, prepare and test HMA specimens in the laboratory, evaluate
the  benefits  of  fibers  in  different  types  of  HMA.  If  tire  fibers  appear  beneficial  in
HMA, the researchers will recommend modifications to materials specifications and
field  construction  guidelines  that  can  be  used  by  State  departments  of  transpor-
tation  and  other  highway  specifying  agencies.  This  project  may  lead  to  additional
research for TTI if the use of byproduct tire fibers in HMA appears promising.
Use of Recycled Materials in Bicycle and Pedestrian Trails
Texas Transportation Institute (Texas A&M University)

The  proposed  research  will  investigate  the  feasibility  and  benefits  of  paving  bicy-
cle/pedestrian  trails  with  recycled  material.  The  proposed  study  will  also  perform
field tests of paving bicycle/pedestrian trails with recycled material. A preferred mix
of  recycled  materials  will  be  used  in  a  test  section  of  an  off-road  bicycle  trail  and
then evaluated by the researchers and trail users.

The proposed research would include site-identification, planning and coordination
of  a  field  experiment.  Minimal  lab  testing  would  be  required  to  establish  and  char-
acterize  the  mix  design  for  the  materials  chosen  for  evaluation.  Field  test  sections
will be evaluated for bicyclist/pedestrian satisfaction, constructability, cost, perform-
ance, environmental impact, and aesthetics.

The  increased  use  of  byproducts  in  construction  applications  will  provide  numer-
ous environmental and economic benefits. Positive environmental effects include re-
duced  sold  waste  and  reduced  use  of  natural  resources.  Positive  economic  benefits
should  include  (a)  reduced  construction  costs;  (b)  creation  of  alternate  materials  for
non-existent,  poor,  or  depleting  aggregate  resources;  (c)  savings  in  energy  prices
versus disposal; (d) creation of new jobs through new manufacturing and marketing
opportunities; and (e) extension of creative rationale to other byproducts.
Implementation  of  a  System  for  Evaluating  Waste/Recycled  Materials  in
Transportation Projects
Texas Transportation Institute (Texas A&M University)

Enormous  quantities  of  waste  materials  are  generated  every  year  in  Texas  and
recycling  these  waste  materials  is  necessary  to  preserve  the  country’s  natural  re-
sources.  A  waste  and  recycled  material  evaluation  system  has  already  been  devel-
oped  which  takes  into  account  technical,  economic,  societal,  and  environmental  as-
pects of waste and recycled material utilization in roadbase.

Under this research project, the evaluation system will be field tested and imple-
mented  in  various  administrative  levels  including  one  or  two  TxDOT  districts  and
one  or  two  city  of  county  projects.  This  will  help  reduce  the  volume  of  waste  and
recycled materials going into landfills by permitting reuse in transportation projects.
The implementation will also help reduce the energy required to produce virgin ag-
gregate  involved  in  more  than  110  million  tons  of  recycled  aggregate  base  for  AC
and PCC pavements in addition to several other environment related benefits.
RFID  Applications  in  Transportation  Operation  and  Intelligent  Transpor-
tation Systems (ITS)
Oregon  Transportation  Research  and  Education  Consortium  (Portland
State University)

It  is  anticipated  that  great  applications  of  Radio  Frequency  Identification  (RFID)
technologies  in  transportation  operations  are  foreseen  in  next  few  years.  The  lower
cost producing and the long-lasting energy supply enables RFID technology with po-
tential applications in many areas including transportation and logistics. Under the
RFID  equipped  vehicle  and  highway  system,  almost  all  components  (vehicles,  high-
ways,  traffic  signals,  signs,  symbols,  pavement  markers,  etc.)  can  be  provided  with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

the  long-lasting  and  cheap  RFID  tags  or  labels.  RFID  system  typically  includes  an
RFID  device  containing  data,  an  antenna  transmitting  signals,  a  Radio  Frequency
(RF)  transceiver  generating  signals,  and  a  reader  receiving  RF  transmissions.  This
research is intended to investigate the potential RFID applications in transportation
operations  through  literature  review  and  survey;  and  identify  the  possibility  of  in-
corporating RFID into the Intelligent Transportation System (ITS).
Evaluation  of  Traffic  Simulation  Models  for  Supporting  ITS  Development
Oregon  Transportation  Research  and  Education  Consortium  (Portland
State University)

The  deployment  of  various  ITS  facilities  will  likely  change  the  functions  and
structures of the existing urban transportation network components. The continuing
expansion of ITS user service definitions is adding more and more travel and traffic
control elements to the already complex network configurations. The dynamic inter-
actions  between  the  traffic  control  and  management  components  and  the  traffic
flows  are  becoming  more  complicated  than  ever  before.  In  this  context,  the  use  of
a  traffic  simulation  model  is  becoming  the  most  cost-effective  way  to  analyze  the
complicated  ITS  networks.  Many  traffic  simulation  models  are  available  for  ana-
lyzing  operations  and  management.  While  each  type  of  traffic  simulation  model
seems  to  have  its  own  merit  and  shortcomings,  there  is  a  need  to  comprehensively
evaluate and document all of the existing models and identify those models that are
most  suitable  for  application  to  different  ITS  network  and  development  scenarios.

BIOGRAPHY FOR PAUL R. BRUBAKER

Paul Brubaker was nominated by President George W. Bush to serve as Adminis-
trator  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation’s  (DOT)  Research  and  Innovative
Technology Administration (RITA) on June 18, 2007. He was confirmed by the U.S.
Senate on August 3, 2007, and was sworn into office on August 8, 2007.

As  RITA  Administrator,  Mr.  Brubaker  leads  the  agency  responsible  for  coordi-
nating and reviewing DOT’s roughly $1 billion investment in research, development
and  technology,  and  is  charged  with  advancing  technologies  that  will  improve  the
Nation’s transportation system. RITA oversees the Bureau of Transportation Statis-
tics,  Volpe  Center,  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  program,  Transportation
Safety Institute, and numerous cross-modal research initiatives.

Mr. Brubaker previously served as CEO of Procentrix, a firm that helps organiza-
tions  plan,  manage  and  achieve  measurable  performance  improvement  through  the
effective  use  of  process  and  technology.  His  diverse  background  and  expertise  posi-
tioned  him  with  the  ability  to  empower  public  sector  transformation  and  drive  new
models for government efficiency. Prior to this role, Mr. Brubaker served as Execu-
tive  Vice  President  and  Chief  Marketing  Officer  of  SI  International,  one  of  the  Na-
tion’s fastest growing government contractors.

Mr.  Brubaker  previously  served  as  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  and  Deputy  Chief
Information Officer at the U.S. Department of Defense (DOD) where he was the De-
partment’s second highest-ranking technology official and supervised DOD’s $50 bil-
lion  annual  Information  Technology  expenditure.  He  drove  the  transformation  of
many  of  DOD’s  business  and  war-fighting  processes  including  personnel,  logistics,
finance and command and control, and supervised the Department’s electronic busi-
ness  activity  including  implementation  of  paperless  contracting  initiatives,  travel
process management and electronic mail. He was awarded the Distinguished Public
Service Medal (with bronze palm) for his efforts on behalf of the Department.

Before serving at DOD, Mr. Brubaker held various executive positions within the
public and private sectors, including Vice President of Strategic Programs for Litton
PRC, Vice President of Business Development for Federal Data Corporation, and in
senior  positions  within  the  U.S.  Senate  and  General  Accounting  Office.  While  serv-
ing  as  Republican  Staff  Director  of  the  Senate  Subcommittee  on  Oversight  of  Gov-
ernment Management, Mr. Brubaker was the principal staff architect of the Clinger
Cohen Act while working for then-Senator William S. Cohen (R–Maine).

He  has  also  won  numerous  awards  including  the  Association  for  Information  Re-
source  Management’s  (AFFIRM)  Government  Executive  Leadership  Award  in  2000.
He was named to Federal Computer Week’s Federal 100 in 1996 and 2002, and was
appointed  to  the  board  of  the  Virginia  Innovative  Technology  Authority  in  1998
where he served as chairman from 2001 to 2003. He recently ended terms as Chair-
man  of  the  Technical  Committee  of  the  Armed  Force  Communications  and  Elec-
tronics Association (AFCEA) and President of its D.C. Chapter.

Mr. Brubaker holds a B.A. from Youngstown State University and a M.P.A. from
Kent  State  University,  and  is  very  active  with  the  Churchill  Centre.  He  lives  with
his family in Oakton, Virginia.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Mr.  WILSON.  [Presiding]  Thank  you.  Are  there  any  questions?

Pardon me. I recognize Mr. Iwasaki.

21

STATEMENT OF MR. RANDELL H. IWASAKI, CHIEF DEPUTY

DIRECTOR, CALIFORNIA DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Mr.  IWASAKI.  I  think  I  need  more  than  five  minutes,  though.

Would that be okay? All right. Thank you.

Good  morning,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  My  name  is
Randy  Iwasaki  and  I  am  the  Chief  Deputy  Director  at  the  Cali-
fornia  Department  of  Transportation  and  I  am  just  going  to  get
right into it.

Government  works  the  best  when  we  have  definite  clear-cut
goals.  In  California,  we  have  AB–32,  the  California  Global  Warn-
ing  Solutions  Act  of  2006,  and  then  Governor  Schwarzenegger
signed  an  executive  order  which  established  climate  change  emis-
sion reduction targets for the state. We have to go back to 1990 lev-
els by 2020. So we have goals.

Proposition  1B  generated  $19.925  billion  for  congestion  relief  in
California.  We  have  to  take  congestion  levels  down,  delay  levels
down  to  below  today’s  level  by  2016.  So  we  have  goals  not  only  on
our climate change, on carbon reduction but also on congestion.

So  I  want  to  get  right  into  it.  Some  of  the  innovative  materials
that  we  are  looking  at—and  by  the  way,  our  budget  is  about  $14
billion  at  Caltrans.  Less  than  20  percent  of  that  is  federal.  So  we
are a state that helps ourselves. In the area of materials, I am the
technical  coordinating  committee  chair  of  the  Strategic  Highway
Research  Program,  SHRP  2,  we  call  it,  and  I  am  in  the  renewal
section.  We  are  looking  at  getting  in,  getting  out  and  staying  out,
basically  rapid  rehabilitation,  minimize  disruption  and  create
longer-life  facilities.  In  the  area  of  materials—and  by  the  way,
what  Congress  can  do  is,  it  was  set  up  at  $450  million.  It  was  cut
to $150 million, and besides renewal, there is congestion—or there
is  capacity,  reliability  and  safety  as  well,  research  in  that  area.
When we talk about materials, we are looking at longer lasting. We
are looking at recycling. We are actually doing recycling projects in
California.  Rubberized  asphalt  concrete,  Administrator  Brubaker
talked  about  that.  Thirty  percent  of  our  program,  asphalt  concrete
rehabilitation,  is  done  with  asphalt  rubber.  We  are  looking  at
warm  asphalt.  You  don’t  have  to  heat  it  as  high  so  therefore  you
don’t burn as much fuel.

And  we  recently  received  an  EPA  award  for  environmentally
friendly  concrete  and  cement,  and  you  wonder  what  is  that.  Well,
on  the  San  Francisco-Oakland  Bay  Bridge  in  the  foundations,  we
poured concrete that had 50 percent fly ash in it. So in California,
probably anywhere else, when you manufacture cement, one pound
of  cement  equals  one  pound  of  CO2.  It  is  a  little  bit  less  but  for
practical  purposes  it  is  one  for  one.  And  so  two  percent  of  our
greenhouse gas emissions are cement manufacturing and so we are
trying  to  reduce  the  amount  of  cement  but  still  get  the  same
strength and durability because the last thing you want is your fa-
cility to wear out faster and have to redo it sooner because you are
just going to spend money there. The last thing in the area of ma-
terials  is,  we  need  to  get  in,  get  out,  we  need  to  do  it  rapidly.  Get

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

the  facility  in  the  hands  of  the  traveling  public  sooner  so  we  are
doing it very, very quickly.

We are looking at fuels. We are the first State agency, the major
buyer of low-sulfur diesel in California five or six years ago. People
wonder  why  are  you  buying  that  expensive  fuel.  Well,  today  they
know because all fuel sold in California that is diesel is low sulfur
and  so  we  started  that  program.  Hydrogen—we  are  going  to  build
a hydrogen fueling facility in our Shop 7 in Los Angeles, the equip-
ment  shop.  E85—we  are  building  facilities  throughout  California.
How you can help us is, we need one standard specification for the
hardware  that  doesn’t  fluctuate  and  we  get  into  conflict  with  the
fire marshal.

In  the  area  of  technology,  there  is  so  much  technology  out  there
that  is  hard  to  explain  but  the  problem  is  integrating  it  into  the
transportation system. So I will talk about LED lights. It is a sim-
ple  technology.  We  started  working  on  that  15  years  ago  because
our controller box would kick out because of the heat. Today many,
many  states  use  LEDs.  It  is  a  lower  draw.  It  is  an  energy  saving.
It  is  sustainable.  We  are  proud  to  say  that  we  are  the  recipient,
the  only  recipient  so  far  of  the  Safe  Trip  21  effort.  It  is  along  the
lines of VII, Vehicle Infrastructure Integration program, where cars
talk  to  cars,  cars  talk  to  the  infrastructure.  One  of  these  days,
those  cars  are  going  to  refuse  to  crash,  refuse  to  run  off  the  road,
but  in  order  to  expedite  that  program,  we  applied  for  a  Safe  Trip
21  grant  and  that  is  where  the  communication  technology  is  not
imbedded  in  the  car  but  it  is  actually  in  consumer  mobile  devices.
You know them as cell phones. And so we are going to take 10,000
cell phones and run through the Bay area and we are going to get
arterial  information,  probe  information  so  that  you  can  take  your
trip faster, not shortest distance but quickest time. What does that
mean?  You  are  in  your  car  less,  you  burn  less  fuel.  We  think  that
has  a  lot  of  potential.  Travel  information—we  are  beefing  up  our
511  systems.  We  want  people  to  have  up-to-date  information  to
make  mode  choices,  put  people  in  other  modes  of  transportation.
And lastly on the technology, we just opened a system-wide adapt-
ive  ramp  metering  where  we  have  35-mile-an-hour  mainline  flows
and  we  adjust  each  meter  along  the  210  in  Los  Angeles  to  maxi-
mize throughput and then we are looking at electronic tolling.

You wonder how does California do it. We opened up right-of-way
for  deployment.  When  the  ITS  World  Congress  came  to  San  Fran-
cisco in 2005, we did a call for submissions with the private sector.
It  is  like  a  three-legged  stool  for  deployment  of  technologies:  aca-
demia, government and the private sector. We don’t build anything
in  State  government,  but  when  the  ITS  World  Congress  came  to
Sacramento,  we  opened  up  our  right-of-way.  We  have  some  great,
great  partnerships  there  and  it  morphed  into  the  ultra-successful
innovative  mobility  showcase  where  you  could  touch  ITS.  We  have
two  test  beds  for  mobility,  one  on  Interstate  80  near  Berkeley,  the
other  one  on  the  I-405  near  UC–Irvine.  We  fully  fund  our  UTCs.
We have five in the state. We partner with the Transportation Re-
search  Board,  AASHTO,  ITS  America,  U.S.  Department  of  Trans-
portation,  Federal  Highway  Administration  and  others.  We  have
joint  research  programs  with  other  nations.  We  do  mobility  re-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

search  for  the  last  20  years  with  France.  We  do  material  research
with Denmark. We do seismic research with Taiwan and Japan.

States  should  probably  play  in  the  deployment  of  technology  be-
cause we need the overarching standards. We don’t want the widg-
et or the product not to work when you cross State lines or county
lines.  We  have  to  have  inter-operability.  Some  of  the  impediments
are  on  the  federal  side  when  it  is  a  federally  over-sighted  project.
If  we  have  a  new  mix  design,  it  takes  time  to  get  those  approvals.
At the end of the day, the states are responsible for our rehabilita-
tion projects, so if something happens, they don’t come back to the
Federal  Highway  Administration.  They  come  back  to  the  states.
The non-competitive bid—we have patent laws in the United States
that  allow  the  private  sector  to  develop  new  widgets,  new  tech-
nology,  but  when  you  try  to  deploy  them  on  a  project,  you  have  to
go  through  a  PIF  process,  that’s  a  public  interest  forum.  It  takes
time.  And  so  we  are  trained  not  go  through  the  PIF  process,  but
how do you get innovation if you don’t go through the PIF process.
I  think  since  I  am  red  now,  and  I  have  so  much  to  say,  demo
projects,  you  know,  back  in  1970,  then-Governor  Ron  Reagan
flipped  a  switch  on  the  first  transportation  management  center  in
Los Angeles. Today transportation management centers are spread
throughout the United States. We need deployment. We need demo
projects.  AASHTO  sponsors  a  number  of  scans  that  go  throughout
the Nation as well as internationally to look at technology and how
they  deploy  those  technologies  so  we  don’t  have  to  reinvent  the
wheel.  We  use  our  strategic  plan  at  Caltrans  to  help  guide  our  re-
search program.

The  last  thing  I  would  say  is,  we  need  people  to  maintain,  oper-
ate, design and build these systems. That is where the UTCs come
into  play.  They  teach  the  next  generation  of  leaders.  We  need  to
get people in trades. So thank you very much for your time.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Iwasaki follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RANDELL H. IWASAKI

Mr. Chairman, Members of the Subcommittee:

My  name  is  Randell  Iwasaki.  I  am  the  Chief  Deputy  Director  of  the  California
Department  of  Transportation,  also  known  as  Caltrans.  I  would  like  to  thank  you
for the invitation to testify before you today.

As  Chief  Deputy  Director  of  Caltrans,  I  am  responsible  for  a  budget  of  14  billion
dollars,  an  organization  of  more  than  23,000  employees,  and  a  transportation  sys-
tem that includes 52,000 lane-miles of State highways, two of the five largest transit
systems in the Nation, three Amtrak routes, and the two busiest ports in the United
States.

I  serve  as  the  Chair  of  the  Intelligent  Transportation  Society  of  America’s  Board
of  Directors.  I  am  also  a  member  of  the  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  (ITS)
Advisory Committee, which is providing executive-level advice and guidance for U.S.
Department of Transportation (DOT) Secretary Mary Peters’ Five-Year ITS Program
Plan.

As you know, all State departments of transportation belong to the American As-
sociation  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials,  or  AASHTO.  I  have  been
a  member  of  the  AASHTO  Standing  Committee  on  Research  since  1999.  This  com-
mittee  represents  the  Association’s  interests  in  all  research  activities  for  all  trans-
portation  modes.  The  Committee  makes  reports  and  recommendations  on  the  $35
million  National  Cooperative  Highway  Research  Program  (NCHRP)  and  other  ac-
tivities  to  the  AASHTO  Board  of  Directors.  I  am  also  a  founding  member  of  the
AASHTO Technology Implementation Group (TIG) that provides leadership for pro-
moting and supporting rapid implementation of selected technologies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

With  regard  to  the  Transportation  Research  Board  (TRB)  Strategic  Highway  Re-
search Program (SHRP 2), I am Chair of the Technical Coordinating Committee for
Renewal.

I was recently a member of the Committee on Climate Change and U.S. Transpor-
tation  for  TRB’s  Special  Report  290:  Potential  Impacts  of  Climate  Change  on  U.S.
Transportation.

California  is  growing  rapidly,  and  by  2020,  its  population  is  expected  to  increase
from  37  million  to  44  million  people;  about  one  out  of  every  eight  Americans  now
lives  in  California.  We  have  more  registered  vehicles  (24  million)  than  we  have  li-
censed drivers (22 million), so vehicle travel is an important part of our culture, and
by  2020,  annual  vehicle  miles  traveled  will  increase  by  38  percent  to  475  billion
miles.  Trade  volumes  through  our  ports  will  also  more  than  double  by  2020.  Re-
sponding to this growth is a high priority for the state. Our objectives are to protect
the  existing  investment,  fuel  the  economy,  enhance  the  quality  of  life  for  our  citi-
zens,  and  protect  our  environment.  Achieving  these  objectives  will  require  a  sub-
stantial effort.

The  need  for  the  benefits  that  we  receive  from  new  materials  and  technologies
could  not  be  more  apparent  anywhere  than  it  is  here  in  California.  Each  year,  our
state suffers a societal cost of more than $46 billion in terms of car crashes and traf-
fic congestion. Car crashes annually cause more than 4,000 deaths, 300,000 serious
injuries,  and  the  associated  level  of  property  damage.  Traffic  congestion  leads  to  a
loss  of  economic  productivity,  wasted  fuel,  and  disrupted  goods  movement,  the  cost
of which continues to rise. We sincerely believe that new materials and technologies
will  help  us  significantly  improve  safety  and  reduce  traffic  congestion,  and  we  are
committed to investigating the benefits of implementing them.

On June 1, 2005, Governor Schwarzenegger signed Executive Order (EO) S–3–05,
which established climate change emission reduction targets for the State. The Cli-
mate  Action  Team  (CAT)  was  created  to  coordinate  the  statewide  effort.  Assembly
Bill  (AB)  32:  California  Global  Warming  Solutions  Act  of  2006  further  established
the first-in-the-world comprehensive program of regulatory and market mechanisms
to achieve quantifiable and cost-effective reductions of greenhouse gases (GHG), and
required the reduction of GHG emissions to 1990 levels by 2020. Caltrans is a mem-
ber of the CAT, and we are committed to working with the California Air Resources
Board to implement transportation strategies that will help reduce GHG emissions.
The  Caltrans’  Climate  Action  Program  was  developed  to  promote  clean  and  energy
efficient  transportation  and  provide  guidance  for  incorporating  innovative  solutions
into  its  business  operations.  Furthermore,  Governor  Arnold  Schwarzenegger’s  Stra-
tegic Growth Plan, a ten-year mobility investment program, targets a significant de-
crease  in  traffic  congestion  below  today’s  level  by  2016.  Therefore,  Caltrans’  ap-
proach to lowering fuel consumption and GHG from transportation is to:

1) Reduce  congestion  and  improve  efficiency  of  transportation  systems  through
smart  land  use,  operational  improvements,  and  Intelligent  Transportation
Systems. These are objectives of the State Strategic Growth Plan; and

2) Institutionalize energy efficiency and GHG emission reduction measures and
technology  into  planning,  project  development,  operations,  and  maintenance
of transportation facilities, fleets, buildings, and equipment.

Innovation  is  one  of  the  four  core  values  that  guide  and  shape  the  department,
and  staff  is  empowered  to  seek  creative  solutions  and  take  intelligent  risks.
Caltrans has the largest and most vigorous research division of a State DOT in the
Nation.  We  have  ongoing  studies  that  address  the  potential  impacts  of  climate
change  and  State  legislation  that  mandates  the  consideration  of  environmental  im-
pacts  in  State  decision-making  and  project  development.  We  use  innovative  tech-
nologies  for  traffic  management  systems.  We  also  have  programs  to  develop  alter-
native fuels, green pavement, fleet vehicle greening, smart parking, and many other
projects  that  help  to  improve  mobility  and  sustain  a  high  quality  of  life  in  Cali-
fornia.

Questions:
1) What  innovative  materials  and  technologies  are  currently  available  to
State  and  local  transportation  departments,  and  how  do  you  decide
which materials and technologies to use in California? Who are your re-
sources  for  information  on  technical  capabilities  and  engineering  and
design,  and  how  would  you  rate  their  technology  transfer  efforts?  How
are  new  materials  and  technologies  integrated  into  existing  transpor-
tation networks, especially across multiple regions and jurisdictions?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

Caltrans  encourages  the  use  of  innovative  solutions.  We  have  instituted  a  Green
Highway  Program  to  guide  us  in  using  environmentally  friendly  and  recycled  prod-
ucts and technologies. Caltrans’ environmentally friendly business practices include
using  innovative  materials,  waste  tires,  pavement  recycling,  office  waste  recycling,
and many other applications. Here are a few highlights from this program:

• Cold Foam Recycle—Caltrans’ Interstate 80 Cold Foam Recycle Project won
an  award  from  Green  Technology,  a  nonprofit  organization  that  works  with
federal  and  State  officials  on  environmental  solutions.  The  project  was  the
first  in  California  and  the  United  States  to  recycle  in-place  materials  on  a
high-speed,  high-traffic  volume  roadway  (Traffic  counts  range  from  30,000  to
60,000 vehicles/day).
The innovative aspect of the project was three-fold: First, the recycling meth-
odology  used  100  percent  of  the  existing  in-place  asphalt  concrete  on  a  high-
volume,  high-speed  interstate.  This  was  done  in  a  single  pass,  allowing  for
the  free  flow  of  traffic  through  the  construction  zone.  This  method  reduced
construction zone congestion and idling motors at traffic standstills, therefore
lowering  non-construction  vehicle  emissions.  Second,  trucks  were  not  needed
to  haul  away  the  existing  milled  asphalt  concrete  or  bring  in  new  replace-
ment  hot  mix  asphalt.  Third,  the  modern  computer-driven  all-in-one  recycler
eliminated  the  need  for  the  following  three  high-horsepower  diesel  engines:
paver,  pickup  machine  and  breakdown  roller.  This  saved  additional  fuel  and
further  reduced  the  emissions  as  compared  to  conventional  construction
methodology.  The  Cold  Foam  technology  has  been  used  successfully  in  over
10 projects statewide, and more projects are anticipated in 2008/2009.

• Waste Tires—Caltrans has established a variety of uses for waste tire prod-
ucts. They include rubberized asphalt concrete as a pavement alternative and
shredded waste tires, which are used as lightweight fill for embankments.

• Environmentally  Friendly  Cement—Carbon  dioxide  (CO2)  is  a  major  by-
product  in  the  production  of  cement  (0.86  ton  of  CO2 per  ton  of  cement  in
California,  where  cement  plants  are  among  the  most  efficient  in  the  world).
California’s production of cement accounts for two percent (two percent) of the
state’s  total  CO2 emission.  Caltrans,  the  Air  Resources  Board,  the  California
Environmental Protection Agency, and our concrete industry are international
leaders in efforts to reduce GHG from cement production and concrete cement
usage.  Our  goal  is  to  stretch  the  amount  of  cement  used  in  concrete  and  to
reduce  the  energy  necessary  for  production.  We  are  focused  on  concrete  that
meets  our  materials  quality  requirements  as  we  strive  to  meet  the  goals  of
State statue AB 32 (similar to the Kyoto Treaty).
Specifically, Caltrans and our industry have been looking into ways to reduce
the amount of carbon in concrete mixes by using more supplementary cemen-
titious  materials  (SCM)  and  by  limiting  the  amount  of  cement  in  concrete
mixes. For example, we are reducing the amount of cement in the mix by al-
lowing  up  to  five  percent  (limestone  and  25  percent  fly  ash.  The  percent  of
fly  ash  may  be  increased  to  50  percent.  Last  year  Caltrans  won  an  award
from  the  EPA  for  building  the  new  San  Francisco  Oakland  Bay  Bridge  with
concrete that had 50 percent of the cement replaced with SCM. We are inves-
tigating  using  different  fuels  to  produce  cement  so  there  are  less  GHG  emis-
sions.
Caltrans is also studying the adoption of a GHG emission standard to assure
that  cement  imported  to  California  has  at  most  the  same  cement  intensity
(so  that  it  is  as  GHG  friendly)  as  cement  produced  in  California.  To  accom-
plish  this  objective,  we  are  looking  into  the  amount  of  GHG  from  shipping
material by different modes of transportation including ship, train and truck.
• Caltrans  Vehicle  Fleet  Greening  Program—This  program  began  as  a
five-year  plan  in  August  2000  to  reduce  emissions  from  the  Caltrans  fleet,
ahead of future regulations, and set an example for the use of emerging, clean
air  technologies.  Today,  Caltrans  continues  to  promote  an  efficient  fleet  mix
and use of efficient, low emission vehicles to reduce our use of petroleum, and
our emissions of air pollutants and greenhouse gases. Through a combination
of  regulatory  compliance,  State  purchasing  policies,  and  innovative  dem-
onstrations,  we  have  implemented  hybrid  passenger  vehicles;  solar-powered
equipment;  propane-fueled  vehicles;  low  dust  street  sweepers,  diesel  particu-
late  filters  on  heavy-duty,  diesel-powered  vehicles;  hydrogen  demonstration

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

vehicles;  and  an  E–85  fuel  ethanol  demonstration  project.  We  are  also  pio-
neers in the use of low-sulfur diesel and bio-diesel in our vehicle fleet.

• California  Hydrogen  Highway  Network  (CaH2Net)—Created  as  part  of
Executive Order S–7–04 issued by Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger, the mis-
sion  of  the  program  is  to  assure  that  infrastructure  is  in  place  to  enable  fuel
cells and other hydrogen vehicle technologies to be used by consumers as they
reach  commercial  readiness.  Working  in  partnership  with  other  components
of  California’s  environmental  and  energy  programs,  the  CaH2Net  can  help
achieve  more  stable  and  sustainable  energy  usage,  and  increase  the  number
of  zero  emission  vehicles  (ZEVs)  on  California’s  roads.  We  are  also  currently
installing  a  hydrogen  fuelling  facility  in  one  of  our  equipment  shops  in  the
Los Angeles area.

• Long-life  Pavement  Rehabilitation  Strategies  (LLPRS)—The  goal  is  to
rebuild high volume urban freeways with pavements that are designed to last
more  than  thirty  years  with  minimal  maintenance.  The  program  will  reduce
the  need  for  future  repair  projects  and  ultimately  save  public  resources  and
help  preserve  the  environment  for  future  generations  of  road  users.  LLPRS
candidate  projects  were  selected  from  among  highways  that  experience  min-
imum  volume  demands  of  150,000  Average  Daily  Traffic  or  15,000  Average
Daily  Truck  Traffic,  and  that  have  poor  structural  pavement  condition  and
ride  quality.  Most  LLPRS  candidate  sections  are  Portland  cement  concrete
pavements on interstate freeways in urban networks, 80 percent of which are
within  the  Los  Angeles  Basin,  and  15  percent  of  which  are  in  the  San  Fran-
cisco  Bay  Area.  Pilot  projects  include  the  I–10  concrete  rehabilitation  in  Po-
mona, I–710 asphalt concrete rehabilitation in Long Beach, and I–15 concrete
rehabilitation in Devore.

• Rapid  Rehab:  Construction  Analysis  for  Pavement  Rehabilitation
Strategies  (CA4PRS)—By  reducing  highway  construction  time  and  its  im-
pact  on  traffic,  CA4PRS  is  a  schedule  and  traffic  analysis  tool  that  helps  de-
signers  select  effective,  economical  rehabilitation  strategies.  The  software’s
scheduling  module  estimates  highway  project  duration,  incorporating  alter-
native strategies for pavement designs, lane-closure tactics, and contractor lo-
gistics. On the I–15 Devore reconstruction project, CA4PRS software justified
implementing the one-roadbed continuous (24/7) closure scenario, which saved
$6  million  in  construction  costs  and  $2  million  in  road  user  delay  costs.  The
project was completed in 18 days by closing down one direction of traffic and
reconstructing  the  freeway.  This  project  would  normally  have  taken  10
months  to  complete  with  nighttime  closures.  CA4PRS  is  funded  through  a
Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) pooled-fund, multi-state consortium
(California,  Minnesota,  Texas,  and  Washington),  CA4PRS  was  developed  by
the  University  of  California  Pavement  Research  Center  through  the  UC–
Berkeley  Institute  of  Transportation  Studies.  FHWA  formally  endorsed
CA4PRS  as  a  ‘‘Priority,  Market-Ready  Technologies  and  Innovations’’  product
in 2008 for nationwide deployment. Over 700 people have been trained on the
use of this software product.

• Caltrans  Stormwater  Management  Program—The  program  received  a
Green  Technology  Leadership  Award  in  the  transportation  category  for  its
pioneering  integrated  approach  to  incorporate  protection  and  treatment  of
stormwater.  The  approach  starts  with  project  planning,  design  and  construc-
tion,  and  includes  ongoing  efforts  in  operations  and  roadside  maintenance.
Through  the  corporate  business  cycle,  practices  are  continually  being  evalu-
ated and improved.

Our resources for information on technical capabilities and engineering come from
many  areas,  including  academia,  Federal,  State  and  local  governments,  private  in-
dustry, and from other nations. Caltrans has established excellent working partner-
ships with our research community. Here are some of the partners we work closely
with:

University of California, Davis,

• Advanced  Highway  Maintenance  and  Construction  Technology  (AHMCT),
• California  Partners  for  Advanced  Transit  and  Highways  (PATH),  University
• California Center for Innovative Transportation (CCIT)—As part of the Insti-
tute of Transportation Studies at UC–Berkeley, (Its focus is technology trans-
fer efforts),

of California, Berkeley,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

• Partnered Pavement Research Center—UC–Berkeley and UC–Davis,
• Western  Transportation  Institute  (WTI),  Montana  State  University-Bozeman
• University Transportation Centers:

(MSU),

Æ The  University  of  California  Transportation  Center  (UCTC)  at  UC–

Berkeley,

Æ The  Mineta  Transportation  Institute  at  California  State  University,  San

Jose,

Æ The  METRANS  University  Transportation  Center  at  the  University  of

Southern California,

Æ The  Sustainable  Transportation  Center  at  the  University  of  California,

Davis,

Æ The  Leonard  University  Transportation  Center  at  California  State  Uni-

versity, San Bernardino,

• U.S.  Department  of  Transportation,  including  the  FHWA,  the  Federal  Tran-
sit,  Administration  (FTA),  and  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Administration
(FMCSA),

• Transportation Research Board (TRB),
• American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials
• International Partners:

(AASHTO), and

Æ France—Mobility Research,
Æ Denmark—Pavement Research,
Æ Japan/Taiwan—Seismic Research,
Æ Holland—Sustainable Transportation Research,

Caltrans is committed to the research and timely deployment of new and innova-
tive materials and technologies, which includes the development of policies that pro-
mote  sustainability  and  reduce  energy  consumption  and  impacts  to  the  environ-
ment.  At  the  same  time,  there  are  industry  standards  that  we  must  follow  to  be
in  compliance  with  federal  and  State  regulations  for  types  of  materials  used,  con-
struction  standards,  and  the  like.  These  policies  support  our  commitment  to  safety
and  reliability  of  the  State  transportation  system.  For  example,  in  our  pavement
unit,  a  Pavement  Standards  Team  (PST)  evaluates  pavement  design,  construction,
and  maintenance  practices  and  procedures  and,  as  appropriate,  develops  standard
special  provisions  in  a  collaborative  manner  within  Caltrans  and  with  FHWA  and
industry associations. Many times, when changes are deemed necessary or when in-
novative changes need to be evaluated, pilot programs are initiated. Pilot programs
typically require the construction of pilot projects to evaluate the proposed changes;
especially, if the change involves an improved maintenance or construction practice,
validating enhancements to pavement performance and/or life; and changes in mate-
rial  properties  or  sampling  and  testing.  Pilot  programs  and  pilot  projects  require
prior approval from PST before they are initiated.
2) What  are  the  biggest  impediments  to  the  use  of  new  infrastructure-re-
lated  materials  and  technologies?  How  can  the  Federal  Government,
academia,  and  industry  contribute  to  overcoming  these  barriers?  What
role  do  technology  demonstration  projects  play,  and  has  California  un-
dertaken  any  specific  demonstration  projects?  How  are  the  results  of
these demonstrations disseminated?
Based  on  our  extensive  experience  with  transportation  innovation,  here  are  some
of  the  primary  impediments  to  the  use  of  new  infrastructure-related  materials  and
technologies:

property, and indemnification,

• Insufficient resources for implementation,
• Resistance to change at multiple levels within the implementing agency,
• Restrictive  legal  requirements,  such  as  ownership  and  use  of  intellectual
• Difficulty  in  operating  and  maintaining  cutting-edge  technologies  (lack  of
• Procurement  challenges  due  to  non-competitive  bid  (sole  source)  situations
• Lack of executive-level sponsorship within the implementing agency,

with technologies that are only available from one source,

workforce with the necessary job skills),

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

• Challenges  with  getting  federal  approval  to  use  new  materials  and  tech-
nologies  when  they  have  not  been  educated  on  them  (‘‘Public  Interest  Find-
ing’’ process),

• Lack  of  performance  requirements  and  guidelines  for  implementing  the  new

idea,

• Risk-averse cultures within the implementing agency, and
• Lack of clear performance measures that determine success.

Here are some of the ways to overcome these barriers to the use of new infrastruc-

ture-related materials and technologies:

• Develop products that meet the user’s needs,
• Strengthen management commitment to using the product,
• Provide  funding  to  enable  State  DOTs  to  meet  with  cutting-edge  technology

leaders to share experiences and to learn from them,

• Develop products with user participation,
• Provide sufficient resources to fund complete development of the product, and
• Use pilot projects to demonstrate the benefits of the product.

The  Federal  Government  can  help  by  providing  national  leadership,  serving  as  a
repository  for  information  on  best  practices,  and  providing  the  higher  level  of  re-
sources that are needed for taking a product from research to deployment. Academia
is our primary partner for performing research on new infrastructure-related mate-
rials and technologies. We then work with the private sector to commercialize these
products so they Caltrans and others can use them.

Technology demonstration projects play a key role in addressing the impediments
to  the  use  of  new  infrastructure-related  materials  and  technologies.  For  example,
they  enable  an  implementing  agency  to  deploy  a  new  product  on  a  limited  scale  to
measure  and  evaluate  its  benefits.  If  the  results  of  the  evaluation  are  promising,
it  becomes  much  easier  for  the  agency  to  overcome  institutional  resistance  to
change,  to  gain  executive-level  support,  and  to  address  a  risk-averse  culture.  An-
other  key  aspect  in  the  success  of  a  technology  demonstration  project  is  to  include
the  end-user  of  the  product  in  its  development  and  execution.  When  users  play  an
active  role  in  the  project,  they  can  become  a  champion  for  it  among  their  peers,
making it easier to overcome resistance to change.

As a leader in the field of transportation innovation, Caltrans has participated in
many  technology  demonstration  projects.  Here  are  a  few  of  the  notable  examples:
• Vehicle-Infrastructure  Integration  (VII)—Caltrans  is  working  with  ten
other State DOTs, members of the auto industry, and the U.S. DOT in a coop-
erative effort whose outcome will be a new approach to transportation, where-
by auto manufacturers and transportation agencies would build systems that
communicate wirelessly with one another to:

1. Enable  the  implementation  of  cooperative  safety  features  that  prevent

vehicle crashes,

2. Provide unprecedented levels of reliable traveler information, and
3. Give  transportation  managers  full  knowledge  of  the  real-time  operating

conditions on the Nation’s roadway network.

• SAFE TRIP–21—Caltrans is working with the U.S. DOT on a program close-
ly  related  to  VII.  Instead  of  emphasizing  communications  equipment  that  is
deeply embedded within a car, it explores the use of consumer mobile devices,
such  as  cell  phones  that  drivers  typically  carry  with  them  when  they  travel,
as the communications medium for collecting traffic data from cars and send-
ing  traveler  information  to  drivers.  Our  project  is  a  successful  public-private
partnership  that  includes  several  industry  giants,  such  as  Nokia,  NAVTEQ,
and Nissan.

• Cooperative  Intersection  Collision  Avoidance  Systems—This  project  is
also closely related to VII. It uses the wireless communications technology de-
veloped  under  VII  to  enable  an  application  that  warns  distracted  or  inatten-
tive drivers before they run a red light, thereby avoiding many of the serious
crashes that occur at intersections.

• On-board  Driver  Monitoring  System—Caltrans  is  working  with  the  Fed-
eral Motor Carrier Safety Administration on this project to develop equipment
that  monitors  the  performance  of  commercial  truck  drivers  and  warns  them

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

of  unsafe  driver  behavior.  It  can  also  detect  the  onset  of  drowsiness  and  ad-
vise the driver to take a break.

• Travel  Times  on  Changeable  Message  Signs  (CMS)—This  project  pro-
vides  information  on  current  traffic  conditions  to  drivers  while  they  are  com-
muting.  Trip  time  is  the  most  practical  information  that  commuters  can  use
to assess traffic and adjust their routes. The CMS displays information about
downstream corridor delays, traffic incidents, and estimated travel times. Dis-
playing  accurate  travel  times  on  CMS  helps  commuters  assess  traffic,  allevi-
ates driver stress, and allows drivers to make better route decisions. Knowing
the  driving  times  to  popular  destinations,  travelers  may  choose  a  less-con-
gested route or a different form of transportation.

• Integrated  Corridor  Management—Caltrans  is  working  with  the  FHWA
and  two  regional  transportation  agencies  (San  Francisco  and  San  Diego)  on
ways to integrate both operations and traveler information for different roads
(arterials and highways) and different modes (cars, commercial trucks, buses,
and  commuter  rail)  along  strategic  transportation  corridors.  When  imple-
mented,  travelers  can  make  more  efficient  decisions  on  mode  and  route
choice, saving them time and money.

• System-Wide  Adaptive  Ramp  Metering  (SWARM)—Along  Interstate  210
in the Los Angeles Region, Caltrans has implemented a ramp metering algo-
rithm  that  substantially  reduces  the  amount  of  traffic  congestion  along  the
corridor.  Based  on  the  success  of  this  demonstration,  the  SWARM  algorithm
will be implemented along several other strategic corridors in the near future.
• Caltrans Automated Warning System (CAWS)—This technology has been
deployed  in  the  Central  Valley  of  California  to  detect  and  automatically  in-
form  drivers  of  foggy  and  other  reduced  visibility  conditions.  It  is  now  being
expanded to other regions that are prone to foggy conditions.

• Electronic Toll Collection (ETC)—The California State Legislature passed
a  law  requiring  standardization  of  the  technologies  for  electronic  toll  collec-
tion,  and  Caltrans  and  its  regional  partners  have  implemented  this  tech-
nology on toll bridges and toll roads throughout California. ETC enables tolls
to  be  collected  without  requiring  the  driver  to  wait  in  line  to  pay  a  toll  col-
lector, reducing the exhaust emissions created by idling vehicles.

• Traffic Signal Synchronization—Caltrans  is  working  with  the  City  of  Los
Angeles’  Department  of  Transportation  to  coordinate  and  synchronize  traffic
signals  on  city  streets  with  those  on  adjacent  State  highway  routes.  This  ef-
fort  will  result  in  a  substantial  reduction  in  traffic  delay  for  users  of  both
roadways.

• Light  Emitting  Diode  (LED)  Traffic  Signals—Caltrans  was  one  of  the
first public agencies to adopt LED technology for traffic signal lights, instead
of the traditional incandescent light fixtures. This change results in a consid-
erable reduction in electric power usage, in addition to the longer life of LED
technology and their ability to operate with battery-backup during power out-
ages.

• Bus Forward Collision Warning Systems—Caltrans worked with the San
Mateo  Transit  District  to  develop  and  implement  a  system  to  warn  bus  driv-
ers  of  possible  dangers  ahead  in  time  for  them  to  avoid  a  crash.  This  tech-
nology  is  now  available  to  all  transit  operators  as  an  option  when  they  pur-
chase a new transit bus.

• Bus  Rapid  Transit—This  project  developed  methods  for  operating  buses  on
priority  right-of-way  to  make  bus  transit  perform  like  rubber-tired  light-rail
systems, but with the flexibility to operate on existing roadways. Some of the
technologies  used  include  bus  precision  docking,  automated  lane-guidance,
and adaptive transit signal priority.

• Efficient  Deployment  of  Advanced  Public  Transportation  Systems
(EDAPTS)—Caltrans  worked  with  a  small  rural  transit  district  in  San  Luis
Obispo  to  develop  technologies  that  reduce  life  cycle  costs,  promote  easy  sys-
tem  expansion,  and  contain  adjustable  levels  of  complexity  and  function.
EDAPTS  uses  a  modular  approach  characterized  by  common  connections,
standard  communications  interfaces,  and  off-the-shelf  hardware  coupled  with
open-source software. EDAPTS will be shared with other similar transit agen-
cies to improve their operations.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

• Shakecast—After  an  earthquake,  this  software  decision  support  tool  uses
Google Earth maps and data available from multiple sources to estimate and
prioritize  the  likelihood  of  damage  to  transportation  infrastructure  in  the  vi-
cinity  of  the  earthquake.  The  tool  enables  Caltrans  to  send  its  inspection
crews  to  check  out  the  structures  most  likely  to  have  been  damaged  first,  so
that they can be re-opened as quickly as possible.

• National  Automated  Highway  Systems  Consortium—Caltrans  was  a
core  member  of  this  consortium  that  was  tasked  with  developing  and  dem-
onstrating  automated  highways,  where  cars  would  travel  under  the  control
(steering,  throttle,  and  brakes)  of  computers  embedded  in  the  car,  instead  of
being operated by a driver. The objective of the project was to improve safety,
since  human  drivers  cause  a  large  percentage  of  vehicle  crashes,  and  to  in-
crease  mobility,  since  more  vehicles  can  be  safely  packed  onto  the  existing
roadway if humans are not driving them. Despite a successful demonstration
in  San  Diego  in  1997,  the  USDOT  terminated  funding  for  the  project  due  to
changing priorities.

There are many ways to disseminate the results from a technology demonstration
project.  At  a  minimum,  the  sponsors  of  these  projects  require  that  a  final  report  is
prepared,  delivered,  and  circulated  to  other  states.  In  many  cases,  however,
Caltrans  does  much  more  to  spread  the  word  on  successful  projects.  All  of  our  re-
search reports are available on our web site, which also includes contact information
for key staff that have additional knowledge about the project. They are also acces-
sible  in  the  TRB  Transportation  Research  Information  System.  We  have  also  con-
ducted  video  teleconferences  on  select  projects  using  the  FHWA’s  facilities  to  reach
out to our colleagues in other states. We are currently experimenting with Webinars
as  an  additional  mechanism  for  sharing  the  results  of  our  work.  Caltrans  has  used
their video conference facilities to host the ‘‘research connection’’ where researchers
provide  their  research  findings  directly  to  Caltrans  practitioners.  UCTC  and  PATH
conduct an annual conference to share research results with Caltrans and local gov-
ernment  agencies.  Finally,  much  of  our  research  is  conducted  in  partnership  with
university  research  centers,  and  we  encourage  the  academic  researchers  to  write
and  publish  papers  documenting  their  work  for  industry-related  events,  such  as
TRB’s Annual Meeting.
3) What  are  your  priorities  for  research  and  development  of  new  tech-
nologies?  Is  the  research  community  doing  an  adequate  job  of  respond-
ing to the short and long-term needs identified by the user community?
Caltrans  ties  its  research  to  the  Department’s  Strategic  Goals  through  the  Stra-

tegic Research Plan. The Strategic Goals are:

• Safety—Provide the safest transportation system in the Nation for users and

workers.

• Mobility—Maximize transportation system performance and accessibility.
• Delivery—Efficiently deliver quality transportation projects and services.
• Stewardship—Preserve and enhance California’s resources and assets.
• Service—Promote quality service through an excellent workforce.

The research priorities are also tied to the Strategic Growth Plan (SGP) unveiled
by Governor Schwarzenegger in January 2006. Central to this plan was a proposed
10-year investment of $222 billion into the state’s infrastructure including $107 bil-
lion in transportation investment. Caltrans developed a ‘‘Strategic Growth Plan Pyr-
amid’’  as  a  dynamic  illustration  of  the  transportation  elements  of  the  State  SGP:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

As  part  of  the  Strategic  Research  Plan,  a  list  of  strategic  research  questions  was
developed  to  guide  prioritization  and  selection  of  transportation  research  projects
and  ensure  that  all  research  projects  supported  by  Caltrans  are  in  alignment  with
Caltrans’ Mission, Goals, and Objectives.

1. Data—How  can  we  improve/enhance  data  collection  and  interpretation

across modes?

2. Travel  Demand  Management  (Real-Time)—What  are  the  most  effective

real-time strategies to influence travel demand?

3. Travel  Demand  Management  (System  Elements)—What  transportation
system  elements  and  land  use  options  are  most  effective  in  reducing  travel
demand by enhancing choices?

4. Integrated  Corridor  Management—How  can  we  optimize  movement

through a corridor?

5. Goods  Movement—How  can  we  improve  goods  movement  throughout  the
State  to  generate  jobs,  increase  mobility  and  relieve  traffic  congestion,  im-
prove  air  quality  and  protect  public  health,  enhance  public  and  port  safety
and improve California’s quality of life?

6. Design/Construction—What  design  features  and  construction  standards

can be utilized to improve highway safety?

7. Proactive Safety—What can Caltrans do to mitigate collisions?
8. Climate  Change—How  can  Strategic  Growth  Planning  be  advanced

through addressing climate change adaptations and mitigations?

9. Transportation  Infrastructure  (e.g.,  Pavement,  Structures,  Maintenance
Stations,  Office  Buildings,  and  others  not  listed)—How  can  we  optimize  the
performance of our transportation infrastructure?

Research roadmaps were developed to identify all research projects and activities
needed  over  time  and  their  expected  research  outcomes.  Research  roadmaps  facili-
tate programming research activities and provide guidance to partnering with other
organizations with common research needs.

A Research and Deployment Steering Committee (RDSC) comprised of Deputy Di-
rectors  and  District  Directors  sets  the  Department-wide  research  priorities.  The
RDSC  approves  all  research  proposals  and  projects  included  in  the  program.  Re-
search  projects  are  selected  and  programmed  annually,  using  an  integrated  RFP
(Request  For  Proposals)  process.  A  short  turn-around  (quarterly)  process  responds
to projects that require approval outside the annual cycle.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

Caltrans  research  project  selection  process  emphasizes  customer  participation
throughout  the  research  process  and  customer  ownership  of  the  research  products.
In  addition  to  the  RDSC,  research  committees  were  established  in  various  levels  to
get  the  customers  involved  in  the  research  selection,  management,  and  deployment
process.

Caltrans  has  established  excellent  working  partnerships  with  the  research  com-
munity.  In  keeping  with  its  Strategic  Plan,  Caltrans  works  with  its  research  part-
ners  to  create  deployable  research  products.  This  applied-research  approach  results
in  a  safer,  more  efficient  and  better-built  transportation  system  that  serves  the
short-  and  long-term  needs  of  the  traveling  public.  Four  ways  that  Caltrans  part-
ners with the research community are:

• The Research and Technology Advisory Panel Executive Committee,
• University-Contracted Research,
• The University Transportation Centers (UTCs), and
• Educational opportunities.

The  Research  and  Technology  Advisory  Panel  Executive  Committee  (RTAP)  is  an
external academic advisory committee created by Caltrans, in cooperation with lead-
ership  at  the  California  Business,  Transportation  and  Housing  Agency.  This  com-
mittee is comprised of influential members of the academic research community and
key  State  decision-makers.  The  RTAP  advises  Caltrans  on  critical  long-term  trans-
portation research needs and helps to identify and evaluate critical long-term trends
and research needs the department might otherwise overlook.

Caltrans  contracts  with  universities  for  the  bulk  of  its  research.  Much  of  this  re-
search is conducted through partnerships with university-based research institutes.
These institutes include the following:

• Advanced  Highway  Maintenance  and  Construction  Technology  (AHMCT)—
This  partnership  with  University  of  California,  Davis,  develops  work  zone
concept  vehicles  and  equipment  for  Caltrans.  So  far,  16  concept  vehicles  and
18 pieces of equipment or software have been developed.
• California  Partners  for  Advanced  Transit  and  Highways  (PATH)—This  part-
nership  with  University  of  California,  Berkeley,  emphasizes  research  in  new
technologies  that  offer  potentially  large  improvements  in  traffic  operations,
transportation safety, transportation policy, and transit operations.
• California Center for Innovative Transportation (CCIT)—As part of the Insti-
tute  of  Transportation  Studies  at  UC–Berkeley,  this  organization’s  goal  is  to
‘‘accelerate  the  implementation  of  research  results  and  the  deployment  of
technical  solutions  by  practitioners  to  enable  a  safer,  cleaner  and  more  effi-
cient surface transportation system.’’
• Partnered  Pavement  Research  Center—The  key  objectives  of  this  research
group  are  to  optimize  pavement  performance,  lower  life  cycle  cost,  increase
service  life,  and  increase  highway  safety  through  smoother  pavement  and
more efficient maintenance and construction.
• Western  Transportation  Institute  (WTI)—Established  by  the  Montana  and
California Departments of Transportation in cooperation with Montana State
University–Bozeman, this UTC focuses on ‘‘real transportation challenges fac-
ing rural America.’’

Caltrans maintains a close relationship with California’s federally funded Univer-
sity  Transportation  Centers,  as  well  as  those  from  other  states.  The  five  California
UTCs are:

San Jose,

• The University of California Transportation Center at UC–Berkeley,
• The  Mineta  Transportation  Institute  (MTI)  at  California  State  University,
• The METRANS University Transportation Center at the University of South-
• The Sustainable Transportation Center at the University of California, Davis,
• The Leonard University Transportation Center at California State University,

ern California,

and

San Bernardino.

Again,  this  partnership  ensures  that  the  research  we  support  provides  products

that are more practical than theoretical.

Last  but  not  least,  Caltrans  supports  educational  opportunities  for  graduate  stu-
dents  to  develop  advanced  skills  that  focus  on  the  most  significant  ‘‘real-world’’

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

transportation issues and problems. By partnering with the UTCs and other univer-
sity  researcher  programs,  Caltrans  recognizes  the  long-term  benefits  of  supporting
high  quality  education  and  graduate  training  for  transportation  professionals  and
future  transportation  researchers.  Garrett  Morgan  competition  is  held  annually
through MTI to encourage young middle school students to pursue science and engi-
neering degrees.

In all of the above examples, Caltrans strives to nurture a dynamic ongoing rela-
tionship  with  the  transportation  research  community  to  be  a  catalyst  for  applied
transportation solutions. This helps to ensure that its strategic research program is
continually responsive to the changing transportation demands of California citizens
and of the Nation.

Since  much  of  our  research  has  common  interest  across  the  country,  Caltrans  is
very  active  in  research  and  the  national  level.  We  conduct  partnered  research  with
other  states  and  the  FHWA  through  the  FHWA  Pooled  Fund  Program.  We  have  a
long  history  of  partnered  research  with  the  FHWA  and  FTA  through  the  ITS  Pro-
gram and the Turner-Fairbank Highway Research Center. Caltrans pays special at-
tention to research conducted the TRB, especially its cooperative research programs
and the Strategic Highway Research Program (SHRP 2).

Research and development of innovative methods and technologies can contribute
significantly  to  the  sustainability  of  highway  transportation.  The  second  Strategic
Highway  Research  Program,  authorized  by  Congress  in  SAFETEA–LU,  is  address-
ing  the  sustainability  of  the  highway  transportation  system  from  several  perspec-
tives.  The  ‘‘Capacity’’  portion  of  SHRP  2  is  developing  a  new  approach  to  transpor-
tation planning and development of highway projects. This approach, called the Col-
laborative  Decision-Making  Framework  (CDMF),  will  more  effectively  integrate  en-
gineering, economic, social, and environmental considerations into highway planning
and development. The research focuses both on the institutional and process aspects
and  on  developing  more  robust  economic  inputs  and  scientific  data  regarding  envi-
ronmental  impacts.  Earlier  stages  of  the  CDMF  focus  on  assessing  the  suitability
of different strategies (including different transportation modes) for addressing local
needs. Later stages focus on improving the environmental, social, and economic im-
pacts of new highway capacity. Specific projects focus on greenhouse gases, ecology,
conservation, smart growth, economic impacts, and highway operations.

The  ‘‘Renewal’’  portion  of  SHRP  2  is  focused  on  renewing  aging  infrastructure
more rapidly, with less disruption to users, and producing longer-lived facilities that
will require less maintenance and cause less user disruption in the future. This re-
search is addressing an array of tactics for speeding up delivery of highway renewal
projects: performing more work off site and bringing completed portions of the facili-
ties  (modular  bridges  or  pavements)  to  the  site  for  quick  installation;  rapid  tech-
niques for work that must be completed on-site; non-destructive testing and evalua-
tion technologies; and improved communication and collaboration methods to reduce
the  delays  that  arise  when  railroads  and  utilities  cross  or  abut  highway  rights-of-
way.  Specific  research  projects  address  the  use  of  recycled  materials  in  rapid  high-
way renewal, development of performance specifications to promote use of these and
other materials, and techniques for encouraging innovation through better allocation
and mitigation of risks.

The ‘‘Reliability’’ portion of SHRP 2 addresses congestion caused by non-recurring
events such as crashes, work zones, inclement weather, and special events. Approxi-
mately half of highway delay is due to non-recurring events; this delay leads to sig-
nificant waste of fuel and contributes to poor air quality. SHRP 2 research address-
es  data  needs  and  performance  measures  for  improved  travel  time  reliability;  insti-
tutional  structures  and  training  for  improving  highway  operations  related  to  reli-
ability and incident management; innovative approaches for the future; and integra-
tion of reliability factors into highway programming, planning, and design processes.
This last set of projects will produce the scientific and technical material needed to
modify  planning  models  and  design  standards  to  reflect  the  impacts  of  better  high-
way operations, specifically in terms in incident management and other ways of im-
proving travel time reliability. The planning portion of the work will be carried out
in concert with the SHRP 2 Capacity work described above.

SHRP  2  also  has  a  significant  focus  on  highway  safety.  SHRP  2  will  study  the
interaction  among  driver  behavior,  vehicle  and  roadway  characteristics,  and  envi-
ronment to understand safety risk factors, identify crash surrogates, and provide the
basis for improved safety countermeasures. This ‘‘naturalistic driving study’’ will in-
volve  instrumenting  vehicles  of  4,000  volunteers  in  several  areas  of  the  country.
While primarily focused on safety, the data gathered in this study show promise for
other applications. SHRP 2 will soon start a project to look at the feasibility of using
these  data  to  study  driver  behavior  from  an  operational  point  of  view  to  develop
more efficient designs and operational strategies.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

SHRP 2 research will be completed over the next few years and be ready for field
demonstrations. The ultimate success of this research, in terms of improved environ-
mental,  social,  and  economic  sustainability  of  highway  transportation,  will  depend
on  widespread  deployment.  Funding  to  support  SHRP  2  implementation  activities
in  the  next  authorization  will  bring  the  promise  of  this  research  to  fruition.  Addi-
tional  information  on  SHRP  2  can  be  found  on  the  programs  web  page:  http://
www.trb.org/shrp2/.

In conclusion, Caltrans has the need for research to solve our transportation prob-
lems, the plans and the research projects to develop solutions, and the partnerships
to  leverage  resources  and  expertise.  We  are  active  locally,  nationally,  and  inter-
nationally as leaders in the pursuit of safer, more efficient, and ‘‘greener’’ transpor-
tation systems.

BIOGRAPHY FOR RANDELL H. IWASAKI

Randell  ‘‘Randy’’  Iwasaki  is  the  Chief  Deputy  Director  of  the  California  Depart-

ment of Transportation (Caltrans).

Iwasaki  manages  the  day-to-day  operation  of  the  Department,  including  an  oper-

ating budget of $14 billion and almost 23,000 employees.

A  licensed  civil  engineer,  Iwasaki  has  been  with  Caltrans  for  almost  25  years

serving in a number of high profile engineering and management positions.

From  July  2004  to  November  2004,  Iwasaki  was  appointed  as  the  Department’s
Interim Director where he was responsible for California’s State transportation sys-
tem, including more than 50,000 lane miles of State highways stretching from Mex-
ico to Oregon and from the Pacific Ocean to Nevada and Arizona.

During his Caltrans career, Iwasaki has spearheaded a number of transportation
engineering innovations ill California including the use of old tires in rubberized as-
phalt,  the  installation  of  LED  red  lights  saving  the  State  taxpayers  more  than  $2
million  a  year  in  power  costs,  and  conversion  of  the  Caltrans  equipment  fleet  to
clean burning fuels.

Iwasaki also serves on a number of national transportation panels. The panels in-
clude  co-chairing  an  effort  to  encourage  development  and  application  of  quiet  pave-
ment  technologies  to  reduce  highway  noise  in  the  United  States.  He  is  also  the
Technology  Coordinating  Committee  Chair  for  the  renewal  portion  of  the  Strategic
Highway  Research  Program  and  most  recently  appointed  the  Chairman  of  ITS
America.

Iwasaki  earned  his  Bachelor’s  degree  in  Engineering  from  California  Polytechnic
State  University,  San  Luis  Obispo,  and  a  Master’s  in  Engineering  from  California
State University, Fresno.

Mr. WILSON. Thank you, Mr. Iwasaki.
The Chair now recognizes Dr. Bertini.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  ROBERT  L.  BERTINI,  P.E.,  DIRECTOR,  OR-
EGON  TRANSPORTATION  RESEARCH  AND  EDUCATION  CON-
SORTIUM 
(OTREC);  ASSOCIATE  PROFESSOR,  PORTLAND
STATE UNIVERSITY
Dr. BERTINI. Thank you very much, Representative Wilson. Good
morning, Chairman Wu and Members of the Subcommittee. Thank
you for this opportunity.

Approximately two-thirds of our ongoing research at OTREC ad-
dresses  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  by  aiming  to  improve
the operation of the multi-modal transportation system. Increasing
efficiency means improving safety, reducing congestion and encour-
aging more energy-efficient travel. When the total amount of travel
time  or  number  of  trips  is  reduced,  there  is  always  an  accom-
panying benefit in reduced fuel consumption, energy use, emissions
and  other  externalities  such  as  noise,  accident  exposure  and  con-
tribution  to  urban  heat  islands.  Public  transit  also  benefits  by  re-
duced  travel  times  and  increased  reliability.  Projects  from  the  In-
telligent Transportation Systems, or ITS, toolbox include new pric-
ing  and  tolling  strategies,  integrated  corridor  management,  inci-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

dent management, ramp metering, measuring arterial performance
and  improved  traffic  signal  coordination  using  adaptive  systems.
Also  at  OTREC,  a  joint  project  with  the  University  of  Minnesota
is examining how drivers value travel time reliability, which is im-
portant for implementing advanced traveler information systems.

How  do  we  determine  the  potential  environmental  impact  of  a
given  technology?  Typically,  an  evaluation  will  include  standard
performance  metrics  such  as  travel  time  and  reliability,  emissions
and  noise,  number  of  trips,  mode  choice,  and  fuel  and  energy  con-
sumption.  We  use  national  resources  such  as  the  U.S.  DOT’s  ITS
benefits  database  and  the  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  De-
ployment  Analysis  System,  or  ITAS.  For  a  successful  evaluation,
there  are  several  critical  ingredients  based  on  my  experience:
Strong  partnerships  with  transportation  agencies  and  industry,
careful  identification  of  the  problem  to  be  addressed  by  the  tech-
nology,  a  freely  available  data  source,  preferably  as  part  of  the
technology  deployment  itself,  the  ability  to  measure  performance
both  before  and  after  deployment,  early  involvement  by  the  eval-
uator,  use  of  a  test  bed  and  technology  transfer  before  and  after
and during the evaluation.

We  still  have  many  research  needs  in  order  to  improve  the  en-
ergy efficiency and sustainability of the transportation system. Our
focus  at  OTREC  is  shifting  toward  efficient  and  sustainable  oper-
ation  of  the  transportation  system,  which  requires  new  financing
systems with energy efficiency and sustainability goals——

Mr. WILSON. Dr. Bertini.
Dr. BERTINI. Yes?
Mr.  WILSON.  Sorry  to  interrupt  you  but  we  are  going  to  have  to
suspend  the  hearing  for  just  a  minute.  We  have  votes  to  do  and  I
have  got  two  minutes  to  get  over  there.  Mr.  Wu  should  be  back  in
just  a  few  minutes.  I  apologize.  I  apologize  to  everybody  but  we
need to vote. Excuse me.

[Recess.]
Chairman  WU.  It  is  somewhat  interesting  and  ironic  that  in  the
midst  of  discussing  time,  motion  and  traffic  management,  we  are
doing that sort of on a different scale, a small, minor scale such as
we  deal  with  here.  This  is  not  quite  the  equivalent  of  a  bus  going
sideways  on  a  narrow  transportation  corridor  but  let  us  just  say
that this is not uncommon but just a change in traffic flow to which
we are adjusting.

Dr.  Bertini,  I  understand—we  made  a  valiant  attempt  to  keep
the flow going and choreograph something up here on the dais. My
understanding  is  that  there  may  be  some  further  unexpected
changes or not-planned-for changes as we go. With the cooperation
of  the  Minority  Members,  my  understanding  is  that  whether  Mi-
nority Members are present or not, that we are good to go with fur-
ther  testimony  and  probably  with  some  of  the  questions,  and  we
will  just  see  what  happens  on  the  House  Floor  as  we  proceed.  My
apologies to the witnesses and the attendees. This is the process of
checks and balances that protects our liberties. An efficient govern-
ment would more effectively take away your liberties, our liberties,
so  it  is  friction  that  allows  us  to  travel,  isn’t  it?  With  that,  Dr.
Bertini, let us reset the clock a little bit and be more generous with
your time. Please proceed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

Dr.  BERTINI.  Thank  you  very  much,  Chairman  Wu.  I  was  begin-
ning  to  talk  about  our  future  research  needs  and  I  had  mentioned
the need for a new financing system with energy efficiency and sus-
tainability goals. Mr. Iwasaki talked about how we respond well to
very specific goals. I also believe we need to pursue full and aggres-
sive  implementation  of  ITS-based  congestion  management  strate-
gies including ramp metering, speed harmonization and traveler in-
formation,  in  addition,  a  robust,  high-quality  and  secure  data  col-
lection  infrastructure,  ideally  built  upon  Oregon’s  open  data  shar-
ing  philosophy  and  including  a  mix  of  public  and  private  sources.
Better management of arterials for all modes requires modern traf-
fic  signal  systems,  communications  and  data  collection,  accurate,
timely and customized traveler information. A clearinghouse for ob-
taining freight data will be needed for managing freight transport.
Green  performance  measures  that  can  be  generated  and  compared
across  different  geographic  areas  and  across  all  modes,  standard
traveler  information  graphics  to  replace  text-based  dynamic  mes-
sage signs, solving legal and institutional issues for automated en-
forcement,  and  serious  exploration  of  liability  issues  following  the
lead  of  the  European  Union  and  Japan  related  to  technology  de-
ployment.

Now,  there  are  many  challenges  impeding  the  use  of  innovative
technologies  in  transportation.  Some  examples  include  the  incom-
plete shift to an operations environment in transportation agencies,
finance and funding, human resources in a multidisciplinary world,
legacy systems and system integration, communications infrastruc-
ture,  data  quality,  reliability  and  availability,  the  need  for  collabo-
ration and the need for objective and continuing evaluation.

There are many actions that can be taken by Federal, State and
local  governments  in  order  to  break  down  barriers  to  the  applica-
tion  of  innovative  technologies.  Several  examples  include  encour-
agement  of  regional  collaboration  across  modes  and  jurisdictional
boundaries,  include  the  private  sector  and  academia,  encourage
public-private  partnerships  for  data  sharing  and  communications,
funding  and  incentives  for  green  operations,  reward  data  sharing,
continuing  education  and  mentorship  from  transportation  profes-
sionals,  as  I  mentioned  earlier,  green  performance  measurement
and evaluation, and expansion of the rural infrastructure.

Now,  regarding  technology  transfer,  industry  and  academia  play
important roles in the implementation of technology solutions, and
through collaboration such as with the UTC program under RITA’s
leadership, universities can work with transportation agencies and
industry  to  provide  unbiased,  rigorous  evaluations  that  complete
the feedback loop in the project development cycle. In the ITS field,
academia  can  play  an  important  role  in  the  collection,  storage  and
maintenance of data archives.

Now, OTREC has been in operation for about 18 months and our
technology transfer efforts have been successful so far and we hope
that  will  continue.  In  order  to  accomplish  that,  we  have  about  30
external  public  and  private  matching  partners  who  have  a  vested
interest in the success of the research that we are pursuing. Exter-
nal  partners  serve  on  our  advisory  board  and  assist  with  the  peer
review  of  our  projects.  We  believe  that  these  efforts  will  help  get
the results into the hands of those who can implement them in the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

transportation field. In addition, our educational programs are pre-
paring future transportation professionals and providing opportuni-
ties  for  working  professionals  to  seek  additional  education  and
training. Our website, publications, videos, podcasts that are avail-
able  through  iTunes,  by  the  way,  our  online  seminars,  short
courses  and  conferences.  We  even  have  a  Facebook  page  for  those
of  you  younger  generation.  They  all  contribute  towards  the  impor-
tant technology transfer.

Our  theme  of  healthy  communities,  integration  of  land  use  and
transportation  and  advanced  technology  is  guiding  us  along  with
our  agency  and  industry  partners  to  develop  research  and  edu-
cation  programs  to  solve  transportation  problems  and  strengthen
the  transportation  workforce.  Our  research  is  being  developed
through  a  collaborative  process  and  the  important  component  of
peer review.

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  and  I  look  forward  to  working

with you to make a more sustainable and intelligent future.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Bertini follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ROBERT L. BERTINI

Good  morning  Chairman  Wu,  Vice  Chairman  Mitchell,  Ranking  Member  Gingrey
and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  would  like  to  begin  by  thanking  you  for  this
opportunity to share our views and perspectives on our ongoing research and devel-
opment  activities  related  to  reducing  life  cycle  energy  consumption  and  promoting
sustainability  for  surface  transportation  infrastructure.  On  behalf  of  my  colleagues
in  academia,  government  and  industry,  we  appreciate  this  chance  to  address  the
technical, regulatory, social and financial challenges to implementing new measures
and integrating new technologies into existing transportation networks.

My  name  is  Robert  Bertini  and  I  am  the  Director  of  the  Oregon  Transportation
Research  and  Education  Consortium  (OTREC)  and  an  Associate  Professor  of  Civil
and Environmental Engineering and Urban Studies and Planning at Portland State
University, in Portland, Oregon.

1. OTREC Background

OTREC is dedicated to stimulating and conducting collaborative multi-disciplinary
research  on  multi-modal  surface  transportation  issues,  educating  a  diverse  array  of
current practitioners and future leaders in the transportation field, and encouraging
implementation  of  relevant  research  results.  OTREC’s  theme  is  Advanced  Tech-
nology,  Integration  of  Land  Use  and  Transportation,  and  Healthy  Communities.
OTREC is a National University Transportation Center created by Congress in 2005
and  is  a  partnership  between  Portland  State  University,  the  University  of  Oregon,
Oregon State University, and the Oregon Institute of Technology. With a grant from
the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation,  OTREC  sponsors  research,  education  and
technology  transfer  projects  at  our  partner  universities.  OTREC  programs  relate  to
the  OTREC  theme  and  support  national  transportation  initiatives  and  needs.
Through collaboration and partnerships with transportation agencies, industry, and
other  universities  in  the  Northwest,  OTREC  aims  to  address  the  transportation
needs  of  Oregon,  the  Northwest,  and  the  Nation.  The  OTREC  theme  is  focused  on
contributing  to  USDOT  strategic  objectives  including:  safety,  mobility,  global
connectivity, environmental stewardship, security and congestion.

1.1 OTREC Research

OTREC  uses  a  rigorous  peer  review  process  to  select  the  best  research  projects.
Since December 2006, OTREC has received nearly 200 proposals and has funded 45
research  projects,  involving  45  faculty  members  and  12  laboratories  and  research
groups.  All  projects  include  external  public  and  private  matching  partners  with  a
total of 22 different entities involved; half of the projects include the Oregon Depart-
ment of Transportation as a partner. OTREC is multidisciplinary, with 12 different
academic  disciplines  currently  participating  in  our  projects.  The  figure  below  illus-
trates  how  the  many  disciplines  at  our  four  campuses  are  interrelated  around  our
theme:

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

The peer review process has included 380 unique reviewers for more than 800 re-
views. We estimate that approximately 57 graduate students and 24 undergraduate
students are working on OTREC-funded projects. In addition we have funded seven
education projects and six technology transfer projects. Collaboration is strongly val-
ued  by  OTREC,  our  partner  universities  and  our  many  stakeholders,  and  has  been
woven through our activities as an important cornerstone:

• Historic  University  Partnership:  The  four  partner  universities—Portland
State University, the University of Oregon, Oregon State University, and the
Oregon  Institute  of  Technology—signed  a  historic  Memorandum  of  Under-
standing  in  March  2007.  Strong  communication  among  all  parties  is  setting
a precedent for future joint university efforts.

• New  Collaboration  Among  Faculty:  Faculty  are  encouraged  throughout
the  proposal  and  project  process  to  think  of  innovative  collaborative  ap-
proaches to research, education or technology transfer. In our first and second
rounds  of  project  awards,  13  projects  involve  faculty  at  more  than  one  cam-
pus, and 28 have multiple investigators.

• Strong Ties to ODOT and Transportation Community: More than 20 ex-
ternal partners provide matching funds of cash or in-kind support for faculty-
led  projects.  The  Oregon  Department  of  Transportation  (ODOT)  is  a  primary
partner,  jointly  funding  nearly  half  of  our  research  projects  selected  to  date.
• Regional  Collaboration:  OTREC  is  part  of  the  Region  X  Transportation
Consortium, made up of UTCs in Oregon, Washington, Idaho, and Alaska, as
well  as  the  four  State  DOTs,  with  input  and  participation  by  representatives
of  the  USDOT.  The  Consortium  meets  twice  a  year,  supports  an  annual  stu-
dent  conference,  and  is  exploring  pooled  fund  research  and  joint  educational
initiatives.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

• National  Connections:  OTREC  strives  to  meet  national  transportation  re-
search  and  education  needs,  and  is  active  with  the  American  Association  of
State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials  (AASHTO),  the  Transportation
Research  Board  (TRB),  the  Council  of  University  Transportation  Centers
(CUTC) and other national activities.

1.2 OTREC Educational Activities

All  OTREC  activities  have  student  success  as  a  primary  goal.  Whether  it’s  offer-
ing  students  hands-on  research  experience  with  hot  topic  transportation  issues,  op-
portunities  to  present  their  research  at  conferences,  including  the  TRB  Annual
Meeting, scholarships and fellowships to help them reach their degree goals, or pro-
viding  continuing  education  opportunities  to  practicing  professionals,  students  are
central to our mission.

Partner  universities  currently  offer  16  undergraduate  and  graduate  programs
with  transportation  specializations,  with  more  than  100  students  enrolled.  During
this  past  year  36  students  graduated  with  transportation  related  graduate  degrees
and  are  now  working  in  the  transportation  field.  OTREC  also  supports  transpor-
tation  student  groups  at  the  partner  campuses.  This  support  is  allowing  under-
graduate  and  graduate  students  to  travel  to  conferences,  host  guest  speakers,  co-
ordinate events and field trips, and communicate transportation issues and opportu-
nities  to  students  across  the  campuses.  OTREC  also  co-hosts  an  annual  Transpor-
tation  Student  Conference  with  the  Region  X  Transportation  Consortium.  Students
are  able  to  present  their  research  and  exchange  ideas  with  their  peers  in  an  envi-
ronment that does not exist in the classroom or at other conferences. The conference
includes  both  student  presentations  and  poster  sessions  to  showcase  the  great  stu-
dent-led transportation research being done in the Northwest.

1.3 OTREC Technology Transfer

Sharing  of  knowledge  and  dissemination  of  program  results  are  key  components
of  all  OTREC  programs.  All  research  projects  have  a  technology  transfer  plan,  so
that  research  results  are  available  to  potential  users  in  a  form  that  can  be  directly
implemented,  utilized,  or  otherwise  applied.  OTREC  is  working  towards  an  ex-
panded and coordinated statewide program of transportation outreach involving ac-
cessible  communication  of  research  results  and  continuing  education  and  training
courses  for  transportation  professionals  in  a  variety  of  formats.  A  study  by  OTREC
PIs and students is underway to identify the current transportation training oppor-
tunities in the region, and to determine how OTREC can best fill training needs for
transportation  professionals.  OTREC  is  offering  a  series  of  short  courses  and
partnering  with  other  transportation  organizations  to  offer  more  training  and  pro-
fessional development opportunities in Oregon.

The  OTREC  website  (www.otrec.us)  serves  as  a  primary  communication  tool,  and
includes up-to-date news, newsletters, annual reports, recorded seminars, project in-
formation,  and  professional  development  opportunities.  Final  research  reports  with
search  options  will  be  available.  Website  capabilities  will  expand  to  fill  technology
transfer needs as OTREC programs evolve. OTREC regularly sponsors guest speak-
ers as part of our Visiting Scholar Program. At PSU, the Center for Transportation
Studies  (CTS)  offers  weekly  transportation  seminars  that  are  broadcast  live  on  the
web,  and  archived  in  streaming  video  and  podcast.  More  than  200  seminars  have
been  presented,  with  more  than  145  available  as  online  streaming  video,  and  more
than 30 available as Podcasts (.mp3) via iTunes. In addition to registered students,
over  500  professionals  and  guests  also  attended  the  seminars.  OTREC  sponsored
several visiting scholars, see: http://www.cts.pdx.edu/seminars.htm.

1.4 Impact of Intelligent Transportation Systems on Sustainability

A broad range of diverse technologies, known collectively as Intelligent Transpor-
tation Systems (ITS), holds the answer to many of our society’s transportation prob-
lems.  ITS  are  comprised  of  existing  and  new  technologies,  including  information
processing, sensors, communications, control, and electronics. Combining these tech-
nologies  in  innovative  ways  and  integrating  them  into  our  multi-modal  transpor-
tation system will save lives, time, and resources—including benefits such as reduc-
ing energy, fuel, emissions, accident exposure, noise and more. Delay reductions al-
most  always  mean  increased  productivity  and  quality  of  life  since  people’s  value  of
time  is  significant,  and  more  so  for  business-related  travel  where  drivers  are  being
paid  an  hourly  wage.  Safety  improvements  also  have  direct  benefits  (fewer  crashes
mean fewer fatalities, injuries, health care costs and property damage) and indirect
benefits since many crashes cause congestion.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

Transportation is the backbone of our society—the movement of people and goods
provides the foundation of our quality of life and economic prosperity. Fulfilling the
need  for  a  transportation  system  that  is  both  economically  sound  and  environ-
mentally  efficient  requires  a  new  way  of  looking  at—and  solving—our  transpor-
tation  problems.  The  strategy  of  adding  more  and  more  highway  capacity  neither
solves  our  transportation  problems,  nor  meets  the  broad  national  vision  of  an  effi-
cient,  integrated  transportation  system.  We  focus  on  the  integration  and  improve-
ment of all modes—highway, transit, bicycle, pedestrian and freight. Traffic crashes
and  congestion  take  heavy  tolls  in  lives,  lost  productivity,  and  wasted  energy.  ITS
enables people and goods to move more safely and efficiently through a state-of-the-
art, intermodal transportation system.

2. Research Related to Energy Efficiency and Sustainability

OTREC  is  just  one  component  of  a  larger  program  in  Oregon  and  in  the  Oregon
University  System  to  address  sustainability.  For  example,  the  Oregon  Legislature
has  created  the  Institute  for  Natural  Resources  (INR),  the  Oregon  Climate  Change
Research  Institute  (OCCRI),  and  a  signature  research  center  focusing  on  the  Built
Environment  and  Sustainable  Technologies  (BEST),  and  is  developing  a  statewide
Sustainability  Initiative.  There  is  also  a  proposal  for  a  statewide  Oregon  Water  In-
stitute (OWI) to address water problems.

Given  OTREC’s  theme,  a  significant  proportion  of  our  research  is  aimed  at  im-
proving  the  operation  of  the  multi-modal  transportation  system,  which  is  directly
tied  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability.  Other  research  goals  include  providing
improved  equity  and  options  for  users  of  the  transportation  system,  which  is  the
basis  for  a  sustainable  economy  and  high  quality  of  life.  Fortunately  the  efficiency
objective  for  transportation  research  typically  includes  the  reduction  in  congestion
which  translates  to  standard  measurements  of  travel  time,  delay  and  number  of
stops.  Whenever  congestion  is  reduced  (via  reduced  travel  time  or  delay),  this  is  a
time-based  measure  typically  reported  in  vehicle-hours  or  person-hours  of  travel
(VHT  or  PHT).  When  the  total  travel  time  is  reduced,  there  is  always  an  accom-
panying  benefit  in  reduced  fuel  consumption,  energy  use,  emissions,  and  other
externalities  such  as  noise,  accident  exposure  and  contribution  to  urban  heat  is-
lands.

Other  research  that  includes  travel  demand  management  or  alternative  mode
strategies  may  result  in  reductions  in  vehicle-miles  or  person-miles  traveled  (VMT
or  PMT).  For  example  for  a  given  trip,  a  ‘‘green’’  traveler  information  system  that
provides information regarding alternative modes such as bus or rail, might encour-
age a user to forgo a trip by personal vehicle and choose transit instead. This reduc-
tion in VMT will also have a congestion reduction effect, with accompanying benefits
such  as  reduced  fuel  consumption,  energy  use,  emissions,  and  other  externalities
such as noise, accident exposure and contribution to urban heat islands.

Some  research  related  to  incident  management,  for  example,  has  a  large  multi-
plier effect-when the duration of an incident is reduced by 50 percent, the resulting
delay  is  reduced  by  75  percent.  It  is  important  in  transportation  research  to  find
these  kinds  of  opportunity  areas  where  a  low  investment  can  have  extremely  high
benefits.

In  the  context  of  OTREC’s  mission  as  a  University  Transportation  Center,  we
have identified more than 40 planned and ongoing projects that relate to energy effi-
ciency and sustainability.

2.1 Ongoing and Planned OTREC Research

Consistent  with  our  mission  and  under  the  guidance  of  our  strategic  plan,  ap-
proximately  two-thirds  of  OTREC’s  ongoing  and  planned  research  projects  address
energy  efficiency  and  sustainability.  As  described  below,  we  have  grouped  these
projects  into  two  categories:  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  and  Sustainability;
and  other  Sustainability-Related  projects.  Keeping  in  mind  that  many  of  these
projects  are  currently  in  their  initial  stages,  we  look  forward  to  reporting  specific
project outcomes in the coming months and years.

2.1.1  OTREC  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  and  Sustainability  Re-

search Projects

Approximately  one-third  of  OTREC’s  ongoing  and  planned  research  is  related  to
Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  (ITS)  and  Sustainability.  Most  of  these  project
aim  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  the  transportation  system  in  support  of  national,
State, regional and local transportation priorities. By focusing on improving the op-
eration  of  the  system  in  a  more  integrated  way,  without  massive  capital  expendi-
tures,  it  is  possible  to  improve  the  efficiency  of  the  transportation  network  so  that

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

41

all  levels  of  the  network  and  all  modes  work  together  in  a  more  seamless  way.
Projects are described in detail in the following sections. The advantages of ITS and
sustainability-related  projects  include  strategies  for  improving  the  efficiency  of  the
multi-modal  transportation  system,  leading  to  improved  safety  and  reduced  travel
time, fuel consumption, energy use, emissions, and other externalities such as noise,
accident exposure and contribution to urban heat islands.

Several projects focus on sustainable transportation pricing and tolling strategies,
recognizing  that  new  technologies  and  publicly  acceptable  financing  systems  are
needed  for  a  sustainable  future—these  could  include  specific  ‘‘green’’  strategies.  A
number  of  OTREC  projects  deal  with  integrated  corridor  management  strategies,
via such strategies from the ITS toolbox such as incident management, ramp meter-
ing,  measuring  and  improving  arterial  performance  and  improved  traffic  signal  co-
ordination  on  arterials  via  adaptive  systems.  These  strategies  focus  on  managing  a
multi-modal corridor more proactively, taking advantage of existing capacity. Recog-
nizing  the  Nation’s  congestion  reduction  goals,  several  projects  focus  specifically  on
understanding  and  mitigating  congestion  by  improving  our  understanding  of  stop
and go traffic dynamics. Given the critical issue of travel time reliability, an innova-
tive OTREC project will examine issues related to how drivers (and shippers) value
travel time reliability. This work will be important for future implementations of ad-
vanced traveler information systems.

The  issue  of  traveler  information  is  also  important  as  a  sustainable  strategy.  By
providing  users  with  reliable  information  about  travel  times  via  different  modes,
routes or times of day, users can make better decisions which can result in an over-
all  improvement  in  efficiency.  OTREC  has  several  projects  underway  in  this  area.
As  a  fundamental  foundation  for  research  and  evaluation,  a  robust,  accessible,  and
inter-operable data infrastructure is critical. OTREC has several projects underway
that focus on this issue, and strive to use the data infrastructure as a basis for gen-
erating  performance  metrics.  It  is  possible  to  design  programs  and  projects  that  by
their  very  nature  generate  data  that  can  later  be  used  for  evaluation,  but  early  at-
tention must be paid to this issue before projects are specified and implemented.

A  sustainable  transportation  system  is  one  that  can  be  resilient  in  the  face  of
emergencies—thus  several  OTREC  projects  focus  on  understanding  the  impact  of
climate  change  and  potential  flooding  on  the  transportation  infrastructure  and  on
the effects of winter weather. Finally, recognizing the critical role that freight trans-
portation plays in our society, several OTREC projects aim specifically at the freight
sector in working to make the transportation system more efficient, to leverage data
collected  as  part  of  a  statewide  pre-clearance  system,  lessen  the  energy  needs  for
freight transport and to improve reliability.

Sustainable Transportation Pricing and Tolling Strategies

• 2007–03: Socio-economic Effect of Vehicle Mileage Fees, Phase 1 and 2008–81,
Phase  2:  This  project  considers  the  socio-economic  impacts  of  the  new  high-
way  user  fee  structure  made  possible  by  advanced  technology.  The  Oregon
Road User Fee Task Force has proposed a vehicle mile tax to replace the gas-
oline  tax.  The  purpose  of  this  study  is  to  develop  a  model  which  provides  an
analytical  framework  from  which  to  quantify  the  impact  of  changing  to  the
proposed vehicle-mile tax. The Oregon Department of Transportation (ODOT)
will use the results from this study to help formulate the specific form of the
vehicle-mile  tax  (flat  tax,  a  graduated  tax,  a  higher  tax  for  less  fuel  efficient
vehicles,  a  differential  tax  for  urban/rural  areas,  etc.).  ODOT  needs  quan-
titative information on the socio-economic impact of such a tax, to use in pub-
lic relations. A huge factor in determining the ultimate adoption of such a tax
structure  will  be  the  public  acceptance  of  the  change  and,  in  turn,  they  need
to  have  full  information  on  what  it  will  do.  There  are  also  implications  for
environmental  stewardship  as  a  vehicle-mile  tax  has  also  been  suggested  as
an  emissions  tax.  Finally,  once  the  technology  is  in  place  for  a  vehicle-mile
tax,  it  becomes  possible  to  implement  a  vehicle-mile  tax  that  may  vary  by
time of day and location, providing an efficient congestion pricing tool.
• 2008–116:  Understanding  Driver  Behavioral  Changes  Associated  with  Road
User  Fees:  The  Oregon  Department  of  Transportation  (ODOT)  conducted  a
test of an innovative technology to replace fuel taxes with mileage fees. In the
test,  some  vehicles  were  charged  a  flat  fee  per  mile  and  others  were  charged
differential fees that were higher for travel in the Portland metropolitan area
during  weekday  peak  hours  and  lower  for  other  travel.  The  objective  of  this
project  is  to  extend  the  analysis  of  changes  in  behavior  by  subjects  in  the
ODOT Road User Fee Pilot Project, and to draw on other sources, to compare
the behavioral changes observed in this experiment with those found in other

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

contexts. There is potential to gain further information on characteristics that
caused  or  prevented  changes  in  participants’  driving  patterns.  A  variety  of
statistical  analyses  will  be  conducted  to  evaluate  both  the  extent  of  response
to a vehicle mileage fee and the interaction with both demographic and attitu-
dinal  characteristics  of  the  participants.  A  GIS  analysis  will  be  used  to  link
household  location  with  better  measures  of  transit  service.  Results  would  in-
clude a better understanding of how pricing interacts with other factors in af-
fecting driving patterns and in particular in affecting driving during peak pe-
riods.  It  would  also  provide  a  better  understanding  of  the  revenue  potential
from such charges.

Integrated Corridor Management

• 2007–79: Identify and Address Institutional Barriers Delaying Incident Clear-
ance:  Effective  incident  management  can  substantially  reduce  congestion
while  expediting  incident  clearance.  In  Oregon,  the  Oregon  Department  of
Transportation  has  a  comprehensive  incident  management  program  in  place.
Due to cooperative efforts among ODOT, Oregon State Police, local police, and
emergency providers most incidents are cleared rapidly and traffic operations
resume normally. However, a major traffic-related incident can take consider-
able time to clear and the closure of a major highway during peak travel peri-
ods can cause major problems. The economic impact can be considerable when
road  closures  and  delays  occur  in  a  metropolitan  area  such  as  Portland.  It  is
not known to what extent institutional constraints may account for inefficien-
cies  that  result  in  extended  time  elapsing  from  incident  detection  through
final  site  clearance.  The  research  proposed  in  this  study  will  address  several
key  objectives.  Using  a  variety  of  data  resources,  the  research  team  will  ex-
amine  recent  traffic  incidents  in  the  Portland  area  to  determine  the  extent
to  which  the  incident  and  associated  traffic  obstructions  impacted  systemic
traffic  operations.  The  research  team  will  also  develop  an  enhanced  imple-
mentation plan for addressing institutional barriers that may affect the rapid
clearance of incidents occurring on Oregon highways. Finally, this research ef-
fort  will  ultimately  help  identify  specific  legislative  initiatives  or  administra-
tive  procedures  that  should  be  implemented  to  minimize  delayed  incident
clearance and estimate the benefit of the recommended changes.
• 2008–190:  Using  Archived  ITS  Data  to  Measure  the  Operational  Benefits  of  a
System-wide  Adaptive  Ramp  Metering  System:  A  system-wide  adaptive  ramp
metering  (SWARM)  system  is  being  implemented  in  the  Portland  metropoli-
tan  area.  While  SWARM  is  designed  to  be  more  effective  than  the  current
ramp  metering  strategy,  the  true  benefits  of  the  new  system  have  not  yet
been quantified. Using an existing data stream, there is a unique opportunity
to conduct a true before and after evaluation of the operational benefits of the
new  SWARM  system.  The  project  will  also  develop  an  interactive  simulation
laboratory for evaluating and improving the new SWARM ramp metering sys-
tem  in  the  Portland  metropolitan  area.  The  simulation-based  evaluation  will
help  confirm  field  experiment  results,  and  complement  the  field  experiment
by testing alternative solutions to any operational issues identified during the
field experiment. This project will also test different control parameters in the
SWARM  algorithm,  and  recommend  strategies  for  improving  the  algorithm.
• Monitoring  Arterial  Performance  Using  Data  From  Automatic  Vehicle  Loca-
tion Devices and Inductive Loop Detectors: The Portland region has good sen-
sor  coverage  on  freeways,  but  the  arterial  system  is  limited  to  snapshots  of
measurements  from  traffic  studies  using  floating  car  studies  and  temporary
traffic counts. There is a need to implement automated systems that can pro-
vide  arterial  travel  time  and  performance  measures  for  management  of
freight  and  passenger  travel.  This  project  will  include  a  review  of  techno-
logical solutions for automating traffic measurement on arterials. Priority sur-
face  arterial  locations  for  measurement  will  be  identified,  considering  geo-
graphical  balance  and  specific  bottleneck  locations.  The  task  will  include  a
case  study  of  arterial  operations  on  Barbur  Blvd.  in  the  City  of  Portland.
Working  with  the  City  of  Portland,  we  will  review  options  for  using  existing
system  detectors  and  CCTV  cameras  to  gauge  arterial  performance.  The  re-
search will validate the delay measurement and recommend locations for such
systems  on  Barbur  Blvd.  The  City  will  then  install  two  or  three  systems  on
Barbur,  which  will  then  be  evaluated.  The  approach  delay  measurement  sys-
tem  offers  promise  for  providing  an  automated  way  to  determine  approach
delay at a signalized intersection. This task will further validate that system
on  other  intersection  approaches.  The  results  will  also  provide  the  City  of

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Portland  with  methods  to  provide  meaningful  performance  measures  for
Barbur Blvd. and beyond.
• Field-Based  Evaluation  of  Corridor  Performance  After  Deployment  of  an
Adaptive  Signal  Control  System  in  Gresham,  Oregon:  The  majority  of  traffic
signal  control  systems  in  the  United  States  use,  as  their  basis  for  coordina-
tion,  static  timing  plans  (also  called  timing  patterns)  that  have  been  gen-
erated  on  the  basis  of  typical  average  traffic  volumes.  In  2005,  the  City  of
Gresham,  Oregon  selected  and  deployed  the  Sydney  Coordinated  Adaptive
Traffic System (SCATS) on Burnside Road, a major five-lane arterial carrying
38,000 vehicles per day, between Eastman Parkway and Powell Valley Road.
A  field  evaluation  was  conducted  to  compare  optimized  time-of-day  coordina-
tion and the SCATS system on the basis of changes in travel time, delay, and
stops  along  this  road  segment.  Probe  vehicle  data  were  collected  on  three
routes  during  peak  and  non-peak  hours  in  two  travel  directions.  Side  street
delay  was  also  studied  for  three  intersections  in  the  corridor.  Overall,  it  can
be  concluded  that  the  implementation  of  the  SCATS  adaptive  signal  control
system  has  improved  the  Burnside  corridor  in  terms  of  travel  time,  stopped
delay  and  number  of  stops.  Travel  times  on  the  primary  analysis  route  de-
creased  two  to  15  percent  for  weekdays  and  weekends  with  the  exception  of
the morning weekday westbound direction which increased 10 percent (likely
because the time-of-day plan had heavily favored this direction). Although the
secondary  evaluation  routes  did  not  see  as  consistent  improvements,  the  ma-
jority of changes were still positive. Analysis of side street delay was less con-
clusive, although the majority of time periods and directions did see improve-
ment.

Congestion Management

• 2007–37: Characteristics of Transitions in Freeway Traffic: This project seeks
to  understand  the  characteristics  of  transitions  as  freeway  traffic  changes
from  one  state  to  another.  Transitions  occur  gradually  over  time  and  space,
and  their  temporal  and  spatial  features  are  relatively  unknown.  The  dynam-
ics  of  the  transition  zone  will  be  explored  by  analyzing  the  relationship  be-
tween  the  duration  of  transition  (at  a  fixed  location)  and  various  traffic  and
location  variables  (e.g.,  distance  from  the  bottleneck,  change  in  flow  before
and  after  a  regime  change,  etc.).  Researchers  are  using  data  from  inductive
loop  detectors  for  the  analyses  of  transition  zones  near  the  tails  of  queues.
These detector data are suitable for analyzing this type of transition since the
propagation  of  a  transition  zone  can  be  observed  over  a  long  distance.  The
length of transition can be estimated based on the duration observed at a de-
tector location. For the other two types of transitions, data sets from the Next
Generation Simulation will be utilized. These data sets provide individual ve-
hicle  trajectories  whose  resolution  is  suitable  for  analyzing  these  types  of
transitions. The length of a transition zone will be measured directly from the
vehicle trajectories. This research will provide a valuable insight on how con-
gested  traffic  behaves  under  various  transitions  that  frequently  occur  on
urban freeways. Hence, the results will expand the current knowledge on traf-
fic  congestion  and  serve  as  a  building  block  for  future  traffic  modeling  and
management practice.
• 2008–130:  Value  of  Reliability,  Phase  1  and  2009-248:  Phase  2:  The  issue  of
travel  time  reliability  is  becoming  more  critical  for  the  movement  of  people
and freight. In order to examine issues related to the value of travel time reli-
ability,  we  plan  to  test  drivers’  preferences  for  alternate  commuter  routes  in
a  real  world  setting.  The  research  participants  will  drive  on  three  different
routes  in  two  cities:  (1)  primarily  freeway,  (2)  primarily  arterial  roads,  and
(3) other streets. Freeways have a possible trade-off between high speeds and
congestion during rush hour. Arterials typically have a series of traffic signals
that  may  be  timed  to  favor  through-traffic.  Other  routes  might  have  some
traffic  signals  and  some  stop  signs,  but  they  likely  have  less  traffic.  By  com-
paring driver perceptions of the alternate commuter routes, it will be possible
to  determine  the  weights  associated  with  the  different  components  of  travel
time. Driver preferences may also be based on qualitative factors such as the
attractiveness  of  the  route.  Thus  one  objective  of  the  proposed  project  is  to
measure  and  then  model  the  route  preferences  of  drivers  who  have  experi-
enced  real-world  alternatives  to  their  regular  commute  to  and  from  work.
Preference  data  will  be  obtained  after  the  participants  have  completed  their
morning  and  evening  commutes  on  three  alternate  routes  (customized  for
each driver). The added realism of the novel data collection method proposed

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

for  this  project  should  enable  the  value  of  travel  time  reliability  to  be  used
in route preference models. In turn it will be possible to more accurately pre-
dict  traffic  patterns  and  produce  solutions  more  likely  to  ameliorate  traffic
congestion. An additional objective of the proposed research is to make infor-
mation  about  local  road  networks  more  available  to  drivers.  This  will  allow
for  the  better  use  of  existing  resources  and  road  capacity  for  normal  oper-
ations including when drivers are commuting to and from work.
• 2008–108: Empirical Observation of the Impact of Traffic Oscillations on Free-
way Safety: Traffic oscillations (also known as stop-and-go driving) are a typ-
ical  feature  of  congested  traffic  flow.  They  are  known  to  increase  fuel  con-
sumption  and  emissions,  and  decrease  driving  comfort.  It  is  also  speculated
that larger amplitudes of oscillations (i.e., larger changes in flow or speed) in-
crease the probability of certain crash types (e.g., rear-end crashes). However,
no current study exists that irrefutably confirms or disproves this speculation.
The objective of this research is to find empirical evidence to substantiate this
hypothesis  and  to  quantify  the  relationship  between  the  amplitude  of  oscilla-
tions and probability of crash event. This proposed research will be conducted
using  freeway  traffic  and  incident  data.  It  will  be  supplemented  by  a  state-
wide  database  of  reported  motor  vehicle  crashes.  Various  features  of  oscilla-
tions (e.g., amplitude, period, etc.) will be measured from traffic data collected
from  inductive  loop  detectors.  Existing  databases  for  crashes  and  incidents
will  be  used  to  analyze  incidents  in  correlation  with  oscillations.  This  study
will  consist  of  general  analysis  to  identify  which  crash  types  are  particularly
affected by traffic oscillations and detailed analysis via econometric modeling
to quantify the probability of each crash type as a function of various charac-
teristics of oscillations and relevant factors such as freeway geometry, conges-
tion  level,  and  others.  These  analyses  will  be  conducted  for  several  freeway
locations  in  order  to  confirm  reproducibility  and  to  examine  any  site-specific
features.

Advanced Transportation Information Systems

• 2007–57: Assessment and Refinement of Real-Time Travel Time Algorithms for
Use  in  Practice,  Phase  1  and  2008–145:  Phase  2:  The  Federal  Highway  Ad-
ministration  (FHWA)  has  set  a  high  priority  on  the  use  of  existing  dynamic
message  signs  (DMS)  to  provide  travel  time  estimates  to  the  public.  The  Or-
egon  Department  of  Transportation  (ODOT)  currently  has  three  DMS  in  the
Portland  metropolitan  area  configured  to  display  travel  time  information.  In
the near future, ODOT would like to make travel time estimates available on
additional  DMS,  over  the  Internet  on  tripcheck.com  and  via  511.  Travel  time
estimates  are  valuable  to  the  traveling  public;  however,  the  estimates  must
be  accurate  to  be  useful.  The  FHWA  indicates  that  90  percent  accuracy  is
ideal  and  suggests  a  minimum  accuracy  of  80  percent.  Thus,  in  order  to  dis-
play  travel  time  estimates,  it  is  essential  to  understand  the  accuracy  of  the
estimates.  The  purpose  of  this  study  is  to  extend  prior  travel  time  research
conducted  at  Portland  State  University  with  additional  data  collection  and
analysis  to  provide  statistical  confidence  in  travel  time  estimates  and  to  de-
termine  the  best  travel  time  estimation  approach  for  ODOT.  Ground  truth
data  in  the  form  of  probe  vehicle  runs  will  be  collected  and  travel  time  esti-
mates will be evaluated using that data. Several travel time estimation algo-
rithms will be evaluated and modifications to existing algorithms will be pro-
posed.  In  addition,  this  project  will  provide  analysis  to  help  understand  the
reliability  and  performance  of  the  algorithms  under  various  conditions  (free-
flow,  congestion,  incidents).  A  methodology  will  be  developed  for  determining
if travel time estimates fall within an acceptable accuracy limits. At the con-
clusion  of  the  project,  it  is  desired  that  a  methodology  can  be  recommended
that  will  provide  accurate  measures  of  travel  time  for  use  with  DMS,  the
Internet and 511 applications.
• 2007–64: Improving Travel Information Products via Robust Estimation Tech-
niques:  Traffic-monitoring  systems,  such  as  those  using  loop  detectors,  are
prone  to  coverage  gaps,  arising  from  sensor  noise,  processing  errors  and
transmission  problems.  Such  gaps  adversely  affect  the  accuracy  of  Advanced
Traveler  Information  Systems.  This  project  will  explore  models  based  on  his-
torical  data  that  can  provide  estimates  to  fill  such  gaps.  We  build  on  an  ini-
tial  study  using  both  a  linear  model  and  an  artificial  neural  network  (ANN)
trained on historical data to estimate values for reporting gaps. These initial
models  were  80  percent  and  89  percent  accurate,  respectively,  in  estimating
the correct speed range, and misclassifications were always between adjacent

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

speed  ranges  (in  particular,  the  free-flow  range  and  congested  range  were
never  confused).  Going  forward,  we  will  investigate  other  non-linear  models,
such  as  Gaussian  Mixtures,  that  provide  further  statistical  metrics,  in  con-
trast  to  the  uninterpreted  weights  of  ANNs.  Initially  we  will  build  and  test
estimators  in  off-line  mode.  We  will  select  a  highway  segment  (comprising
multiple  detector  stations)  that  is  representative  in  terms  of  pattern  of  out-
ages. We will build models for this segment, then examine their performance
on estimates for synthetic gaps (so we can compare estimates to reported val-
ues).  Later,  using  live  loop-detector  data  we  will  work  towards  on-line  esti-
mation  over  the  local  freeway  network,  which  requires  computing  estimates
in a timely manner. Our end target is improvements in end-user travel infor-
mation  products,  such  as  the  Portland-Metro  Speed  Map  on  ODOT’s  Trip
Check.  Our  main  evaluation  metric  will  be  the  trade-off  curve  between  accu-
racy of prediction and percentage of gaps that can be filled.

Multi-modal Archived Data User Service

• 2009–269:  Exploiting  a  Next  Generation  ITS  Data  Warehouse  for  Improved
System  Performance  and  Congestion  Monitoring:  The  objective  of  this  project
is  to  build  on  an  existing  data  archive  platform,  toward  development  of  next
generation  performance  measurement  and  congestion  reduction  tools.  This
project  will  also  review  the  current  paradigm  described  by  the  National  ITS
Architecture’s  Archived  Data  User  Service  (ADUS)  and  examine  the  possi-
bility  of  developing  a  new  generation  ADUS,  going  beyond  the  creation  of  a
passive storehouse of data. Given current developments in the transportation
operations  and  management  area,  this  project  will  pursue  several  possible
ADUS  extensions  including:  live  re-serving  of  data,  additional  services  (e.g.,
selectable  imputation  methods),  derived  sources  (e.g.,  pre-aggregated  data),
coverage  of  a  wider  variety  of  data  sources  (including  contextual  data  such
as weather and events), and active monitoring of performance metrics against
the  historical  baseline.  In  order  to  frame  this  research,  a  survey  of  current
and  potential  users  will  be  administered,  seeking  input  regarding  require-
ments for next-generation transportation information portals on topics includ-
ing  types  of  products  and  services,  performance  requirements  (e.g.,  latency,
availability)  and  desired  interfaces  (FTP,  web  services,  publish/subscribe).
The  proposed  research  will  develop  a  system  and  software  architecture  that
meets those requirements, and will address such issues as how such a portal
should be structured internally, what storage and processing needs exist, how
extensibility  and  availability  can  be  ensured  and  how  such  portals  could  fed-
erate on a regional scale.
• 2008–115: Application of WIM Data for Improved Modeling, Design, and Rat-
ing:  The  objectives  of  this  research  are  to:  collect,  sort,  filter,  and  archive
WIM  data  to  permit  development  of  long-term  continuous  records  of  high-
quality  WIM  data  and;  use  the  WIM  data  archive  to  monitor  WIM  sensor
health,  develop  loads  for  asphalt  design,  load  models  for  bridge  rating  and
deck  design,  and  monitor  freight  movement  on  the  highway  system,  specifi-
cally  the  volume,  weight,  safety,  and  time  demands.  Researchers  will  collect
WIM  data  from  DOT  agencies  (ODOT  and  others  nationally).  The  data  will
be analyzed and filtered to handle anomalous data and archived in a univer-
sally available format for use in subsequent research activities. This collection
and  archiving  of  data  will  allow  researchers  to  continue  development  of  one
of the longest continuous and highest-quality WIM data archives available in
the  country.  In  developing  the  archive,  the  research  team  will  develop  data-
processing  techniques  to  help  identify  data  and  system  performance  metrics.
Results  from  these  studies  will  be  compared  with  those  used  in  the  national
specification and improvements will be recommended.
• 2008–176: Expanding Development of the Oregon Traffic Safety Data Archive:
There  is  a  growing  recognition  in  the  safety  community  that  decisions  are
more  effective  if  they  are  knowledge-based.  Traffic  records  such  as  driver
files,  crash  data,  enforcement,  highway  traffic  and  geometric  information,
court  records,  and  emergency  medical  records  are  the  typical  data  needed  to
make  effective  safety-related  decisions.  Often  these  data  are  in  various  for-
mats,  maintained  by  distinct  agencies,  and  require  specialized  knowledge  to
use  and  link  together  to  achieve  maximum  use  of  the  data.  While  nearly  all
traffic  safety  data  in  Oregon  is  available  on  request  from  various  agencies
(Oregon Department of Transportation, Oregon Justice Department, U.S. De-
partment  of  Transportation,  Human  Services  Department)  there  is  no  clear-
inghouse  where  other  interested  researchers,  students  and  professionals  can

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

easily  access  the  data  in  a  processed,  consistent  and  usable  form.  Linking
data  sources  on  an  ad-hoc  basis  is  time  consuming  and  inefficient.  This  re-
search proposes to systematically develop a knowledge-based clearinghouse of
safety-related  data  in  Oregon.  This  archive,  the  Oregon  Traffic  Safety  Data
Archive (OrTSDA), will serve as a comprehensive source of safety data. When
fully  implemented,  the  archive  will  provide  significant  benefits  to  decision-
makers, researchers, practitioners, and interested citizens.

Emergency Transportation Operations

• 2009–257:  Future  Flooding  Impacts  on  Transportation  Infrastructure  and
Traffic  Patterns  Resulting  from  Climate  Change:  Climate  change  is  likely  to
bring  more  frequent,  heavier  winter  precipitation  as  temperature  rises.
Transportation  infrastructure  and  travel  patterns  are  vulnerable  to  potential
changes  in  runoff  regimes  and  stream  geomorphology.  The  objectives  of  the
project  are  to  investigate  the  changes  in  the  timing  and  magnitude  of  winter
runoff  under  climate  change  scenarios;  determine  the  lag  time  of  streams  to
adjust  to  changes  in  the  discharge  regime;  and  quantify  the  operational  and
economic  impacts  of  these  changes  on  transportation  choke-points  and  dam-
age related to flooding. The following methodology will be used to conduct the
proposed work. (1) hydro-climate modeling; (2) stream geomorphology survey;
(3) vulnerability analysis; (4) traffic analysis. The economic impact of the dis-
ruptions on workers, freight, and businesses will be estimated. The outcomes
of this research will include maps showing potentially vulnerable roads to dif-
ferent  magnitudes  of  flooding,  socioeconomic  damage  of  trip  disturbance  re-
sulting from road closures, and a final report.
• Dynamic  Ice  Warning  System  Evaluation:  ODOT  has  recently  deployed  an
automatic  ice  detection  and  warning  system  on  OR  140  near  the  Lake  of  the
Woods  pass.  The  ODOT  Region  4  Traffic  Manager  and  the  District  11  office
would benefit from an evaluation to determine the accuracy and effectiveness
of  the  ice  detection  system.  The  potential  to  integrate  the  existing  warning
system into the larger regional ITS also needs to be examined. This task will
include  a  quantitative  assessment  of  the  fidelity  of  the  current  ice  detection
and  warning  system.  The  integration  activities  will  include  a  literature  re-
view, an evaluation of the current hardware and software, field studies to as-
sess accuracy of ice detection, evaluation of the local warning system, evalua-
tion of ITS system integration, particularly with the S. Oregon VMS, and re-
porting to ODOT. A validated ice warning system will provide ODOT with an
assessment  of  the  reliability  of  the  current  system  in  order  to  potentially  de-
ploy additional systems integrated in the S. Oregon VMS system and beyond.

Electronic Freight Management

• 2007–14:  Using  Existing  ITS  Commercial  Vehicle  Operation  (ITS/CVO)  Data
to  Develop  Statewide  (and  Bi-state)  Truck  Travel  Time  Estimates  and  Other
Freight Measures: The transportation of freight is an important component of
the  Oregon  economy.  While  other  modes  are  clearly  important  for  freight
transportation,  trucking  is  the  dominant  mode  in  terms  of  tons  and  value.
Currently,  there  is  no  system  that  estimates  travel  time  for  many  major
freight  corridors  in  Oregon.  However,  the  existing  infrastructure  of  Oregon’s
Green  Light  program  provides  an  opportunity  to  generate  travel  time  esti-
mates  for  many  travel  corridors  in  Oregon  with  little  additional  investment.
The  Green  Light  program  enrolls  approximately  3,330  trucking  companies
with  30,200  transponder-equipped  trucks  (which  does  not  include  carriers
participating in other electronic screening programs from other states). There
are 22 equipped stations in Oregon where these transponders can be read and
corridor travel times predicted. These estimates would also be useful to trav-
elers  and  would  be  an  additional  enhancement  to  Oregon’s  traveler  informa-
tion  system,  TripCheck.  In  addition,  these  stations  also  include  weigh-in-mo-
tion systems which provide axle weights, spacing, and gross vehicle weight es-
timates  uniquely  matched  to  a  transponder-equipped  truck.  The  objective  of
this  research  is  to  test  the  feasibility  of  using  AVI  data  already  being  col-
lected  from  transponder-equipped  trucks  to  develop  travel  time  estimates
along  major  Oregon  highway  corridors  and  eventually  link  these  estimates
with  those  produced  in  Washington.  Further,  the  research  will  seek  to  inte-
grate  other  sources,  particularly  weigh-in-motion  data  to  capture  other  key
freight measures. As part of the research, it would be determined whether ad-
ditional  transponder  readers  can  be  deployed  to  read  information  at  key

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

points not at weigh station, particularly in the Portland area. It is anticipated
that privacy concerns could be addressed appropriately.
• 2008–131:  Oregon  Freight  Data  Mart:  Increasing  freight  volumes  are  adding
pressure to the Oregon transportation system. Monitoring the performance of
the  transportation  system  and  freight  movements  is  essential  to  guarantee
the  economic  development  of  the  region,  the  efficient  allocation  of  resources,
and  the  quality  of  life  of  all  Oregonians.  Freight  data  is  expensive  to  collect
and  maintain.  Confidentiality  issues,  the  size  of  the  data  sets,  and  the  com-
plexity  of  freight  movements  are  barriers  that  preclude  the  easy  access  and
analysis  of  freight  data.  Data  accessibility  and  integration  is  essential  to  en-
sure successful freight planning and consistency across regional partner agen-
cies and planning organizations. The main objectives of this project are: a) to
maintain  a  long-term  freight  database  that  would  be  available  for  Oregon
Universities,  State  transportation  agencies,  regional  planning  agencies,  and
economic  development  organizations,  b)  to  integrate  freight  data  into  the  ex-
isting  and  successfully  operating  PORTAL  system,  and  c)  to  monitor  freight
performance  measures.  The  data  will  be  stored  on  a  designated  server  space
at  Portland  State  University  and  integrated  into  the  PORTAL  system  which
will streamline data accessibility and consistency.
• 2008–133: Freight Distribution Problems in Congested Urban Areas: Fast and
Effective  Solution  Procedures  to  Time-dependent  Vehicle  Routing  Problems:
Congestion creates a substantial variation in travel times during peak morn-
ing  and  evening  hours.  This  is  problematic  for  all  vehicle  routing  models
which  rely  on  a  constant  value  to  represent  vehicle  speeds.  And  while  the
ubiquitous  availability  of  real  time  traffic  information  allows  drivers  to  reac-
tively alter routes and customer service sequences to better cope with conges-
tion, static routing models are unable to take advantage of these advances in
real-time  information  provision  in  order  to  proactively  find  adequate  routing
solutions.  In  addition,  changes  in  travel  time  caused  by  congestion  cannot  be
accurately  represented  in  static  models.  Research  in  time-dependent  vehicle
routing  problem  is  comparatively  meager  and  current  solution  methods  are
inadequate  for  practical  carrier  operations  which  need  to  provide  fast  solu-
tions  for  medium  to  large  instances.  Even  faster  solution  methods  are  essen-
tial  to  take  advantage  of  real  time  information.  The  aim  of  this  proposal  is
to  develop  and  evaluate  new  methods  for  vehicle  routing  in  congested  urban
areas. The emphasis will be placed on improving the running time of the ex-
isting  methods  using  tailored  data  structures,  the  efficient  handling  of  local
and global variables, hybrid approaches, and parallel computing.
• 2008–134:  Practical  Approximations  to  Quantify  the  Impact  of  Time  Windows
and Delivery Sizes on Freight VMT in Urban Areas: Supply chains and urban
areas cannot thrive without the efficient movement of goods and accessibility
to  services.  From  a  freight  planning  perspective,  it  is  crucial  to  understand
and quantify how routes and distribution decisions translate into commercial
VMT.  In  urban  areas,  most  of  the  trips  take  place  within  a  multi-stop  tour
or trip chain. In the logistics and operations research literature, modeling ef-
forts  have  focused  on  the  design  of  routes  but  not  on  the  estimation  of  dis-
tances traveled or VMT. Freight planning models cannot quantify the impact
of delivery size and time windows in urban areas. There is scant research re-
lating  number  of  stops  per  tour,  delivery  sizes,  time  windows,  and  VMT  per
tour.  Delivery  sizes  and  time  windows  have  a  significant  impact  on  the  effi-
ciency  and  VMT  generated  by  freight  movements  in  urban  areas.  The  funda-
mental research questions of this proposal are: a) how to obtain practical and
intuitive  approximations  on  the  length  of  commercial  vehicle  tours  and  VMT
traveled  in  urban  areas?  and  b)  is  it  possible  to  estimate  the  impact  of  time
windows and delivery sizes on VMTs?
• 2009–230: Exploratory Methods for Truck Re-identification in a Statewide Net-
work  Based  on  Axle  Weight  and  Axle  Spacing  Data  to  Enhance  Freight
Metrics:  This  research  seeks  to  develop  an  a  new  method  to  determine  flow
patterns  of  trucks  by  matching  archived  vehicle-attribute  data  such  as  axle
spacing  and  axle  weights  at  multiple  geographic  locations.  Overall,  this  re-
search  focuses  on  developing  advanced  methods  and  algorithms  to  anony-
mously identify and match commercial trucks crossing two data collection sta-
tions  on  roadways;  and  on  investigating  how  these  re-identification  methods
can  be  employed  to  enhance  freight  metrics.  By  capitalizing  on  the  vehicle-
attribute data from a number of AVC and/or WIM stations in a network, the
proposed  methods  can  potentially  support  and  benefit  multiple  applications,
such  as  determining  travel  times,  quantifying  travel  time  reliability,  esti-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

mating truck flow patterns (i.e., origins-destinations), estimating empty truck
movements,  trip  length  estimation,  tracking  movements  of  trucks  without
transponders, and pavement management. The results of this study will ben-
efit not only Oregon but potentially all other states since truck characteristics
do not vary significantly from state to state, and many states also collect axle
spacing and axle weight data.
• 2009–276: Analyzing and Quantifying the Impact of Congestion on Less-Than-
Truckload  Industry  Costs  and  Performance  in  the  Portland  Metropolitan  Re-
gion: The manufacturing, service, distribution, retail, and wholesale economic
sector  is  increasingly  affected  by  growing  congestion.  Unreliable  and  in-
creased travel times shrink the distribution radius of existing operations and
reduce  the  operational  efficiency  of  drivers  and  vehicles.  Even  though  there
is  a  clear  consensus  regarding  the  negative  impacts  of  congestion,  the  quan-
tification  and  measurement  of  these  impacts  in  distribution  logistics  is  a  dif-
ficult  task  due  to  the  lack  of  detailed  routing  data.  Unlike  most  freight  and
trucking  congestion  studies  based  on  aggregate  measures,  disaggregated  dis-
patching  and  actual  GPS  fleet  route  data  sets  will  be  available  for  study  in
this  research.  The  main  objectives  of  this  research  project  are:  (a)  to  under-
stand  the  impact  of  urban  congestion  on  commercial  vehicle  fleets,  (b)  to
quantify  and  discriminate  between  the  impacts  of  recurrent  and  non-recur-
rent  congestion  on  fleet  operations,  (c)  to  study  how  adverse  weather  condi-
tions compound the negative impacts of congestion, and (d) to provide conges-
tion performance measures at a network level.
• 2009–277:  Analysis  of  Travel  Time  Reliability  for  Freight  Corridors  Con-
necting  the  Pacific  Northwest:  Most  supply  chains  cannot  thrive  without  ac-
cess  to  an  efficient  and  reliable  freight  system.  The  objective  of  this  research
is  to  evaluate  travel  time  reliability  in  the  main  freight  corridors  connecting
the  Pacific  Northwest  to  California,  the  Midwest,  and  Southwest.  Statistical
analysis  of  Global  Positioning  System  (GPS)  commercial  vehicle  travel  data
will  be  used  to  study  travel  time  reliability  and  identify  congestion  choke-
points  affecting  corridors  to/from  the  Pacific  Northwest.  GPS  data  will  be
used  to  determine  travel  time  distributions  along  different  corridors  by  cor-
ridor  segment  (connecting  main  cities  along  the  corridor),  time  of  day,  and
day of week. Unlike previous studies, (a) GPS data will be complemented with
detector  and  transponder  based  information  to  improve  the  accuracy  of  the
travel time estimations in urban areas and to compare measurements and (b)
the  impact  of  travel  time  variability  by  time  of  day  will  be  tested.  A  major
objective  of  the  project  is  to  quantify  travel  time  reliability  on  I–5  and  I–84
freight corridors connecting major regional origin-destinations that start, end,
or run through Oregon.

2.1.2 OTREC Sustainability-Related Projects

Another one-third of OTREC’s ongoing and planned research projects related more
generally  to  sustainability.  Some  of  the  projects  aim  to  make  transportation  and
land  use  systems  more  efficient,  while  others  deal  with  making  alternative  modes
such as bicycling and walking more attractive. We anticipate that this research will
result  in  measures  that  can  be  implemented  that  will  make  our  communities  more
efficient and sustainable by encouraging a shift toward travel that requires less en-
ergy.  An  additional  set  of  projects  deals  with  freight  planning  issues  that  also  aim
to reduce the carbon footprint of our freight transportation sector, specifically in the
food supply arena.

Land Use and Transportation Linkage

• 2007–68:  Co-Evolution  of  Transportation  and  Land  Use:  The  interaction  be-
tween  land  use  and  transportation  has  long  been  the  central  issue  in  urban
and  regional  planning.  This  project  examines  the  land  use-transportation
interaction  from  an  evolutionary  perspective—once  a  certain  set  of  goals  are
determined  and  pursued  by  politicians  and  planners,  their  land  supply  and
transportation investment decisions are to a large extent driven by their pre-
vious  decisions  and  the  supply-demand  dynamics  in  the  urban  system.  Dif-
ferent  from  existing  integrated  land  use  and  transportation  models  that  as-
sume  exogenous  network  investment  decisions,  the  co-evolution  model  con-
siders  both  land  use  growth  and  transportation  network  growth  as  endoge-
nous  and  market-driven.  The  central  research  question  is  how  market  and
policies  translate  into  transportation  facilities  and  land  use  developments  on
the  ground.  The  co-evolution  model  achieves  a  novel  Urban  Growth  Equi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

librium, which is a useful concept for planning and policy analysis. An agent-
based  simulation  approach  is  employed  to  integrate  an  existing  land  use
model and the transportation network growth model. The resulting integrated
co-evolution model is demonstrated in a series of policy sensitivity tests.
• 2008–137:  Dynamic  Activity-Based  Travel  Forecasting  System:  The  proposed
research  project  has  as  its  primary  goal  the  development  of  a  dynamic  activ-
ity-based  demand  model  system  for  Metro  that  will  be  capable  of  meeting
these objectives through explicit consideration of time of day and accumulated
activity  times  in  the  propensities  of  individuals  to  construct  tours.  Although
activity-based  travel  demand  models  have  been  developed  or  are  currently
under  development  in  several  cities  in  the  U.S.  and  elsewhere,  sensitivity  to
time-dependent path information seems to be lacking in these efforts. Specifi-
cally,  extant  models  tend  to  treat  activity  episode  generation,  duration,  loca-
tion, starting time, and travel mode choices as essentially independent, which
they are able to do because they ultimately produce trip tables for static net-
work  assignment  methods.  Model  components  to  be  developed  under  this
project include: activity pattern choice, daily starting time choice, tour genera-
tion, tour mode choice, next stop purpose, next stop location, next stop mode,
next stop timing and system simulation event tracker.
• 2008–152:  Overlooked  Density:  Re-Thinking  Transportation  Options  in  Sub-
urbia, Phase 1 and 2009–216: Phase 2: This project aims at understanding of
how  regulation  and  site  design  practices  may  be  modified  to  transform  exist-
ing  and  new  suburban  multi-family  housing  areas  into  places  that  offer  a
range of travel modes and potentially reduce the exclusive use of automobiles.
This proposal investigates the integration of land use and transportation and
also  focuses  on  the  role  of  site  design  as  a  critical  aspect  in  the  creation  of
livable,  less  congested  and  multi-modal  suburban  communities.  Using  a  case
study  approach,  this  research  will  include  transportation  and  demographic
surveys of suburban multi-family residents, audits/analysis of existing site de-
signs, and interviews with planners, developers, and designers of multi-family
housing  developments.  In  order  to  expose  students  to  the  challenges  of  cre-
ating  integrated  and  sustainable  suburban  multi-family  development,  this
project  will  also  include  an  educational  component  in  which  a  class  of  stu-
dents  will  travel  to  study  and  document  existing  models  of  suburban  multi-
family  development  in  Eugene,  Oregon  and  Phoenix,  Arizona.  Both  of  these
cities have seen growth of this housing type in the last decade and will serve
as  test  cases  of  how  different  site  design  approaches  have  affected  transpor-
tation  behavior.  Students  will  work  with  local  officials,  developers  and  archi-
tects  to  understand  code  and  development  related  issues,  and  will  then  pro-
pose alternatives to existing models of development.
• 2008–163:  No  More  Freeways:  Urban  Land  Use-Transportation  Dynamics
without  Freeway  Capacity  Expansion:  This  research  aims  to  answer  the  fol-
lowing  critical  land  use-transportation  planning  questions:  (1).  Under  what
conditions will freeway capacity expansion become counterproductive to urban
planning goals (where is the saturation point and are we there yet)? (2). How
would  urban  land  use  and  transportation  dynamics  evolve  if  an  investment
policy  prohibiting  all  freeway  capacity  expansions  was  implemented  (i.e.,  no-
more-freeway). (3). What would be the implications of such a policy on mobil-
ity, accessibility, land use pattern, transportation finance, and social welfare?
Improved knowledge on these issues should benefit planers and decision-mak-
ers  who  pursue  mobility  and  sustainability  objectives  and  have  the  power  to
shape  future  cities.  The  general  public  will  also  benefit  from  more  informed
transportation  investment  decisions.  The  proposed  research  builds  upon  an
integrated modeling tool developed in previous research—ABSOLUTE (Agent-
Based  Simulator  Of  Land  Use-Transportation  Evolution)—which  translates
planning policies such as the ‘‘no-more-freeway’’ policy into alternative urban
growth paths and possibly urban growth equilibria.
• 2008–160:  Long-Term  Evaluation  of  Individualized  Marketing  Programs  for
Travel  Demand  Management:  With  increasing  concerns  over  traffic  conges-
tion,  fossil  fuel  use,  air  pollution,  and  livability,  coupled  with  severe  con-
straints  on  funding  for  new  transportation  infrastructure,  cities  and  regions
are increasingly looking to a wider range of options to address transportation
problems. Transportation demand management (TDM) is one of those options
used  over  the  past  30+  years  with  varying  success.  More  recently,  the  con-
cepts of social and individualized marketing are being applied to TDM at the
household  level  and  for  all  types  of  trips.  This  research  project  has  two  spe-
cific  aims:  (1)  to  evaluate  whether  the  benefits  of  these  individualized  mar-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

keting  programs  continue  to  at  least  one  year  after  the  project  ends;  and  (2)
to  examine  whether  the  theory  of  planned  behavior  can  help  explain  the  be-
havior  changes  identified.  To  do  so,  we  will  conduct  additional  follow-up  sur-
veys  of  randomly-selected  residents  and  program  participants,  examine  sec-
ondary sources of data, and expand planned surveys.
• 2008–184:Understanding School Travel: How Residential Location Choice and
the  Built  Environment  Affect  Trips  to  School:  This  project  will  examine  the
relationship between parents’ residential location decisions with the built en-
vironment  and  travel  mode  to  school  asking  several  questions:  how  is  school
travel  implicitly  or  explicitly  considered  in  families’  decision-making  process
for  residential  location,  a  process  that  generally  involves  trade-offs  a  family
faces  in  addressing  its  various  needs?  what  and  how  do  local  environmental
factors,  such  as  land  use  patterns,  street  network  characteristics,  transpor-
tation  opportunities,  and  housing  stock  characteristics  around  school  sites
play a role in housing location choice, and in turn home-school proximity? To
what  degree  does  family  location  preference  is  constrained  by  school  siting
and  other  environmental  factors,  and  how  does  the  constraint  affect  school
travel behavior? We will survey random samples of families with children at-
tending  selected  public  schools  in  the  City  of  Eugene’s  4J  school  district.  We
will  collect  information  on  children’s  school  travel  behavior,  household  back-
ground, parents’ attitude toward school travel means, and their consideration
of  school  travel  in  residential  location  choice.  Schools  will  be  selected  based
on type, quality, size, and location. A comprehensive strategy aimed at reduc-
ing  school  auto-trips  should  consider  providing  more  walkable  environments
and reducing the demand for auto-travel.

Walking, Bicycling and Healthy Communities

• 2007–18:  Active  Transportation,  Neighborhood  Planning  and  Participatory
GIS,  Phase  1  and  2008–98:  Phase  2:  This  project  is  aimed  at  developing,  im-
plementing, and evaluating new community-based walkability tools. This pro-
posed project is designed to utilize new mobile GIS technology in the develop-
ment  of  tools  that  communities  themselves  can  use  to  assess,  map,  analyze,
and deliberate within their efforts to improve local walking conditions. These
goals  will  be  achieved  through  the  development,  testing,  evaluation,  and
transferring of GIS and PDA-based tools focusing on measuring and mapping
the  pedestrian  environment.  The  tools  will  be  developed  in  a  way  that  maxi-
mizes  public  involvement  by  local  municipalities,  school  districts,  transit
agencies, and citizen groups while minimizing the training needs of a general,
non-GIS  using  public.  With  the  data,  communities  can  conduct  self  assess-
ments  of  local  scale  walkability,  identify  specific  geographic  areas  of  unsafe
conditions,  prioritize  areas  of  greatest  need,  engage  with  local  transportation
officials  more  productively,  and  be  better  prepared  to  leverage  enhancement
funds.  The  purpose  of  the  tools  is  twofold:  1)  to  collect  relevant  information
about  the  walking  environment  that  can  lead  to  greater  safety  and  an  in-
crease  in  pedestrian  utilization;  and  2)  to  catalyze  community  involvement
that can urge public involvement and sustain other efforts to encourage great-
er  walking.  There  are  four  primary  components  of  this  proposal:  1)  refine  an
existing walkability audit tool for Safe Routes to School; 2) develop additional
walkability PDA and GIS based audit tools focusing on ADA standards, Com-
plete Streets, and walking environments around transit stops; 3) test each of
these  tools  in  communities  throughout  the  country  interested  in  addressing
walkability  at  the  local  scale;  and  4)  to  conduct  an  evaluation  of  the  utiliza-
tion  of  these  tools  in  the  various  communities.  Once  the  tools  are  developed
in the research lab, they will be field tested within a community setting.
• 2007–20: The Influence of Community Walkability and Safety on Active Trans-
portation Among Low Income Children: In the proposed study, we will exam-
ine  the  contributions  of  walkability  measures  and  perceived  neighborhood
safety (traffic and crime-related) on active transportation among an ethnically
diverse group of low income children. Second, we will investigate the relation-
ship between children’s active transportation and overall physical activity and
obesity.  The  data  set  that  will  be  used  for  this  research  is  a  cross  sectional
survey of 765 parents and guardians of children in Florida aged 5–18 who re-
ceive  Medicaid,  the  health  coverage  program  for  the  low  income.  Using  this
data set, we will develop multi-variate regression models to identify the inde-
pendent  influences  of  walkability  and  safety  on  active  transportation,  while
controlling  for  children’s  individual  characteristics.  We  will  test  whether
walkability  factors  are  equally  important  in  communities  that  are  perceived

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

to  be  safe  and  those  that  are  unsafe.  Then,  we  will  examine  the  relationship
between  active  transportation  and  overall  physical  activity  and  obesity  for
this low income population of children. The findings from this study will add
to the emerging body of literature on the influence of community characteris-
tics on active transportation and will uniquely focus on ethnically diverse, low
income  children.  This  study’s  findings  will  provide  insight  regarding  policy
approaches  that  may  be  effective  for  encouraging  low  income,  minority  chil-
dren  to  use  active  transportation.  Improving  physical  activity  levels  for  low
income  children  holds  great  promise  for  improving  health  status,  and  for  re-
ducing income and ethnicity-based disparities in health outcomes.

• 2007–33: Understanding and Measuring Bicycling Behavior: A Focus on Trav-
el  Time  and  Route  Choice:  An  ongoing  project  is:  examining  the  relationship
between  urban  form  and  people’s  decision  to  bicycle;  examining  other  inter-
vening  factors  influencing  the  decision  to  bicycle,  such  as  weather,  topog-
raphy, attitudes and perceptions, and socio-demographics; and testing the use
of readily available technology (personal digital assistants with GPS) to objec-
tively  measure  physical  activity  of  bicyclists.  That  project  first  included  a
phone survey of Portland area residents about bicycling behavior. The second
part  of  the  project,  currently  underway,  involves  150–200  bicycle  riders  car-
rying  a  PDA/GPS  unit  with  them  when  they  ride.  This  new  project  supple-
ments  and  builds  upon  that  work  in  two  ways:  1.  Collect  GPS  data  from  an
additional 100 bicycle riders. Recruitment for the additional participants will
focus  on  people  with  demographic  characteristics  and  located  in  areas  that
were  under-represented  in  the  original  sample.  This  will  allow  for  more  ro-
bust results. 2. Analyze all collected GPS data to answer additional questions.
The  current  project  focuses  on  developing  and  testing  the  PDA/GPS  tech-
nology and analyzing bike riding in relation to urban form variables. The pro-
posed  project  will  evaluate  the  following  new  questions,  among  others:  what
is  the  difference  in  travel  time  between  bicycling  and  driving?  how  does  this
difference  vary  spatially?  how  do  cyclists’  routes  differ  from  the  shortest  net-
work  distance?  how  do  cyclists  choose  their  routes?  How  do  network  charac-
teristics (e.g., bike lanes or heavy traffic) influence those decisions?

• 2007–43:  Factors  for  Improved  Fish  Passage  Waterway  Construction:  Rough-
ened  chutes  (simulating  natural  stream  passages)  are  a  cost  effective  means
to  provide  fish  passage  at  locations  where  existing  culverts  and  bridges  are
structurally sound yet do not meet current fish passage rules and regulations.
Currently,  the  construction  of  roughened  chutes  consists  of  using  equipment
and  water-wash  methods  to  place  the  stream-bed  materials;  compaction  con-
sists of water consolidation and use of bucket and track (using the wheels and
tracks of equipment). Excessive subsurface voids can be a significant problem
that  settles  the  larger  rock  and  allows  the  gravel  and  fines  to  be  washed
away. The loss may result in subsurface flow which may impedes passage for
fish.  Among  the  factors  contributing  to  this  loss,  both  hydraulic  design  and
construction  methods  may  play  significant  roles.  This  project  is  designed  to
investigate the role that construction technique plays in the loss of simulated
stream-bed materials. The overall objective of this research project is to deter-
mine  a  list  of  significant  construction  factors  affecting  loss  of  fines  in  rough-
ened chutes and develop a tool that provides better direction for the construc-
tion of roughened chutes.

• 2009–227:  Evaluation  of  Bike  Boxes  at  Signalized  Intersections:  Analyses  of
motor vehicle and police reported crash data reveal that nearly 68 percent of
bicycle  crashes  in  Portland  occur  at  intersections  which  are  consistent  with
national  trends.  Of  these  intersection  crash  types,  a  common  crash  pattern
is  the  ‘‘right-hook’’  where  right-turning  motorists  collide  with  through  or
stopped  bicycles.  To  partially  address  these  conflicts  between  bicycles  and
right-turning  motor  vehicles,  the  City  of  Portland  will  be  installing  up  to  12
‘‘bike  boxes’’  at  signalized  urban  intersections.  We  propose  conduct  a  com-
prehensive,  classical,  observational  before-after  study  of  the  effectiveness  of
the  installed  experimental  traffic  control  devices  and  responses  of  all  system
users impacted by the installation of the bicycle boxes. Our approach will an-
swer such research questions as: do the bike boxes reduce conflicts or the po-
tential for conflict between motorized vehicles and bicycles? do the bike boxes
create any new or potential conflicts between motorized vehicles and bicycles?
how  does  motor  vehicle  driver  and  bicyclist  behavior  differ  with  and  without
the bike boxes? what design features affect behavior and conflicts? do the bike
boxes  affect  pedestrian  safety,  behavior,  or  conflicts  with  motor  vehicles  or

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

bicyclists?  what  are  the  impressions  of  the  drivers  and  bicyclists  using  the
intersections about how the bike boxes affect safety and operations?
• 2009–249:  Improving  Regional  Travel  Demand  Models  for  Bicycling:  There  is
very  little  research  in  the  U.S.  on  bicycling.  What  does  exist  provides  some
general  indications,  but  is  limited  in  scope  and  often  employs  unreliable
methods.  Moreover,  the  primary  tool  used  by  public  agencies  to  plan  urban
transportation  systems—travel  demand  models—rarely  includes  bicycles  as  a
separate  mode.  Without  more  sophisticated  modeling  tools,  planners  are  not
able  to  accurately  evaluate  infrastructure  options  that  involve  cycling.  One
reason  models  do  not  adequately  address  the  bicycle  as  a  mode  of  transpor-
tation  is  a  lack  of  data.  Models  are  built  using  travel  and  activity  surveys,
which  usually  don’t  include  enough  bicycle  travel  to  develop  better  models.
This project will address these problems. For the past two years, we have col-
lected data from over 150 bicyclists on their bicycle trips using GPS. Past re-
search has evaluated why and where people bicycle, including identifying dif-
ferent  types  of  cyclists.  Focusing  specifically  on  route  choice  behavior,  it  has
been  possible  to  compare  the  characteristics  of  the  cyclists’  routes  with  those
of  the  shortest  paths.  The  research  project  proposed  here  takes  that  several
steps further. The GPS data already collected will be used to develop a bicycle
component to Metro’s travel demand model. This will be done, in part, by esti-
mating the relative utilities of various types of facilities and factors, e.g. bike
boulevards,  arterials  with  and  without  bike  lanes,  low  traffic  streets,  hills,
etc.  In  addition,  the  results  will  be  used  to  improve  a  bicycle  route  planning
guide (ByCycle) that is currently available.
• 2009–229:  Implementation  of  Active  Living  Policies  by  Transportation  Agen-
cies  and  Departments:  The  overall  aim  of  this  project  is  to  examine  how  and
why  some  public  agencies  adopt  policies  that  are  intended  to  create  a  built
environment  that  that  supports  physical  activity  and  active  living.  Under-
standing  how  and  why  is  essential  to  promote  reformation  of  planning  and
policy  processes  to  support  active  living.  The  project  will  focus  on  transpor-
tation  agencies,  including  city  and  county  departments  of  transportation  and
public works, congestion management agencies, metropolitan planning organi-
zations  (MPOs),  other  regional  transportation  agencies,  and  State  depart-
ments  of  transportation.  To  address  the  overall  aim,  we  will  answer  the  fol-
lowing questions: what actions (e.g., policies, plans, standards, programs, etc.)
can  transportation  agencies  take  to  support  active  living?  which  agencies
have taken these actions? why have these agencies adopted policy innovations
that support active living? what factors influence adoption? to what extent is
health and active living a motivation for these actions? why don’t more agen-
cies  adopt  such  actions?  what  are  the  obstacles  to  active  living?  Methods  in-
clude a thorough literature review (print and web), an inventory of State DOT
actions,  interviews  with  innovative  State  DOTs,  examining  a  random  sample
of  MPOs  and  regional  transportation  plans,  a  survey  of  local  and  regional
agencies  that  are  undertaking  best  practices,  and  a  random  survey  of  MPOs
and city/county agencies.
• 2009–224: Healthy Communities and Urban Design: A Multi-Disciplinary Na-
tional Analysis of Travel Behavior, Residential Preference, and Urban Design:
This proposed research project is firmly and directly connected to that funda-
mental  core  through  an  examination  of  the  connection  between  urban  form
and  transportation  behavior  within  and  between  cities  across  the  country.
This project seeks to understand the relationship between urban form and ac-
tive  transportation  (walking  and  biking)  by  comparing  behavior  within  new
urbanist  and  traditional  suburban  neighborhoods  in  carefully  selected  neigh-
borhood  pairings  in  cities  across  the  United  States.  In  twenty  different  cities
we  have  selected  one  new  urbanist  and  one  traditional  suburban  neighbor-
hood  by  initial  GIS  analyses  of  their  urban  forms.  By  including  these
?pairings?  of  neighborhoods  within  cities,  and  by  including  multiple  cities
across the country, we can both control for local policy and cultural conditions
within a single city, and control for differences across cities. Thus, we will be
able  to  analyze  the  relationship  of  urban  form  to  active  travel  in  a  way  that
has not previously been done.

Sustainable Freight Transportation Systems

• 2008–154:  Food  Delivery  Footprint:  Addressing  Transportation,  Packaging,
and  Waste  in  the  Food  Supply  Chain:  Bringing  food  products  to  the  majority
of U.S. consumers generally involves frequent and lengthy trips from the food

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

growers  and  producers  through  a  distribution  network  to  the  institutional,
grocery, and restaurant businesses. Increasingly, businesses are assessing the
impact  of  their  purchasing  decisions  on  their  carbon  footprints.  These  deci-
sions  have  complex  implications  for  the  environment  based  on  the  mode  of
transportation  employed,  the  corresponding  packaging  used  to  transport  the
goods,  and  the  resulting  waste  and  disposal  transportation.  The  objective  of
the  proposed  research  is  to  examine  the  environmental  implications  of  the
purchasing  decisions  made  by  these  intermediary  food  businesses.  We  will
start  by  assessing  the  current  condition;  then  conduct  life  cycle  assessments
of  different  types  of  materials  and  identify  alternatives  that  meet  packaging
requirements  (e.g.,  shelf  stability,  etc.)  with  reduced  environmental  impacts.
Ultimately  this  project  will  serve  as  the  foundation  for  a  broader  assessment
of an organization’s carbon footprint which would extend to other forms of en-
ergy  usage,  transportation,  and  materials  management.  This  represents  an
enhancement of current ‘food miles’ assessment methodologies, which primary
consider greenhouse gases emitted during food transport. The research results
can be used to develop purchasing and logistics strategies and models for sup-
plier  collaboration  to  reduce  carbon  foot  print  as  well  as  overall  transpor-
tation and waste costs.
• 2008–195:  Freight  Performance  Measures:  Approach  Analysis:  This  research
has  two  main  objectives:  develop  a  set  of  freight  performance  measures  that
can effectively guide State-level multi-modal transportation investment; iden-
tify existing freight data sources and recommend a freight data inventory sys-
tem that supports the performance measures. This research will develop data-
oriented  approaches  to  freight  performance  analysis  that  focus  on  evaluating
the cost-effectiveness of various alternatives in achieving identified policy pri-
orities. This method is more likely to be supported by existing and/or expected
future  freight  data  sources  than  more  comprehensive  planning  approaches,
while focusing on a smaller number of policy objectives at a time. ODOT will
use  the  results  from  this  study  to  help  make  freight  investment  decisions,
plan  future  freight  data  collection  activities,  and  communicate  the  benefit  of
multi-modal investment to politicians and the general public.
• 2009–226:  Maintaining  Safe,  Efficient  and  Sustainable  Intermodal  Transport
through  the  Port  of  Portland:  The  overall  objective  of  this  project  is  to  help
maintain  safe,  efficient,  and  sustainable  intermodal  navigation  in  the  lower
Columbia  River  by  understanding,  and  suggesting  remedies  for,  a  problem
that threatens both navigation and salmon habitat. More specifically, we will:
use analyses of LOADMAX and historical water level data to document long-
term changes in key datum levels and other tidal properties; use results from
water  level  analyses,  dynamical  models,  remote  sensing,  channel  topography
and  other  data  to  determine  the  causes  of  the  decreased  water  levels  in  the
LCR;  develop  strategies  to  combat  water  level  reduction,  facilitating  timely
connections  to  land  transport.  The  proposed  research  will  apply  advanced
data  analysis  tools  and  remote  sensing  to  a  transportation  problem  and  its
associated  habitat  restoration  needs,  in  direct  collaboration  with  the  public
and  private  sectors.  This  research  takes  a  new  look  at  the  consequences  of
dredging  and  uses  of  dredged  material,  and  considers  the  impacts  of  ongoing
climate change.

2.2 Evaluating Environmental Impact of Technology

Within the realm of Intelligent Transportation Systems, a range of technology ap-
plications  exist  which  can  lead  to  improved  safety  which  has  direct  benefits  due  to
fewer fatalities, injuries and less property damage. Safety improvement technologies
have  secondary  benefits  since  the  congestion  resulting  from  a  crash  is  also  elimi-
nated  which  prevents  unnecessary  delay,  energy  consumption,  emissions,  exposure
to secondary crashes and noise.

Other  technologies  result  in  reduced  VHT  and/or  VHT,  which  can  lead  to  reduc-
tions in energy consumption, emissions, accident exposure OTREC researchers have
been  involved  in  evaluating  various  technologies  in  the  U.S.  and  abroad  for  many
years, across all modes. Typically an evaluation will include some standard perform-
ance metrics such as:

• Travel time or delay savings (congestion)
• Variability of travel time (reliability)
• Emissions
• Number of trips
• Number of stops

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

• Mode choice
• Noise
• Fuel and energy consumption
• Carbon footprint (e.g., offset by tree planting)

Fortunately there are several national resources that assist with technology eval-
uation  at  the  planning,  design  and  implementation  stages,  including  the  U.S.  DOT
ITS  Benefits  Database  (www.itsbenefits.its.dot.gov)  and  the  Intelligent  Transpor-
tation  Systems  Deployment  Analysis  System  (IDAS—see  http://idas.camsys.com).
In order to rigorously evaluate any technology there are several important consider-
ations:

• Partnerships:  our  evaluations  of  specific  technologies  have  all  involved
strong  partnerships,  typically  with  transportation  agencies  and  the  private
sector. We have found opportunities to work collaboratively with the transpor-
tation  industry  where  we  have  been  able  to  provide  resources  for  unbiased
evaluation  when  transportation  agency  staff  lack  time  and  resources  to  focus
on research.

• Problem identification: it is possible to avoid the phenomenon of a problem
looking  for  a  solution  by  carefully  identifying  the  problem  that  need  to  be
solved before identifying a specific technology.

• Data  source:  there  must  be  a  sufficient  data  source,  preferably  as  part  of
the  technology  deployment  itself.  In  our  experience,  it  is  extremely  helpful
when  there  is  an  environment  of  open  data  sharing.  Transportation  agencies
in  Oregon  freely  share  their  data  (subject  to  privacy  requirements)  with  one
another  and  with  researchers  and  the  private  sector,  which  is  a  model  that
should be followed elsewhere.

• Before  and  after:  typically  technology  deployments  that  result  in  the  gen-
eration  of  data  do  not  consider  the  need  for  both  ‘‘before’’  and  ‘‘after’’  data.
If possible, evaluations should develop a robust set of baseline data before im-
plementing the ultimate system.

• Involve  evaluator  early:  if  the  need  for  evaluation  is  built  into  the  project
or  program  early,  the  costs  will  be  minimized  and  the  potential  effectiveness
of the evaluation will be maximized.

• Test bed:  if  alternative  technologies  are  available,  consider  the  development
of a simple testbed that allows for raw data from several different sources to
be  collected  by  a  neutral  party  for  direct  comparison.  The  freeway  authority
in  Munich,  Germany  successfully  used  this  format  for  evaluating  alternative
road weather monitoring systems.

• Technology  transfer:  communicating  the  results  of  technology  evaluation
through training, seminars, publications, new media and conference/workshop
presentations  has  been  a  cornerstone  of  OTREC’s  work.  In  addition  we  focus
on educating students who participate in the evaluations and will become the
employees  of  the  transportation  agencies  and  private  firms  implementing  fu-
ture  technologies.  By  involving  agency  staff  in  the  evaluation  there  is  also
technology  transfer  directly  to  those  employees  (who  may  later  move  up
through the agency to leadership roles).

2.3 Future Research and Development Needs

A  wide  array  of  research  and  development  is  needed  in  order  to  improve  the  en-
ergy efficiency and sustainability of the transportation system, and many are under-
way at OTREC and elsewhere. Recognition that the focus is shifting toward efficient
and sustainable operation of the transportation system will require research and de-
velopment  of  new  sustainable  performance  based  planning,  design,  operations  and
maintenance. New incentives for operations and maintenance will need to be devel-
oped.  It  is  not  possible  to  be  exhaustive  but  several  research  needs  related  to  cat-
egories of projects described above are listed here:

• Sustainable Transportation Pricing and Tolling Strategies: the area of
transportation  finance  is  receiving  more  and  more  attention,  but  a  sustain-
able financing system with energy efficiency and sustainability goals does not
yet  exist.  Strategies  for  implementing  emissions  fees,  or  further  creative
‘green’ finance systems that are publicly acceptable should be developed.

• Congestion Management: Since about 30 percent of the vehicle miles trav-
eled  (VMT)  occur  on  freeways  (accounting  for  only  three  percent  of  the  lane

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

miles),  ITS  based  congestion  management  strategies  should  be  aggressively
pursued,  including  ramp  metering,  speed  harmonization,  and  traveler  infor-
mation.  This  will  require  better  infrastructure  for  data  collection  and  fusion
of  data  from  multiple  sources.  Research  and  development  of  greater  data
quality  is  also  needed.  Incident  management  should  be  exploited  to  its  max-
imum  level  of  effectiveness.  Basic  principles  such  as  better  signing,  striping
and marking as well as enforcement, should also be pursued. Mechanisms for
improving travel reliability should be the core of this work.

• Integrated  Corridor  Management:  Arterials  handle  about  42  percent  of
the VMT with about 11 percent of the Nation’s lane miles, and their operation
should be optimized through better operations. This requires a national effort
to  exploit  the  existing  infrastructure  of  controllers  and  surveillance  systems
to  provide  needed  data  for  management  purposes.  Building  on  private  sector
innovation, investment in research and development for more open source ca-
pable  traffic  signal  controller  hardware  and  software  should  be  considered.
Communications  systems  and  data  quality  management  components  sup-
porting these systems will also be needed.

• Advanced  Transportation  Information  Systems:  There  is  great  value  in
accurate,  timely  and  customized  traveler  information.  There  is  still  research
needed  to  understand  how  people  use  traveler  information  and  how  it  influ-
ences their decision-making. For example, would providing travelers with de-
tailed  ‘green’  traveler  information  that  reports  emissions,  noise,  and  energy
impacts,  influence  mode  choice  and  affect  traveler  behavior?  Navigation  sys-
tems could be extended to include not only the shortest distance and shortest
time routes, but the ‘greenest’ route as well.

• Multi-modal  Archived  Data  User  Service:  Transportation  data  will  be
more  and  more  critical  in  the  future  so  national  attention  should  be  paid  to
developing robust data collection, storage and management systems. Building
on  Oregon’s  open  data  sharing  philosophy,  further  research  is  needed  to  un-
derstand  how  to  fuse  data  from  multiple  sources,  including  a  mix  of  public
and  private  sources  in  a  way  that  encourages  innovation  in  both  the  private
and public sectors.

• Electronic  Freight  Management:  The  unavailability  of  disaggregate
freight data continues to be a problem decade after decade. Some strategy for
creating a firewall between private sector needs in the freight sector and pub-
lic  sector  needs  should  be  developed,  perhaps  by  a  neutral  third  party.  The
need for data clearinghouses may be needed across the transportation system
since  the  issues  of  fusing  data  from  multiple  sources  with  varying  degrees  of
quality and sensitivity are becoming more important.

Several other issues that require further research and development include:

• Development of ‘green’ performance measures that can be generated and com-
pared  across  different  geographic  areas  (state,  county,  urban/rural,  city)  and
across all modes.
• Development  of  standard  traveler  information  graphics  to  replace  text-based
• Dealing with automated enforcement legal and institutional issues.
• Serious  exploration  of  liability  issues  (following  the  lead  of  the  European

dynamic message signs.

Union and Japan) related to technology deployment.

3. Innovative Technologies in Transportation Systems

The  deployment  of  innovative  technologies  in  the  transportation  system  involves
a complicated array of public and private organizations, viewpoints, interests, moti-
vations, legacies, funding programs, and cross-disciplinary collaboration and commu-
nication.  Historically,  the  transportation  profession  has  included  engineers  and
planners  (as  well  as  many  others),  but  not  necessarily  requiring  expertise  in  com-
puting,  data  processing,  programming,  communications,  system  engineering  and
system  integration.  The  development  of  the  field  of  Intelligent  Transportation  Sys-
tems (ITS) has required the formation of new multi-disciplinary teams that require
more  careful  communication  and  collaboration.  Educational  institutions,  firms  and
government  agencies,  and  professional  organizations  have  begun  to  respond  to  this
shift,  but  the  response  is  not  complete.  Challenges  remain  that  impede  the  use  of
innovative  technologies  in  transportation,  and  there  are  roles  for  transportation
agencies (local, State and federal) as well as academia and industry.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3.1 Challenges Impeding Use of Innovative Technologies

56

As  noted,  there  are  many  challenges  impeding  the  use  of  innovative  technologies

in transportation systems.

• Shift  to  operations:  the  needed  shift  in  the  transportation  field  toward  an
operations  environment  is  partially  complete,  but  still  impedes  the  advance-
ment  of  innovative  technologies.  Organizationally,  there  may  not  be  incen-
tives  and  rewards  for  operations  personnel  to  advance  in  their  career.  Some
agencies  may  not  have  sufficient  operations  staff.  Limited  operations  staff
may  not  have  time  or  expertise  to  oversee  implementation  of  new  tech-
nologies.

• Finance and funding: more flexible funding programs could expand the im-
plementation  of  innovative  technologies.  Incentives  that  encourage  transpor-
tation  agencies  to  share  resources  across  jurisdictional  boundaries  would  re-
move barriers to implementation.

• Human  resources:  transportation  professionals  typically  come  from  single-
discipline  educational  backgrounds,  and  there  may  not  be  sufficient  opportu-
nities  for  professional  development  and  continuing  education.  Many  agencies
and firms have travel restrictions that prevent employees from attending and
participating 
international  conferences  and
symposia (even across State boundaries in some cases). There may not be pro-
grams  for  tuition  reimbursement  for  pursuit  of  continuing  education  or  ad-
vanced degrees, or rewards (e.g., promotion or salary increase) for attainment
of graduate degrees.

in  regional,  national,  and 

• Legacy  systems:  there  are  numerous  legacy  systems  throughout  the  trans-
portation infrastructure that have not been maintained or upgraded. Funding
for  these  kinds  of  upgrades  should  be  expanded,  along  with  performance  in-
centives  that  allow  for  upgrades  to  new  versions  of  hardware  and  software.
Often  the  legacy  systems  do  not  allow  flexible  data  transfers  which  impacts
inter-operability.

• Communications:  historically  transportation  systems  have  been  linked  to
communications, but transportation professionals may not have the necessary
expertise  to  plan,  design  or  implement  robust  communications  networks.
More  attention  should  be  paid  to  the  establishment  of  communications  infra-
structure that supports the implementation of innovative technologies for the
transportation system.

• Data:  there  is  a  need  for  high  quality  ubiquitous  transportation  surveillance
data  across  all  modes  and  all  levels  of  the  network.  Systems  for  measuring,
storing, and disseminating transportation data are complex and currently in-
consistent.

• System integration: diverse systems that have been implemented piecemeal
require  integration.  Data  standards  are  moving  targets  and  it  is  difficult  to
establish concrete standards for data formats and structures.

• Collaboration: the implementation of innovative technologies requires think-
ing  beyond  traditional  jurisdictional  boundaries.  Users  want  to  operate  on  a
seamless  transportation  network,  so  traditional  boundaries  that  divide  fi-
nance,  data,  and  other  systems  must  be  broken  down.  Boundaries  between
public  and  private  entities  along  with  associated  liability  issues  also  present
challenges.

• Need  for  objective  and  continuing  evaluation:  often  once  a  project  has
been  implemented  and  possibly  evaluated,  continuing  maintenance  and  per-
formance evaluation is not provided.

3.2 Federal, State and Local Actions Needed

There  are  many  actions  that  can  be  taken  by  Federal,  State,  and  local  govern-
ments in order to break down barriers to the application of innovative technologies.
Several examples of these roles include:

• Encourage  regional  collaboration:  in  the  Portland  metropolitan  region,
the TransPort ITS Advisory Committee has been meeting monthly on a volun-
tarily  basis  since  1994.  TransPort  includes  representatives  from  Federal,
State, regional, local governments, the private sector and academia. The com-
mittee  provides  official  ITS  advising  to  the  regional  transportation  decision-
making body and also provides a valuable forum for sharing project informa-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

tion,  data,  and  resources.  TransPort  could  be  a  model  for  regional  coordina-
tion nationwide.

• Public/private  partnerships:  government  agencies  could  encourage  public/
private  partnerships  particularly  in  the  area  of  standards  for  data  sharing
and communications.

• Funding  and  incentives  for  operations:  new  strategies  for  funding  oper-
ations  activities  within  transportation  agencies  should  be  developed,  particu-
larly  for  those  with  small  staffs.  Operations  funds  should  not  compete  with
funding for capacity improvements and dealing with aging infrastructure.

• Reward data sharing:  agencies  that  openly  share  data  with  other  agencies
and make it available for research and to the private sector (e.g., value added
resellers) should be rewarded.

• Continuing education and mentorship: agencies should partner with edu-
cation  and  training  organizations  to  advance  the  multi-disciplinary  edu-
cational  level  of  employees,  using  specific  performance  targets.  Increase  level
of experience within agencies to effectively implement, operate, integrate and
maintain  technology.  Agency  personnel  can  serve  as  valuable  mentors  and
colleagues for students and faculty.

• Performance  measurement:  develop  new  strategies  and  incentives  for

‘green’ performance measurement and evaluation.

• Rural infrastructure: communications and utilities in rural locations can be
unreliable  and  expensive  to  operate  and  maintain.  Agencies  should  focus  on
improving rural infrastructure for technology.

3.3 Role for Industry and Academia Industry

Industry  and  academia  play  important  roles  in  the  implementation  of  innovative
technology  solutions.  At  a  fundamental  level,  it  is  important  for  both  industry  and
academia  to  be  at  the  table  at  the  planning,  design,  and  implementation  stages.
Often  industry  can  assist  government.  For  example,  new  vehicles  are  already
equipped  with  advanced  positioning  and  communications  systems  that  could  serve
as  a  backbone  for  those  vehicles  to  act  as  ‘probes’  in  the  transportation  system.
However,  serious  privacy  issues  exist  that  prevent  any  aggregation  of  data  gen-
erated  from  private  vehicles  to  be  used  for  management  or  information  systems.
Perhaps in the future, a collaboration of public, private and university organizations
can  work  to  develop  a  framework  for  integrating  data  from  multiple  sources  in  a
mutually  beneficial  way.  The  figure  below  illustrates  one  way  that  academia  can
play  a  significant  role  in  the  development  of  new  technology.  Most  transportation
agencies  have  systems  in  place  to  identify  problems,  set  specific  goals  for  their  re-
gion  or  state,  select  and  assess  multiple  alternative  strategies,  and  ultimately  take
particular  actions.  The  feedback  loop  is  complete  when  the  evaluation  step  is  com-
pleted,  which  provides  feedback  into  the  next  stage  of  problem  identification.  Many
times, the evaluation step is left out and this is where academia can play an impor-
tant role. Through collaboration, universities can work with transportation agencies
and  industry  to  provide  unbiased,  rigorous  evaluations  that  complete  the  feedback
loop.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

In the ITS field, often academia can play an important role in the collection, stor-
age  and  maintenance  of  data  archives.  It  has  been  shown  that  having  a  group  of
researchers  who  are  interested  in  using  data  can  ensure  its  quality.  Academia  also
plays  a  crucial  role  in  providing  unbiased,  rigorous  evaluations  of  ITS  projects  and
programs,  which  serves  as  a  training  ground  for  future  and  current  professionals.

4. Technology Transfer

4.1 OTREC Technology Transfer

OTREC’s technology transfer efforts are contributing toward an expanded and co-
ordinated statewide program of transportation outreach involving accessible commu-
nication of research results, continuing education and training courses for transpor-
tation  professionals  at  all  levels  and  at  all  stages  of  their  careers,  in  a  variety  of
formats. These programs are being developed in coordination with a statewide needs
assessment,  transportation  agency,  industry,  and  community  needs,  and  may  also
appeal  to  a  larger  national  and  international  audience.  In  addition,  all  OTREC
projects have an explicit component of transferring ideas, skills, and results as part
of  the  research  process.  OTREC  is  also  working  with  individual  campus  commer-
cialization  officers  to  efficiently  move  intellectual  property  into  the  marketplace  as
relevant.

There  is  a  need  to  improve  our  transportation  systems  to  make  them  more  sus-
tainable  through  research  and  education.  There  is  also  a  workforce  crisis  in  the
transportation  sector  in  that  half  of  our  nation’s  transportation  system  employees
will  be  eligible  for  retirement  in  the  next  ten  years.  Many  rural  city  managers  and
transportation  planning  staff  are  expected  to  retire  within  the  next  decade,  yet
many  rural  towns  in  Oregon  are  experiencing  either  rapid  growth  or  decline  where
transportation  issues  become  central  issues.  OTREC  is  supporting  efforts  to  link
student  service  learning  projects  with  improving  rural  community  planning,  and
will  bring  this  approach  to  developing  transportation  training  modules  for  new  city
managers,  planners,  planning  commissioners,  and  legislators  throughout  rural  Or-
egon. OTREC is encouraging and funding investigator-based technology transfer ini-
tiatives  and  encourage  development  of  ways  to  share  knowledge  nationally  and
internationally. An example of such an initiative is the free web-based

Friday  seminar  program  already  underway  at  PSU.  Each  research/education
project proposal requires a technology transfer plan that is evaluated as part of our
peer  review  process.  OTREC  will  encourage  dissemination  of  research  results  via
journal publications and presentations at recognized conferences.

There  is  a  comprehensive  OTREC  website  with  links  to  all  reports  and  publica-
tions. Project descriptions are posted on the OTREC website and submitted to TRB’s
RiP  database  one  month  after  project  selection.  The  OTREC  newsletter  is  a  key
communication tool, and has been published twice a year and posted on the OTREC
website.  We  also  use  electronic  communication  by  e-mail  as  a  key  outreach  tool  for
faculty, students, professionals and stakeholders. OTREC provides the Uniform Re-
source Locator (URL) of all full text reports to TRIS, transmits it to NTL and sends
five  printed  copies  to  the  Northwestern  University  Transportation  Library,  Volpe
National Transportation Systems Center the Institute of Transportation Studies Li-
brary at the University of California at Berkeley, the TRB Library and NTIS within
two months of project completion.

In  addition  to  national  conferences  such  as  the  Transportation  Research  Board
Annual  Meeting  and  others,  OTREC  faculty  and  students  actively  participate  and
present at local conferences including:

• Annual Region X (TransNow) student conference
• Oregon Planning Institute (OPI) Conference
• Northwest  Transportation  Conference  currently  sponsored  by  ODOT  in  even-
• Oregon Transportation Safety Conference
• Institute of Transportation Engineers District 6 Annual Meeting (13 Western

numbered years

states)

Research  PIs  will  be  encouraged  to  produce  posters  and  ‘‘project  capsules,’’  one
page  summaries  of  project  results  with  graphics.  These  are  posted  on  the  website
and are also used in hardcopy to provide a convenient format to distribute to trans-
portation professionals. The OTREC newsletter also features abstracts from recently
published  results.  A  series  of  seminars/lectures/symposia/panels  will  be  continued
and/or expanded at all campuses.

OTREC is supporting and expanding existing short courses and training programs
(e.g.,  Kiewit  Center  Safety  Courses,  PSU’s  Urban  Rail  series,  NCAT  training,  etc.).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

OTREC  hopes  to  develop  programs  for  the  Pacific  Rim  (e.g.,  China  and  Vietnam).
In  addition,  we  try  to  work  with  other  organizations  to  be  a  clearinghouse  for  a
broad  array  of  training  programs  (ODOT’s  Road  Scholars,  the  University  of  Wash-
ington’s  Transpeed  programs,  WTS  leadership  programs,  OSU’s  Kiewit  Center
courses,  FHWA  sponsored  courses  through  the  National  Highway  Institute  (NHI),
the National Transit Institute (NTI) and ITS Oregon sponsored courses.)

OTREC  has  been  in  operation  for  about  18  months,  and  so  far  we  believe  that
our  technology  transfer  efforts  have  been  successful.  By  funding  85  projects,  there
are now about 60 different faculty involved in OTREC projects with roughly 95 stu-
dents  involved  as  research  assistants.  Each  project  has  an  external  matching  part-
ner who is interested in the research undertaken. External partners also assist with
peer review of the final report, which also requires review by a federal agency staff
member. These efforts, along with direct access to the products of each project, will
help get the results into the hands of those who can implement the technology. Our
projects  have  about  30  external  partners.  We  have  17  undergraduate  and  graduate
degree  programs  that  are  preparing  future  transportation  professionals  and  pro-
viding  opportunities  for  working  professionals  to  seek  additional  education  and
training.  OTREC  faculty  and  students  are  quite  active  publishing  and  presenting
their  research  results  and  providing  opportunities  for  students  to  gain  experience
presenting  the  results  of  their  work.  Finally,  during  our  first  year  of  operation  our
31 professional development courses and symposia have reached about 585 transpor-
tation professionals.

4.2 OTREC Industry Partners

Industry  partners  play  a  significant  role  in  technology  transfer  in  several  ways.
First,  each  project  has  an  external  matching  partner  to  help  ensure  success,  and
some  of  these  come  from  industry.  Second,  OTREC’s  External  Advisory  Board  in-
cludes  four  members  from  private  industry,  who  help  identify  research  topics  and
ensure technology transfer.

4.3 OTREC Demonstration Projects
OTREC  has  not  been  involved  in  any  official  federally-funded  demonstration

projects for new technologies.

5. Conclusion

Our themes—healthy communities, integration of land use and transportation and
advanced  technologies—are  guiding  us,  along  with  our  transportation  agency  and
industry  partners  across  the  state,  to  develop  research  and  education  programs
aimed  at  solving  transportation  problems  and  strengthening  the  transportation
workforce.  Our  research  is  being  developed  through  a  collaborative  process  and  all
products will be peer-reviewed. Thank you for this opportunity to provide testimony
at this important hearing. With your continuing support, we are looking forward to
making  important  contributions  toward  a  more  intelligent  and  sustainable  future.

BIOGRAPHY FOR ROBERT L. BERTINI

Dr.  Robert  L.  Bertini  is  an  Associate  Professor  of  Civil  &  Environmental  Engi-
neering  and  Urban  Studies  &  Planning  at  Portland  State  University  in  Portland,
Oregon.  A  registered  professional  engineer  in  Oregon  and  California,  he  is  also  the
Director  of  the  Oregon  Transportation  Research  and  Education  Consortium
(OTREC), a statewide collaborative national university transportation center that is
a partnership between Portland State University, the University of Oregon, Oregon
State University and the Oregon Institute of Technology. OTREC is advancing new
research,  education  and  technology  transfer  initiatives  throughout  the  State  of  Or-
egon with a multi-disciplinary theme of advanced technology, integration of land use
and  transportation  and  healthy  communities.  With  20  years  of  experience  in  trans-
portation, Bertini is a recipient of the National Science Foundation CAREER award
entitled  Mining  Archived  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  Data:  A  Validation
Framework for Improved Performance Assessment and Modeling.

Since  joining  the  Portland  State  faculty  in  2000,  Bertini  has  developed  an  Intel-
ligent Transportation Systems Lab, unique in the Northwest, where he and his stu-
dents  and  colleagues  are  developing  ways  of  archiving  and  mining  transportation
data  to  improve  the  operation  of  our  transportation  system,  reduce  congestion  and
fuel  consumption  and  improve  quality  of  life.  Bertini’s  goals  at  Portland  State  Uni-
versity  have  been  to  create  rich  classroom  and  laboratory  environments  to  prepare
leaders  in  transportation  field;  to  conduct  relevant  research  toward  more  efficient,
equitable, effective and sustainable transportation system; and to develop new part-
nerships  at  Portland  State,  within  the  Oregon  University  System,  with  transpor-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

tation  agencies,  consultants  and  industry.  During  this  time  Bertini  has  developed
new  courses,  curricula  and  seminars;  published  over  200  papers  and  articles  (81
peer reviewed), most with student co-authors; his published work has been cited 139
times;  he  has  presented  163  invited  lectures  and  presentations;  he  has  been  prin-
cipal investigator or co-principal investigator on 53 research projects; and has super-
vised  87  undergraduate  and  graduate  students.  He  is  the  recipient  of  several  best
paper  awards  from  the  Institute  of  Transportation  Engineers,  a  diversity  achieve-
ment award from the Women’s Transportation Seminar and the Distinguished Fac-
ulty Achievement Award from the Portland State University Alumni Association.

Bertini works to bring a community-based learning component into the classroom
and  serves  as  the  advisor  for  the  Portland  State  University  student  chapter  of  the
Engineers  Without  Borders.  He  is  the  Secretary  of  the  Transportation  Research
Board’s Committee on Traffic Flow Theory and Characteristics. He received a Ph.D.
in Civil Engineering from the University of California at Berkeley, an M.S. in Civil
Engineering  from  San  Jose  State  University,  and  a  B.S.  in  Civil  Engineering  from
California  Polytechnic  State  University  San  Luis  Obispo.  His  government  and  in-
dustry experience includes positions with the San Mateo County California Depart-
ment of Public Works, DeLeuw, Cather & Company, Parsons Brinckerhoff Quade &
Douglas,  Inc.,  and  DaimlerChrysler  Research  and  Technology  North  America,  Inc.
As a transportation engineer he has worked on public works, highway, light rail and
airport  projects,  including  planning,  design  and  construction.  Bertini  and  OTREC
are  members  of  ITS  America,  ITS  Oregon,  the  Institute  of  Transportation  and  the
American Road and Transportation Builders Association.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Bertini.
Mr. Voigt, please proceed.

STATEMENT OF MR. GERALD F. VOIGT, P.E., PRESIDENT AND

CEO, AMERICAN CONCRETE PAVEMENT ASSOCIATION

Mr. VOIGT. Thank you. Good morning, Chairman Wu and distin-
guished Members of the Subcommittee. It is both my pleasure and
privilege  to  represent  the  460  members  of  the  American  Concrete
Pavement  Association  before  you  today.  I  will  address  two  areas:
how  paving  materials  can  contribute  to  energy  efficiency  and  sus-
tainability  and  what  challenges  impede  the  adoption  and  imple-
mentation of sustainable practices.

Concrete is inherently a long-lasting and renewable building ma-
terial. One of the unique distinguishing factors and features of con-
crete pavements are their well-documented durability and longevity
over  many  decades  of  evaluation.  Most  pavements  have  a  design
life of 20 years but concrete pavements generally last much longer.
In  fact,  there  are  cases  of  heavily  trafficked  concrete  pavements
that  have  performed  for  longer  than  40  or  even  50  years.  A  good
local example is Interstate 66 just outside the Beltway here in the
Capital region, which was completed in 1963 and is still in service
today  carrying  a  daily  traffic  level  10  times  what  it  was  designed
for.  There  are  many  other  examples  like  that  across  the  country.
According  to  research  in  Canada,  it  is  this  exceptional  longevity
that  is  primarily  responsible  for  enhanced  sustainability  benefits,
particularly  fewer  repair  cycles,  which  is  the  primary  reason  con-
crete  pavements  have  a  significantly  lower  energy  footprint  than
comparable  asphalt  pavements.  Although  cement,  the  glue  that
binds  all  the  rocks  and  sand  together  in  a  concrete  mixture,  re-
quires  a  significant  amount  of  energy  during  manufacturing,  it
makes  up  only  about  eight  percent  of  the  volume  of  a  typical  con-
crete  paving  mixture.  Over  the  past  two  decades,  the  trend  has
been for less Portland cement to be used per cubic yard of concrete,
largely  because  of  improved  mixture  technology  and  the  industry’s
significant  use  of  industrial  byproducts,  which  I  believe  were  men-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

tioned  earlier,  such  as  fly  ash  from  coal-fired  energy  plants  and
slag from iron blast furnaces. Concrete is also 100 percent recycla-
ble and reusable.

There  are  a  number  of  sustainability  features  and  benefits  that
concrete  pavement  provides  in  addition  to  those  based  just  on  ma-
terials. For example, concrete roadways require about one-fifth the
energy  to  produce  as  comparable  asphalt  pavement.  If  concrete
were  substituted  for  the  500  million  tons  of  asphalt  used  in  road-
ways  each  year,  it  would  save  around  1.2  billion  gallons  of  diesel
fuel used in construction, or roughly the equivalent of removing 2.7
million  cars  off  the  road  annually.  I  would  like  to  point  out  that
we are not suggesting that every road in America needs to be con-
crete.  We  are  just  trying  to  make  the  illustration  of  the  benefits
and the sustainability features that concrete provides.

According  to  the  National  Research  Council  of  Canada,  trucks
traveling  on  concrete  pavements  use  up  to  6.9  percent  less  fuel
than on asphalt, so if all asphalt surfaces on the national highway
system  were  concrete,  it  would  save  as  much  as  2.1  billion  gallons
of diesel fuel per year, or $8.2 billion at $4 a gallon.

Concrete pavements are also naturally light colored, reflect light
and do not retain as much heat as darker colored pavements. This
could save cities and municipalities up to one-third on energy costs
associated with streetlights. Concrete pavements also have a direct
effect  on  mitigating  urban  heat  islands  and  have  been  used  suc-
cessfully  with  other  light-colored  surface  technology  to  reduce
urban  temperatures.  According  to  Lawrence  Berkley  Laboratories,
the  potential  energy  savings  in  the  United  States  from  this  ap-
proach  is  estimated  at  $5  billion  per  year  through  reduced  cooling
costs in those cities.

In  terms  of  the  current  and  needed  future  research  and  tech-
nology activities, at the top of the list for us is a new sustainability
technology initiative within our industry’s long-range research road
map  which  will  encompass  a  wide  range  of  activities  to  close  re-
search and technology transfer gaps. We have outlined these in our
written testimony.

Lastly, I want to mention several challenges our industry sees to
further  implementation  of  sustainable  materials  and  practices  for
transportation  infrastructure.  First,  there  is  a  lack  of  a  clear  and
universally  accepted  way  to  measure  the  sustainability  of  road-
ways.  Second,  current  specifications  should  be  replaced  with  speci-
fications  that  require  more  sustainable  practices.  In  many  cases,
existing  specifications  unintentionally  limit  the  use  of  more  sus-
tainable  materials  like  blended  Portland  cements.  Demonstration
projects and workforce training at all levels will be necessary to de-
velop the knowledge and skills to implement sustainable and inno-
vative technology. And there is also an acute need for a design and
decision tool or tools to assess and continually improve the sustain-
ability  of  all  pavements.  At  present,  most  pavement  decisions  are
based on, first, cost and, to a limited degree, life cycle cost without
regarding  to  sustainability  factors  and  benefits.  A  stronger  federal
position with an objective and more comprehensive pavement selec-
tion policy would help ensure that agencies effectively apply appro-
priate  considerations  for  energy  use  and  sustainability.  The  deci-
sion  process  must  change  to  impact  the  use  of  innovative  and  cur-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

rent materials that are more sustainable and less costly in the long
run.

Mr. Chairman, the stakeholders in our nation’s surface transpor-
tation  network  currently  stand  at  an  important  fork  in  the  road.
We  can  let  our  surface  transportation  network  continue  to  erode
through the continuation of current practices or we can reinvest in
new  practices  and  quality  materials  that  contribute  to  sustainable
development.  Our  industry  looks  forward  to  continuing  this  dia-
logue with you. Thank you for the opportunity.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Voigt follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GERALD F. VOIGT

Good morning, Chairman Wu, Ranking Member Gingrey, and distinguished Mem-

bers of the Subcommittee.

My name is Gerald F. Voigt, President and CEO of the American Concrete Pave-
ment  Association.  The  American  Concrete  Pavement  Association  represents  more
than  460  member  companies,  including  paving  contractors,  cement  companies,
ready-mixed  concrete  producers,  and  suppliers  of  capital  equipment,  machines,  ma-
terials, value-added products, and services that are used in the construction of con-
crete pavement.

It is both my pleasure and privilege to appear before you today to talk about the
concrete pavement industry’s research and development activities aimed at reducing
life  cycle  energy  consumption  and  to  address  sustainability  for  surface  transpor-
tation infrastructure. My testimony today will address questions aligned with three
key areas:

1. How  concrete  pavements  contribute  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability;
2. What  research  is  improving  or  will  improve  the  sustainability  of  concrete

pavements; and

3. What  challenges  impede  the  use  of  innovative  and  more  sustainable  mate-

rials in the Nation’s surface transportation infrastructure.

How  Concrete  Pavements  Contribute  to  Energy  Efficiency  and  Sustain-

ability.

Concrete  is  the  most  commonly  used  building  material  in  the  world.  It  is  often
taken  for  granted,  but  you  find  it  in  your  homes,  buildings,  under  your  feet  while
walking down a sidewalk, supporting airplanes at airports and, yes, as a major com-
ponent  of  many  miles  of  roads  and  highways  in  the  United  States  and  elsewhere
in the world. Concrete is inherently a long-lasting and renewable building material,
primarily  made  from  locally  available  raw  materials,  including  limestone  or  other
natural stones, gravel, sand, and relatively small amounts of water.

To be clear, the other common paving material, asphalt, is also made from locally
available  aggregate  and  sand,  which  is  combined  with  bitumen,  a  product  of  dis-
tilling petroleum.

One of the unique distinguishing features of concrete pavements is their well-doc-
umented longevity compared to asphalt pavements. Most pavements are placed with
a  targeted  design  life  of  20  years,  but  in  reality  concrete  pavements  generally  last
much  longer,  while  asphalt  pavements  last  less  than  20  years.  In  fact,  there  are
well-documented cases of heavily trafficked concrete pavements that have performed
for  longer  than  50  years.  The  State  of  Minnesota  has  recently  begun  specifying  a
60-year  concrete  pavement  design  and  California  (CALTRANS)  is  working  toward
the goal of 100-year Sustainable Pavements.

Modern  technology  also  continues  to  extend  the  service  life  of  old  concrete  pave-
ments  through  innovative  repair  and  rehabilitation  strategies.  Increasingly,  high-
way  agencies  are  turning  to  a  process  known  as  diamond-grinding,  which  can  be
used  as  part  of  a  long-term  strategy  to  restore  exemplary  surface  characteristics  to
structurally sound concrete pavements. Diamond grinding uses large machines that
travel  across  the  surface  of  the  pavement,  removing  bumps  and  restoring  the  sur-
face texture to like-new condition. A study by CALTRANS1 suggests that the service

1 ‘‘The  Effectiveness  of  Diamond  Grinding  Concrete  Pavements  in  California,’’  CALTRANS,

May 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

life  of  a  well-designed  concrete  pavement  can  be  extended  by  about  17  years  with
diamond grinding.

Of  the  two  types  of  highway  pavements—asphalt  and  concrete—concrete  pave-
ments  inherently  have  the  lowest  overall  energy  footprint.  The  reasons  for  this  are
many,  but  the  primary  factors  are  the  exceptional  longevity  of  concrete  pavements,
the  relatively  low  amounts  of  fuel  required  to  place  concrete  pavements,  and,  of
course,  the  fact  that  our  product  is  not  a  byproduct  of  petroleum  refining  and  pro-
duction and thus has a much lower embodied primary (including feedstock) energy.2
It is the exceptional longevity of concrete pavement that is primarily responsible for
its  enhanced  sustainability,  as  the  lack  of  frequent  repair  and  replacement  results
in  reduced  congestion;  fewer  construction  cycles  (and  the  associated  energy  con-
sumption,  pollution  generation,  and  use  of  natural  resources);  and  enhanced  safety
through surface characteristics.

It  is  important  to  distinguish  cement  from  concrete.  Concrete  is  the  mixture  we
form into pavements, bridges and other structures. Cement (technically Portland ce-
ment) is a powder that when combined with water and aggregates becomes the glue
that binds the gravel and sand together and gives concrete its strength and rigidity.
Cement requires the most energy to produce of all of the concrete constituents. How-
ever, it makes up only about eight percent of the volume if a typical concrete pave-
ment  mixture.  The  energy  and  sustainability  benefits  of  hardened  concrete  used  in
transportation  infrastructure  overcome  any  drawbacks  from  the  energy  intensive
manufacture of this one component.

The concrete pavement industry has recognized and embraced the concept of sus-
tainability. We are supporters of the Green Highways Partnership,3 and have taken
on  self-imposed  actions  and  research  focused  on  improving  concrete  and  concrete
pavement sustainability.

In recognition of their corporate obligations, the U.S. cement industry has adopted
voluntary  reduction  targets  for  key  environmental  performance  measures.  Member
companies  of  the  American  Concrete  Pavement  Association  and  Portland  Cement
Association have adopted four goals:

(from a 1990 baseline) per ton of clinker produced by 2020.

baseline) per ton of cementitious product produced or sold by 2020.

• Carbon Dioxide—Reduce carbon dioxide emissions by 10 percent (from a 1990
• Cement  Kiln  Dust—Reduce  the  disposal  of  cement  kiln  dust  by  60  percent
• Environmental  Management  Systems—At  least  75  percent  of  U.S.  cement
plants will implement an auditable and verifiable environmental management
system by 2010 and 90 percent by 2020.
• Energy Efficiency—Improve energy efficiency by 20 percent (from a 1990 base-

line) as measured by total Btu per unit of cementitious product by 2020.

Over the past two decades, the trend has been for less Portland cement to be used
per cubic yard of concrete. This trend stems from improved mixture technology, and
the  industry’s  use  of  industrial  byproducts,  such  as  fly  ash  (from  coal-fired  energy
plants)  and  slag  (from  iron  blast  furnaces),  to  replace  cement.  Cement  manufactur-
ers  have  developed  new  products  where  these  supplementary  materials  are  com-
bined during manufacturing as a blended cement product.

Some  pavements  have  been  constructed  with  as  much  as  25  percent  fly  ash  and
50  percent  slag  replacing  Portland  cement,  and  research  is  just  getting  underway
to  further  increase  the  amount  of  fly  ash  that  can  be  used.  The  net  effect  of  this
is  a  positive  diversion  of  a  large  amount  of  ‘‘waste’’  away  from  landfills,  while  at
the  same  time  improving  concrete  properties  and  cost  effectiveness,  ultimately  re-
ducing  concrete’s  overall  energy  footprint.  The  proper  use  of  these  byproduct  mate-
rials  in  concrete  also  improves  a  pavement’s  longevity  and  overall  performance,  il-
lustrating how the concrete pavement industry is and can be an even more integral
part of creating a sustainable transportation infrastructure.

Concrete  is  also  100  percent  recyclable  and  reusable.  Routinely,  old  concrete  is
crushed, steel components are removed and recycled, and then, the crushed concrete
is  used  for  roadbed  materials,  for  stormwater  management,  for  aggregate  in  new
concrete mixtures, and also for some non-paving applications.

2 ‘‘A  Life  Cycle  Perspective  on  Concrete  and  Asphalt  Roadways:  Embodied  Primary  Energy

and Global Warming Potential,’’ Athena Institute, September 2006.

3 See  http://www.greenhighways.org.  The  Green  Highways  Partnership  (GHP)  is  a  voluntary,
public/private  initiative.  It  strives  to  change  the  manner  in  which  roadways  are  developed
through concepts such as integrated planning, regulatory flexibility, and market-based rewards.
GHP  seeks  to  incorporate  environmental  streamlining  and  stewardship  into  all  aspects  of  the
highway life cycle.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

With regard to energy consumption, there are a host of energy-related factors that
are  not  considered  in  the  typical  pavement  type  selection  process  in  use  presently
by  State  transportation  departments.  Primary  among  them  is  the  energy  required
to build pavements and the energy consumed by vehicles to drive on pavements once
they are opened to traffic.

According  to  the  Federal  Highway  Administration’s  Technical  Advisory  on  Price
Adjustment Contract Provisions, construction of hot-mix asphalt roadways consumes
more than five times as much diesel fuel as the construction of comparable concrete
roadways.  Given  the  Federal  Highway  Administration’s  (FHWA’s)  estimate  of  500
million  tons  of  hot-mix  asphalt  placed  annually,  this  would  equate  to  a  1.2  billion
gallon annual savings of diesel fuel if those pavements were built with a more sus-
tainable  concrete  pavement.  Considering  the  associated  reduction  of  carbon  dioxide
by  constructing  only  concrete  pavements.  this  equivalent  to  taking  2.7  million  cars
off the road annually.

The National Research Council of Canada4 recently completed a study on fuel effi-
ciency  of  commercial  trucks  on  both  asphalt  and  concrete  pavements.  The  study
demonstrated  a  statistically  significant  fuel  savings  for  semi-tractor  trailers  (18
wheelers) on concrete versus asphalt pavements. Trucks traveling on concrete pave-
ments use between 0.8 percent to 6.9 percent less fuel. The National Highway Sys-
tem  is  the  primary  system  for  the  delivery  of  goods  by  truck  in  the  U.S.  Some  80
percent of U.S. communities can be accessed only by truck for deliveries. The system
presently  consists  of  approximately  160,000  lineal  miles  of  pavement,  59  percent  of
which  has  an  asphalt  surface.  If  these  asphalt  surfaces  were  converted  to  concrete
surfaces,  it  would  save  2.1  billion  gallons  of  diesel  fuel  per  year  at  the  pump  (an
$8.2  billion  dollar  annual  savings  at  $4.00/gallon),  reduce  our  dependence  on  oil,
lower the emissions from vehicles, and decrease the cost of transporting goods.

Concrete pavements are also naturally light-colored, reflect light and do not retain
as  much  heat  as  darker-colored  asphalt  pavements.  This  enhances  night-time  visi-
bility, which in turn, improves both pedestrian and vehicle safety. These properties
also  can  have  a  profound  effect  on  energy  savings,  as  it  requires  fewer  lighting  fix-
tures or lower wattage fixtures to illuminate concrete roadways in comparison to the
darker asphalt surfaces. When properly accounted for during design, cities and mu-
nicipalities  can  save  up  to  one-third  on  energy  costs  associated  with  street  lights.
The potential savings are huge, considering that the cost of keeping street lights il-
luminated  is  often  the  third  costliest  item  a  typical  city  might  incur,  right  behind
schools and employee salaries.5

Concrete  pavements  have  a  direct  effect  on  mitigating  urban  heat  island  effects.
Urban areas can be up to nine degrees Fahrenheit warmer than surrounding areas,
related  to  among  other  things  heat-absorbing  dark-colored  horizontal  surfaces  like
roofs, roadways and parking areas, which translates to more pollution and more en-
ergy required for cooling buildings. Concrete has been used successfully, along with
other  light  colored  building  materials  and  strategic  planting,  to  reduce  the  urban
heat  island  effect.  According  to  work  done  in  2005  at  Lawrence  Berkeley  Labora-
tories,6 the potential energy savings in the United States from this type of planned
mitigation is estimated at $5 billion per year through reduced cooling costs. At this
time urban heat island is not a factor used in the selection of pavements by FHWA
or State transportation departments.

Naturally,  when  we  talk  about  sustainability,  it  is  logical  to  focus  solely  on  the
longevity  and  environmental  aspects  of  concrete  pavements.  But  there’s  more.  Con-
crete  pavements  have  indirect  societal  and  economic  benefits,  too.  Downtown  areas
have been revitalized by the use of decorative concrete pavements, which are colored
and  stamped  with  decorative  textures  to  create  a  higher  aesthetic  quality.  This  not
only improves civic pride and creates a sense of community; it also tends to improve
business along Main Street, U.S.A.
What  ongoing  or  future  R&D  projects  will  improve  the  sustainability  of
concrete  pavement?  What  are  the  most  important  current  technical  chal-
lenges, and what types of R&D projects are needed to overcome these chal-
lenges?

4 G.W. Taylor, P. Eng., & J.D. Patten, P. Eng. ‘‘Effects of Pavement Structures on Vehicle Fuel

Consumption—Phase III,’’ 2006.

5 Data from City of Milwaukee, Wisconsin.
6 Akbari,  H.  ‘‘Energy  Savings  Potentials  and  Air  Quality  Benefits  of  Urban  Heat  Island  Miti-
gation,’’  First  International  Conference  on  Passive  and  Low  Energy  Cooling  for  the  Built  Envi-
ronment, Athens Greece, May 17–25, 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

In  September,  2005,  the  National  Center  for  Concrete  Pavement  Technology  (CP
Tech  Center),7 seated  at  Iowa  State  University  in  Ames,  Iowa,  published  the  Con-
crete Pavement (CP) Road Map,8 which is a comprehensive and strategic long-term
plan  for  concrete  pavement  research,  prepared  with  broad  industry  participation
under  the  aegis  of  the  Federal  Highway  Administration.  The  CP  Tech  Center  is  an
independent,  third-party  organization  that  represents  the  research  and  technology
transfer  needs  of  the  concrete  pavement  community.  It  is  also  unique  among  tech-
nology  centers  in  that  it  has  the  established  goal  of  collaboration  with  universities
and other organizations across the country to leverage the best minds and expertise.
Today,  the  CP  Tech  Center  and  the  Concrete  Pavement  Roadmap  are  managed  by
executive and advisory boards consisting of private, public as well as academic lead-
ers in the field of concrete pavement engineering.

When  published,  the  CP  Road  Map  consisted  of  12  research  tracks.  Although  it
was  decided  then  that  sustainability  must  be  an  inextricable  component  of  each  of
the  12  tracks,  the  ever  sharper  focus  on  sustainability  worldwide  led  the  CP  Road
Map’s  Executive  Committee  to  create  a  separate  sustainability  and  environmental
track in September 2007.

The track is currently underway, with the first meeting of the Leadership Group9
scheduled for July 23, 2008. The diverse group will lead the development of a Track
Framing  Document  to  guide  research  and  outreach,  as  well  as  to  select  projects  for
immediate  and  future  funding,  all  with  the  goal  of  advancing  the  sustainability  of
concrete  pavements,  and  building  on  concrete’s  already  outstanding  position  as  a
sustainable paving material. This track will closely align with the 12 other CP Road
Map  Tracks  to  ensure  a  coordinated  and  comprehensive  effort  to  address  sustain-
ability.

Inherent  to  increasing  the  sustainability  of  concrete  pavements  is  the  need  to  in-
crease energy efficiency, both in the production and operational phases of the pave-
ment’s life. Current and future research that directly or indirectly increases energy
efficiency during the production phase includes:

• Development  and  adoption  of  new  recycling  methods  for  concrete  pavements
to  further  advance  the  means  through  which  existing  materials  may  be  re-
used.
• Development  and  adoption  of  advanced  construction  testing  and  monitoring
to  assure  the  quality  of  the  end-products  as  more  sophisticated  and  complex
material combinations are implemented.
• Development and adoption of advanced, highly efficient equipment, as well as
methods for evaluating and improving constructability to ensure that contrac-
tors  operating  under  the  low-bid  procurement  process  have  the  technology
and capability to achieve specified results.
• Optimized  aggregate  sizing  to  reduce  cement  content  to  reduce  the  energy
• Increasing fly ash and slag contents in pavement concrete to advance the ex-
• Two-lift  slipform  paving  construction  to  allow  further  use  of  locally  available
aggregate  that  may  be  acceptable  in  the  lower  region  of  the  pavement,  but
not near the surface.
• Development  of  practices  to  reduce  and  eliminate  construction  waste  and  in-
creased  use  of  recycled  water  as  further  improvements  in  sustainable  con-
struction practice.
• Development  and  adoption  of  advanced,  highly  efficient  equipment  to  mini-

tent of reuse of these byproducts for cement substitution.

embodied in concrete.

mize fuel consumption and emissions generated during construction.

7 See http://www.cptechcenter.org
8 See http://www.cproadmap.org/index.cfm
9 The  Leadership  Group,  consists  of  individuals  representing  government  (Federal  Highway
Administration;  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency;  the  Vermont  Agency  of  Natural  Re-
sources;  Virginia  Department  of  Transportation;  Caltrans;  North  Dakota  Department  of  Trans-
portation;  Kentucky  Department  of  Transportation;  Minnesota  Department  of  Transportation;
and New York Department of Transportation. Also, the group is represented by industry (in the
form  of  representatives  from  companies  including  Holcim  (US);  Lafarge  North  America;  Duit
Construction;  The  Right  Environment,  Snyder  and  Associates;  and  Applied  Pavement  Tech-
nology),  as  well  as  associations  (American  Coal  Ash  Association;  American  Concrete  Pavement
Association; Wisconsin Concrete Pavement Association; Slag Cement Association; Cement Asso-
ciation of Canada; National Ready-Mix Concrete Association; Portland Cement Association, and
the  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials);  and  academia  (Iowa
State  University—CP  Tech  Center  and  the  University  of  New  Hampshire—Recycled  Materials
Resource Center).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

In  addition  to  improvements  during  the  construction  phase,  improvements  in  en-
ergy  efficiency  during  the  operational  phase  are  being  targeted.  These  include  im-
provements that may be realized through the maintenance, rehabilitation, and recy-
cling  operations  and  those  that  directly  benefit  the  highway  user  and  surrounding
communities. Current and anticipated research that addresses improvements in en-
ergy efficiency during the operational phase includes:

• Increased  pavement  longevity,  minimizing  future  maintenance  and  reducing

user costs and delays resulting in significant energy savings.

• Fast-track (expedited) repairs and rehabilitation of concrete pavements to re-
duce construction time and congestion and associated wasted energy from ve-
hicles delayed through work zones.

• Precast  pavements/slabs  for  maximum  durability,  and  rapid  repair  and  re-

placement to minimize disruption to motorists and businesses.

• New  and  improved  in-place  recycling  techniques  that  save  energy  by  elimi-
nating any need to transport materials to and from a crushing and processing
facility.

• New  concrete  overlay  techniques  that  extend  pavement  life  with  the  least
amount  of  materials  and  energy  expended,  while  also  providing  the  energy-
related advantages of concrete pavement surfaces.

• Lower rolling resistance that increases the fuel efficiency of vehicles operating

on the pavement surface.

ergy and lives while lowering energy required for cooling urban areas.

• Highly  reflective  surfaces  that  require  less  illumination,  saving  lighting  en-
• Optimized textures that reduce tire-road noise, maintain frictional character-
istics,  and  provide  pavement  demarcation  to  improve  aesthetics  and  commu-
nity acceptance.
• Photo-catalytic surfaces to treat air pollution, lowering energy required for al-
• Pervious  concrete  surfaces  that  eliminate  energy  consumed  to  treat  point

ternative treatment strategies.

source run-off.

ACPA  also  is  working  closely  with  researchers  at  Arizona  State  University’s  Na-
tional  Center  of  Excellence  on  SMART  Innovations  for  Urban  Climate  and  Energy
to  better  understand  how  pavement  designs  and  materials  contribute  to  surface
temperature changes. Begun in 2005, this research was designed to identify mix de-
sign factors that could allow production of cooler pavement surfaces and a modeling
tool  by  which  to  evaluate  the  surface  temperature  changes.  This  work  will  provide
further  awareness  of  the  urban  heat  island  issue,  and  influence  municipal  ordi-
nances and building codes to adopt environmentally appropriate materials and solu-
tions.

In pursuing this research, ASU has developed a simplified laboratory test method
to  evaluate  the  thermal  conductivity  of  paving  materials  using  conventional  con-
struction  techniques.  ASU  also  collaborated  with  ACPA  to  develop  infrared  images
and place in-pavement sensors for a concrete overlay of an existing asphalt concrete
parking lot in Rio Verde, Arizona. This collaboration provided dramatic information
and  imagery  on  concrete’s  benefit  in  reducing  urban  heat  island  effects  in  a  living
community.
What challenges impede the use of innovative materials for transportation
infrastructure?  What  actions  can  the  Federal  and  State  and  local  govern-
ments  take  to  overcome  these  impediments?  What  is  the  role  of  industry
and academia, especially in technology transfer?

Current  institutional  and  technical  challenges  exist  that  impede  a  more  wide-
spread  use  of  sustainable  and  energy  efficient  pavements.  It  is  our  contention  that
significant  improvements  could  be  achieved  simply  by  including  consideration  of
these  important  factors  in  the  selection  process  used  for  pavements.  At  present,
most  decisions  are  based  on  first  cost,  and  to  a  limited  degree  life  cycle  cost.  How-
ever, factors such as user costs, the energy required to build and operate pavements,
as  well  as  the  energy  consumed  by  vehicles  driving  on  pavement  surfaces  or  used
for lighting roadways, is not appropriately considered. New, more comprehensive se-
lection  processes  could  take  these  real  agency  and  societal  impacts  into  consider-
ation.  A  stronger  federal  position  on  the  use  of  federal  aid  funds  coupled  with  an
objective  and  more  comprehensive  federal  pavement  selection  policy  would  help  in-
sure  that  states  and  other  agencies  effectively  apply  appropriate  considerations  for
energy use and sustainability.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

The  culture  of  considering  ‘‘lowest  first  cost’’  in  place  by  most  State  Departments
of Transportation (DOT’s) must change to impact the use of innovative and current
materials  that  are  more  sustainable.  Traditionally,  State  departments  of  transpor-
tation have considered the construction and maintenance of a roadway as two sepa-
rate  operations,  with  separate  funding  levels  assigned  to  each.  Some  states  have
adopted life cycle cost strategies for some of their pavements, in which both the ini-
tial  construction  costs  and  long-term  maintenance  and  operation  costs  are  included
as  a  way  of  comparing  alternate  pavement  designs  for  a  section,  but  this  has  not
pervaded  all  of  their  decisions.  An  asset  management  and  sustainability  strategy
can only truly be reached when an agency applies this mindset both simultaneously
across  their  roadway  network  and  continuously  throughout  time.  In  doing  so,  the
pavement network is viewed as an asset and a mix of different rehabilitation strate-
gies are employed to sustain its value.

We do not intend to be critical of our partners in the State highway agencies, but
the  fact  remains  that  a  new  mindset  is  needed  to  achieve  more  sustainable  prac-
tices.  We  also  would  be  remiss  if  we  did  not  recognize  the  challenges  faced  locally
with  constrained  funding  that  limits  an  agency’s  initiative  to  adopt  new,  more  sus-
tainable practices.

Application  of  strategic  asset  allocation  to  a  pavement  network  would  allow  the
states  to  maintain  the  network  in  the  highest  overall  condition  possible  at  the  low-
est constant level of dollar flow into the pavement network. Such a system is inher-
ently  dynamic  and  necessarily  would  adhere  to  the  principles  of  sustainability.  The
FHWA  has  recognized  this  need  in  their  publication  A  Quick  Check  of  Your  High-
way  Network  Health10 which  states:  ‘‘By  viewing  the  network  in  this  manner  [with
each pavement as an asset in a collected network], there is a certain comfort derived
from  the  ability  to  match  pavement  actions  with  their  physical/functional  needs.
However,  by  only  focusing  on  projects,  opportunities  for  strategically  managing  en-
tire road networks and asset needs are overlooked.’’

A  number  of  specific  implementation  challenges  currently  impede  the  immediate

adoption of more sustainable pavements. These include:

• Lack  of  a  clear  and  universally  accepted  way  to  ‘‘measure’’  the  sustainability
of  a  roadway.  However,  research  conducted  in  Canada11 provides  many  an-
swers, but has not yet received broad acceptance within the transportation in-
dustry. The Canadians have looked at the embodied primary energy of a road-
way  segment  over  a  50-year  life  cycle  (including  material  extraction,  proc-
essing,  mixing,  placement,  operation,  maintenance  and  salvage).  However,
more work is required in this area.
• Existing  specifications.  In  most  cases,  existing  specifications  unintentionally
limit  the  use  of  more  sustainable  practices.  Paving  specifications  are  often
based  on  dated  information  and  agencies  do  not  often  respond  quickly  to
changes in materials or industry advancements. Current specifications should
be  replaced  as  appropriate  with  specifications  that  require  more  sustainable
practices. One such change that would have immediate benefit is opening up
the  use  of  blended  cements.  Blended  cements  (Portland  cement  blended  with
slag or other supplementary materials during manufacturing) are used exten-
sively  throughout  Canada  and  Europe,  but  are  not  widely  used  by  State
DOT’s in the U.S. As noted earlier, these materials have a lower energy foot-
print than standard cements. Another positive change would be to allow much
great  amounts  of  SCM’s  in  concrete  paving  mixtures.  When  given  the  oppor-
tunity, industry often will find innovative ways to make use of these byprod-
ucts, while improving the pavement quality and saving dollars.
• Training the workforce. The design, construction, maintenance, rehabilitation,
and  recycling  of  sustainable  pavements  requires  great  knowledge  and  skills.
As  such,  the  current  and  future  workforce  must  be  educated  with  respect  to
sustainability and the important role each individual plays in increasing sus-
tainable infrastructure. This includes all members of the workforce, from the
construction  laborers  and  superintendents  through  the  planners  and  design-
ers.  Immediate  and  long-term  benefits  can  be  derived  through  focused  train-
ing programs that bring current and future innovations to light.
• Lack  of  design  and  decision  tools.  There  is  an  acute  need  for  tools  designers
can  use  to  assess  and  improve  the  sustainability  of  pavements.  Although  the
technology exists to create such tools, none are currently widely available and

10 FHWA–IF–07–006, ‘‘A Quick Check of Your Highway Network Health.’’
11 ‘‘A  Life  Cycle  Perspective  on  Concrete  and  Asphalt  Roadways:  Embodied  Primary  Energy

and Global Warming Potential,’’ Athena Institute, September 2006.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

thus there is no systematic way to determine the sustainability of a given de-
sign or to compare design alternatives. Tools need to be developed and imple-
mented  that  are  based  on  international  standards  for  assessing  the  life  cycle
costs and benefits of design alternatives.

• Demonstration projects and commensurate technology transfer workshops can
be  used  to  demonstrate  current  and  emerging  technologies  that  improve  the
sustainability of concrete pavements.
• Gaps in research, as outlined earlier.

Many  of  the  achievements  of  the  CP  Tech  Center  were  accomplished  through  a
cooperative  agreement  with  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  and  used  federal
research  funds  to  leverage  funding  from  others,  including  our  industry.  We  greatly
appreciate  the  efforts  of  Congress  to  support  of  research  and  development  for  im-
proved  pavements.  We  are  confident  that  with  our  public  sector  partners,  we  can
close  gaps  in  the  technology  and  practice  that  will  break  down  barriers  to  use  of
innovative and more sustainable materials and practices.

Closing Remarks

Mr. Chairman, to summarize these remarks, I submit that the stakeholders in our
nation’s surface transportation network currently stand at an important fork in the
road.

We can let our surface transportation network condition erode through the perpet-
uation of current practices that ultimately will have dire consequences to the safety
and personal mobility of our citizens, as well as the ability of our nation to compete
in  the  global  economy.  Or,  we  can  reinvest  in  new  practices  that  contribute  to  sus-
tainable development of our surface transportation systems.

In many ways, sustainable pavement technology is already available in a familiar
building  material  called  concrete.  We  need  to  fill  some  research  gaps  and  develop
the  mechanisms  to  put  more  sustainable  practices  into  common  use.  If  we  accept
this challenge, we will once again create a system that stands peerless above all oth-
ers and neither detracts from our environment nor impedes future generations from
achieving the standards of living that we have enjoyed as a direct result of our sur-
face transportation network.

The  concrete  pavement  industry  stands  ready  and  willing  to  invest  the  time  and
other resources to advance our products and processes in pursuit of even more sus-
tainable practices. We look forward to the support of the public sector to realize the
American  vision  of  the  best  highways  and  roadways  in  the  world.  Thank  you  for
your time, for providing this opportunity to our industry, and for your kind consider-
ation.

Professional Summary

BIOGRAPHY FOR GERALD F. VOIGT

American Concrete Pavement Association, 1988 to Present

Capstone: Serving the ACPA for almost two decades, I have been involved in every
facet of the Association’s business, predominantly in technical and management po-
sitions.  During  my  entire  tenure,  I  have  consistently  balanced  the  dynamic  needs
of the industry by developing and implementing new ideas; leading by example; and
staying  true  to  our  founding  principles  of  service,  hard  work,  and  extra  effort  for
the betterment of the industry and the pavements we produce. I have concentrated
my  work  on  technology  and  technology  transfer  for  all  three  primary  segments  of
our mission: airports, highways and streets.
• President & Chief Executive Officer, 2005 to present
• Chief Operating Officer/Senior Vice President of Technical Services, 2004
• Chief  Operating  Officer/Vice  President  of  Technical  Operations,  2000–

2003

Role and responsibilities:

• Formulate and oversee annual budget and manage general operations and fi-

nances.

• Manage diverse professional staff.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

tivity.

• Work as proactive appointed member of ACPA Board of Directors and Execu-
tive  Committee  to  develop  and  implement  policies,  programs,  and  budgetary
guidelines.
• Guide overall work programs and implement process flows to improve produc-
• Lead all areas of Association’s focus, including technical & research programs,
• Provide  some  key  hands-on  technical  support,  troubleshooting  and  research
• Serve as Trustee for employee (ACPA and chapter/state) 401–k plan.

promotion programs, communications, and government relations.

management.

Key Achievements:

Technology Center in 2005.

• Successfully  lead  ACPA  through  the  creation  of  National  Concrete  Pavement
• Reorganized staff structure for improved service to members and industry.
• Formulated a streamlined budgeting process.
• Developed first-ever ACPA employee/management review process.
• Solidified  relationships  and  built  trust  with  chapters  and  key  industry  part-

ners (FHWA, EPA and State DOTs).

• Vice President—Technical Operations/Chief Knowledge Officer, 1999–2000

Role and responsibilities:

• Manage staff work programs
• Direct ACPA’s technical information and information technology programs.

Key Achievements:

search Foundation.

• Worked  with  colleagues  to  develop  and  initiate  the  Innovative  Pavement  Re-
• Created  ACPA’s  first  (and  currently  used)  highway  market  measurement
• Initiated ACPA’s first ‘‘Knowledge Management’’ program, integrating the lat-
est  computer-  and  network-based  technology  to  streamline  and  expedite  the
flow of information.

process and associated quarterly report, ‘‘Pavement Market Quarterly.’’

• Director of Technical Services, 1988–1999

Role and Responsibilities:

• Assisted ACPA members and agencies with questions and technical issues re-
lated  to  pavement  construction  and  design  concerns,  saving  member  contrac-
tors millions of dollars in unnecessary removal and replacement costs.
• Researched,  produced  and  published  technical  publications  and  guide  speci-
• Prepared and presented more than 400 technical presentations, white papers,
and training sessions on concrete pavement design, construction, and rehabili-
tation.

fications in all segments (airports, highways and streets).

Key Achievements:

• Developed relationships with State DOT, FAA, FHWA and industry contacts.
• Produced  more  than  35  technical  publications  and  guide  specifications,  most
• Provided  technical  assistance  or  guidance  in  response  to  more  than  8,000  in-

of which are still actively used in the industry and among agencies.

quiries or requests during this period.

Midwest Consulting Engineers, Inc., 1987–1988

Capstone:  Before  accepting  a  position  with  the  ACPA,  I  served  in  an  engineering
position  with  this  Chicago-based  design  and  construction  consulting-engineering
firm. During my tenure, I worked on several major design and construction projects,
while  also  providing  administrative  and  technical  support  to  colleagues,  and  intro-
ducing the company to computer spreadsheets for cost estimating and geometric de-
sign.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

• Staff Design Engineer, 1987–1988

Role and responsibilities:

• Served in key role on a team responsible for the design of pavement rehabili-

tation strategies for Illinois Department of Transportation.

• Provided  administrative  and  office  management  support  to  principals  of  the

firm.

Key Achievements:

• Developed concrete pavement rehabilitation strategies used by the firm.
• Designed  geometrics  for  two  major  arterial  roadway  and  expressway  inter-

change improvement projects still in service in suburban Chicago.

Significant Skill Sets and Experience

• Personnel and fiscal management experience.
• Expansive  range  of  technical  knowledge  in  all  phases  of  pavement  design,

construction, rehabilitation and materials.

• Broad range of hands-on research and management of research projects.
• Extensive experience in Association management issues.
• Widely published technical author and experienced speaker and presenter.
• Clear and concise communicator.

Education

• Master  of  Science,  Civil  Engineering,  conferred  by  the  University  of  Illinois,

• Bachelor of Science, Civil Engineering, conferred (with honors) by the Univer-

1986

sity of Illinois, 1985

Professional Registration

• Registered Professional Engineer (Civil) in the State of Illinois.
Chairman WU. Thank you, Mr. Voigt.
We have another vote called on the Floor, and we also have a re-
quest  from  the  Minority  side  that  we  pause  the  testimony  at  this
point  so  that  a  larger  number  of  Members  can  listen  to  the  wit-
nesses and participate in the Q&A, and that is a request which the
Chair  intends  to  honor.  So  with  your  forbearance,  we  are  going  to
pause the testimony for a moment and continue when the Members
have had an opportunity to return. Thank you for your forbearance.

[Recess.]
Chairman WU. At this point I would like to resume witness testi-

mony. Dr. Poe, please proceed.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  CHRISTOPHER  M.  POE,  P.E.,  ASSISTANT
AGENCY  DIRECTOR;  SENIOR  RESEARCH  ENGINEER,  RE-
SEARCH  AND  IMPLEMENTATION  DIVISION–DALLAS,  HOUS-
TON, TEXAS TRANSPORTATION INSTITUTE, TEXAS A&M UNI-
VERSITY SYSTEM
Dr.  POE.  Chairman  Wu,  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank

you very much for the opportunity to testify today.

As  you  know,  the  Nation’s  transportation  system  has  a  substan-
tial  impact  not  only  on  our  economy  but  on  the  environment  as
well.  In  addition  to  impacting  air  and  water  quality,  it  affects  our
energy  efficiency  and  sustainability.  The  Texas  Transportation  In-
stitute’s  environmental  research  encompasses  air,  water  and  soil

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

71

studies  as  well  as  roadway  landscaping  and  environmental  man-
agement and control.

In my written testimony, I provided examples of how TTI is test-
ing  new  pavements  that  reduce  water  runoff,  noise  and  air  pollu-
tion. TTI is also studying how technologies and products reduce soil
erosion  and  impacts  on  ecosystems.  However,  in  the  interest  of
time, I would like to focus this morning on the issue of traffic con-
gestion  and  how  it  is  affecting  the  environment.  Some  might  say
some congestion is a sign of growth and economic development but
it is also a sign of waste. In 2005 alone, we as a nation wasted 2.9
billion  gallons  of  fuel  in  the  urban  areas  of  our  country  and  that
does  not  count  the  rural  areas  where  traffic  tie-ups  and  a  number
of other causes stress our road network.

TTI  has  worked  to  help  mitigate  this  problem  through  more  ac-
curate  data  gathering,  improved  reporting  and  developing  Intel-
ligent  Transportation  System  technologies  to  link  the  various  com-
ponents of the transportation system together. We are also working
to solve this problem through projects such as the Dallas area Inte-
grated  Corridor  Management  Project,  which  will  provide  State,
transit  and  local  agencies  comparative  travel  data  which  they  can
then  provide  to  the  public  to  help  travelers  avoid  congestion  and
select  the  best  routes  and  modes.  By  using  cities  such  as  Dallas,
San  Antonio  and  Houston  as  real-time  laboratories,  research  find-
ings  and  technology  transfer  occurs  instantaneously  as  we  work
with  our  counterparts  from  local  transportation  agencies  and  pri-
vate industry on a daily basis.

What  is  the  benefit-cost  ratio  of  decreasing  congestion?  Well,  in
a  series  of  studies  from  2003  to  2006,  for  the  Texas  Governor’s
Business Council, the Texas Department of Transportation and the
Texas Metropolitan Planning Organization, researchers at TTI esti-
mated that investment of $66 billion in efforts to eliminate conges-
tion  and  improve  mobility  would  generate  $540  billion  in  savings
from  lower  travel  delay,  reduced  fuel  consumption  and  increased
business efficiency, an eight to one return on investment. By reduc-
ing  stop-and-go  driving,  researchers  estimate  that  Texans  could
save  as  much  as  $37  billion  in  fuel  consumption  alone,  and  that
was done when gasoline was at $3 a gallon.

What  are  the  impediments  to  solving  this  problem?  Well,  the
first  is  money.  Sixty-six  billion  dollars  is  a  lot  of  money.  Secondly,
at  a  time  with  increasing  gas  and  grocery  prices,  we  must  effec-
tively  communicate  the  need,  how  it  will  be  addressed  and  the  re-
sulting  benefits.  To  communicate  more  effectively,  we  must  first
improve  even  further  our  ability  to  gather  data,  interpret  the  im-
pacts of transportation on the environment today, and more impor-
tantly,  how  transportation  improvements  will  affect  the  environ-
ment  tomorrow.  This  will  give  us  firm  footing  in  terms  of
benchmarking progress.

As for the solutions, there is not a one-size-fits-all approach that
works.  Decreasing  congestion,  emissions  and  fuel  consumption  will
require  all  the  stakeholders,  public  and  private,  federal,  State  and
local, to come together, share information and work together to en-
sure that we as a nation can continue to grow our economy but do
it in a way that protects our environment.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

TTI  was  established  58  years  ago  as  the  research  arm  of  the
State  of  Texas.  Even  from  the  early  days,  the  groundwork  of  the
business  plan  of  the  Institute  had  been  established,  that  is  to  say
that  we  primarily  are  sponsor  driven.  Today  research  funding
comes from Federal, State and local governments or private indus-
try. While this approach works well to address short-term and mid-
term solutions, we are also fortunate that we have received federal
funding through projects such as the Translink Laboratory and Re-
search Center and the University Transportation Center for Mobil-
ity.  These  projects  provide  multi-year  funding  which  enables  re-
searchers  at  the  Institute  to  look  at  nationwide  problems  in  the
long-term.  Addressing  the  impact  of  our  nation’s  transportation
system  on  the  environment  will  require  a  comprehensive,  multi-
year program. Even at TTI with our long history and broad ranging
environmental  research  program,  we  have  had  to  seek  solutions
one  project  at  a  time.  Without  a  national,  comprehensive,  long-
range approach, our program will only be successful at incremental
advances  rather  than  providing  major  solutions.  That  is  why  your
effort to advance green transportation is so important. The Univer-
sity  Transportation  Center,  as  part  of  that  initiative,  provides
multi-year  funding  which  is  important  to  solving  long-term  prob-
lems.  It  also  provides  a  well-established  process  for  getting  re-
search  into  practice  and  training  the  transportation  industry.  In
addition,  this  research  program  model  has  been  successful  in  pro-
viding  the  research  and  academic  community  more  input  into  set-
ting  the  research  agenda  at  the  federal  and  State  levels  while  en-
suring  continued  cooperation  and  input  of  all  the  other  stake-
holders in our nation’s transportation system.

With  that,  I  will  conclude  my  remarks.  I  appreciate  the  oppor-

tunity.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Poe follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHRISTOPHER M. POE

Mr. Chairman, distinguished Members of the Subcommittee, I would like to thank
you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  It  is  indeed  an  honor.  I  would  also  like  to
commend  you  all  for  your  efforts  to  address  the  environmental  impact  of  our  na-
tion’s transportation infrastructure through H.R. 5161, the Green Transportation In-
frastructure  Research  and  Technology  Transfer  Act.  I  believe  this  legislation  will
help address many of the issues this Subcommittee is examining today, such as the
need  for  improved  coordination  among  Federal,  State,  and  local  governments;  the
private  sector  and  university-based  research  organizations,  as  well  as  the  need  to
shorten the time to find and implement solutions.

The Texas Transportation Institute’s (TTI’s) environmental research encompasses
air,  water  and  soil  studies,  as  well  as  roadway  landscaping  issues,  environmental
design  and  other  aspects  of  the  field.  TTI  is  nationally  recognized  for  its  state-of-
the-art  testing  facilities,  experts  in  transportation-related  environmental  concerns
and an interdisciplinary approach to environmental research.

TTI’s Environmental Management program conducts landmark transportation re-
search  in  areas  such  as  storm  water  quality  and  erosion-control  materials,  housing
a  full-scale  evaluation  facility.  Research  from  the  Air  Quality  Studies  Program  ex-
pands  analytical  approaches  to  transportation  air  quality  analysis  and  provides  re-
sults  that  help  to  more  effectively  evaluate  air  quality  policies  and  emission  reduc-
tion  measures.  The  University  Transportation  Center  for  Mobility  focuses  on  infra-
structure congestion, which is a major cause of wasted fuel each day.

Offices  housed  in  several  of  the  state’s  air  quality  non-attainment  areas  provide
TTI  with  awareness  of  local  concerns  and  targeted  solutions.  Personnel  throughout
the agency conduct research on wide-ranging environmentally related topics such as
public transit, urban planning and traffic patterns.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

We  consider  Green  Transportation  Infrastructure  as  the  design,  construction,  op-
eration,  and  maintenance  of  transportation  infrastructure  to  mitigate  air  pollution,
ground  water  contamination,  and  surface  water  contamination  with  an  end  result
of reducing congestion, flooding, erosion, and impacts to ecosystems.

First, let me summarize my key points.

• Green Transportation Infrastructure includes a diverse group of stakeholders
that  must  act  together  to  fully  address  the  impact  of  transportation  on  the
environment. I would like to commend the Committee for its efforts to elevate
the topic through a University Transportation Center.

• Congestion  problems  will  continue  to  challenge  our  metropolitan  regions  in
the  future.  Travel  delays  and  unpredictable  travel  times  for  people  and
freight  will  be  a  problem  leading  to  increased  emissions  and  fuel  consump-
tion. With the increase in gas prices, the impact will only become more costly
to the average citizen.

• Research is needed to quantify the benefits of green transportation strategies.
The  transportation  industry  needs  solid  evidence  on  the  impact  of  tech-
nologies, strategies, and materials.

• There  are  design,  operational  strategies,  technologies,  materials,  and  con-
struction  techniques  that  will  reduce  transportation’s  impact  on  the  environ-
ment. Technology transfer of research and best practices is needed to increase
implementation of green transportation.

I  would  like  to  expand  on  these  ideas  in  five  key  elements:  the  congestion  prob-
lem, improvements in design and operations, improvements in pavements, improve-
ments in construction materials, and future research needs and the federal role.

The Congestion Problem

Most,  if  not  all  of  you,  have  driven  through  the  District  during  rush  hour,  so  I
need not point out that congestion is a major problem, not only in our nation’s cap-
ital  but  in  cities  across  the  Nation.  Technically  we  might  use  words  that  describe
elements of problems or solutions like accessibility, mobility, reliability, connectivity,
and seamless productivity. These are all useful distinctions and point to viable and
important  solutions,  but  the  meaning  of  these  various  words  may  be  lost  on  people
and  freight  shippers  who  understand  their  congestion  problem,  but  do  not  parse  it
in  the  way  that  experts  do.  People  are  concerned  when  it  takes  them  longer  to  get
where they want to go than they think it should. I think it is important to recognize
this difference between what people call the problem and how we attack it.

Our research suggests that no matter what you call it, we’ve got several problems.

A quick summary:

• We waste quite a lot of time—3.7 billion hours in 85 cities in 2005
• We use more fuel than we should—2.3 billion gallons in those 85 cities
• This has value—$63 billion in 85 cities in 2005
• We  cannot  reliably  predict  travel  time  very  accurately  due  to  several  factors
such  as  crashes,  vehicle  breakdowns,  weather,  special  events  and  road  work.
• Jobs,  shops  and  homes  are  spread  out  for  a  variety  of  understandable  rea-

sons, many of which make transportation service more difficult to provide.

• There  are  fewer  travel  options  than  people  say  they  want,  but  many  of  the

existing options are underutilized.

• We have to plan around congestion during most daylight hours and on week-

ends.

A  2003  study  for  the  Texas  Governor’s  Business  Council  used  information  devel-
oped by the State’s metropolitan planning organizations and the Texas DOT to esti-
mate the benefits of improving mobility. To keep the relatively high level of conges-
tion  experienced  in  major  Texas  cities  from  getting  worse  will  require  an  increase
in  spending  from  $108  billion  to  $123  billion  between  now  and  2030.  The  more  de-
sirable outcome of eliminating serious congestion will increase spending to $174 bil-
lion.  That  $66  billion  increase  generates  $540  billion  in  savings  from  lower  travel
delay,  reduced  fuel  consumption  and  business  efficiency,  an  eight  to  one  return
ratio.  Reductions  in  fuel  purchases  that  would  result  from  less  stop-and-go  driving
were estimated at $37 billion alone, more than half of the cost of the program.

Addressing  the  congestion  problems  can  provide  substantial  benefits  and  provide
improvements  in  many  sectors  of  society  and  the  economy.  The  costs  involved  in
eliminating  serious  congestion  problems  are  large  and  the  projects,  programs  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

74

policies that are implemented will require the cooperation of the public, agencies at
all levels of government and, in many states, the private sector as well.

The  Texas  Governor’s  Business  Council  study  estimated  that  solving  the  serious
congestion problems in the State’s eight largest metropolitan regions would generate
$540 billion in economic benefits—including $37 billion in reduced fuel consumption
and  $104  billion  in  travel  time  savings  (Figure  1).  The  analysis  estimated  almost
$80  billion  in  business  efficiencies  and  operating  savings  would  result  from  lower
congestion  levels.  More  than  $320  billion  in  construction  benefits,  which  include
more than 110,000 jobs that would be created, were also identified.

Design and Operation of Transportation Infrastructure

Some  may  say  congestion  is  a  byproduct  of  success  and  economic  development.
However,  accommodating  the  growth  does  not  have  to  produce  the  same  past  re-
sults.  Public  agencies  need  to  find  new  ways  of  designing  and  operating  the  trans-
portation system to accommodate the growth. An example of this in the Dallas area
is the Integrated Corridor Management project jointly funded by the U.S. DOT and
Dallas Area Rapid Transit and in cooperation with the North Central Texas Council
of  Governments,  North  Texas  Tollway  Authority,  Texas  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  and  the  cities  of  Dallas,  Richardson,  Plano  Highland  Park,  and  University
Park.  The  goal  of  this  project  is  to  operate  the  U.S.  75  corridor  in  a  collaborative
manner among all agencies to save the traveler from congestion. For the first time,
all  agencies  will  have  comparative  travel  data  for  freeways,  toll  roads,  arterials
streets, and transit. By knowing the fastest way to travel and sharing this with the
public,  travelers  will  be  able  to  avoid  congestion  by  traveling  on  different  routes,
traveling at different times, or traveling by transit.

Improvements in New Pavement Surfaces

New pavement surfaces can improve safety and improve the environment. Porous
friction  courses  (PFC)  are  special  asphalt  mixtures  characterized  by  high  air-voids
content  (i.e.,  air  gaps  between  the  asphalt  material)  as  compared  to  the  most  com-
monly  used  dense-graded  hot  mix  asphalt.  Placed  as  a  surface  layer,  the  PFC  mix-
ture reduces the risk of hydroplaning and wet skidding, decreases splash and spray,
and improves the visibility of pavement markings in wet weather. These safety ben-
efits  (as  evident  in  Figure  2)  are  realized  as  water  travels  through  the  connected
air voids within the pavement layer instead of over the surface.

PFC  also  serves  as  a  filtering  mechanism  for  storm  water  runoff.  The  quality  of
storm  water  runoff  monitored  before  and  after  installation  of  PFC  on  a  highway  in
Austin showed a much lower concentration of total suspended solids and pollutants
associated  with  particulate  material  after  installation  of  the  PFC.  PFC  pavements

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

75

also provide a significant reduction in traffic noise that is readily and reliably meas-
urable at the roadside and is the primary reason for their increasing use in Europe.
The safety and environmental benefits associated with PFC result from the high-
air voids in the pavement layer which allow for water and air to infiltrate and move
through this layer. These same characteristics also have the potential to reduce the
life of the pavement surface by causing oxidative aging of the asphalt binder (caus-
ing  brittleness  and  stone  loss  in  the  surface)  or  by  the  action  of  water  with  traffic
destroying  the  bond  between  the  asphalt  binder  and  the  stone  (leading  to  potholes)
or  destroying  the  bond  of  the  PFC  layer  to  the  underlying  surface  (causing
delamination  or  separation  of  the  pavement  material).  TTI  has  an  extensive,  ongo-
ing  research  effort  aimed  at  optimizing  the  mix  design  and  construction  practices
for  PFC,  as  well  as  characterizing  the  properties  of  the  asphalt  binder  and  stone
which  are  needed  to  guarantee  the  safety  and  environmental  functionality  without
sacrificing durability.

Improvement in Pavement Construction

Warm mix asphalt pavement technology can reduce air pollution and save energy.
Traditional hot-mix asphalt is typically produced in either batch or drum mix plants
at  temperatures  ranging  from  280°F  to  325°F.  It  has  been  necessary  to  use  these
elevated  temperatures  to  dry  the  aggregates,  coat  them  with  the  asphalt  binder,
achieve  the  desired  workability,  and  provide  sufficient  time  to  compact  the  HMA
mat.  A  new  technology,  warm  mix  asphalt  can  reduce  the  production  temperature
to as low as 200°F. This reduction in both production (mixing) and paving (compac-
tion) temperatures yields beneficial environmental effects:
• decreased fuel or energy consumption at the plant;
• reduced emissions and odors from plants; and
• improved working conditions at the paving site.

While  preliminary  field  trials  (Figure  3)  have  indicated  that  these  mixtures  per-
form as well as conventional mixes, the technology is in its infancy and some of the
laboratory  tests  that  engineers  use  to  predict  performance  indicate  a  cause  for  con-
cern.  The  warm  mix  asphalt  tends  to  exhibit  lower  strength  and  a  propensity  for
moisture  susceptibility  in  laboratory  tests.  TTI  is  conducting  a  comprehensive  field
and  laboratory  study  to  ensure  that  the  improved  benefits  of  warm  mix  asphalt  do
not cause a sacrifice in pavement performance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

76

Environmental Management in Construction

When examining the impact of our surface transportation infrastructure on water

quality, one should keep these numbers in mind:

• 1 soil—is the number one pollutant of receiving waters
• 2 acres—the size of a stormwater runoff oil slick created by a quart of motor

oil

• 3 million dollars—the largest stormwater fine ever assessed by EPA was lev-
ied  on  Wal-Mart  for  runoff  violations  at  construction  sites  across  the  country

• 4 metals—lead, mercury, iron, manganese can be found in runoff
• 5 pollution prevention benefits of vegetation—includes protecting soil from the
impact of raindrops, slowing down storm water runoff, anchoring soil in place,
intercepting soil before it runs off, increasing filtration rate of soil

Roadway Grasses: A Marriage of Function and Beauty

Grass. It isn’t just for mowing anymore.
In  fact,  the  sometimes  lush  and  pretty  patches  along  roadways  are  an  important
frontline  defense  in  the  battle  to  improve  water  quality.  But  which  varieties  work
best? For example, which seed mix of grasses will stand up to brutal Texas weather
and  regimented  mowing  heights?  And  just  how  much  grass  is  needed  to  effectively
filter roadway stormwater runoff?

The  Texas  Department  of  Transportation  (TxDOT)  sponsored  a  study  conducted

by the Texas Transportation Institute (TTI) studying these very questions.

The native alternative

While the concept of using native seed sounds great, two things need to be consid-
ered  in  its  use,  however.  Number  one,  when  a  contractor  goes  in  and  strips  off  the
soil,  gets  it  down  to  subgrade,  pours  concrete  and  does  everything  else  you  have  to
do to build a road—you no longer have a native environment. Number two, in their
natural environment, native seeds are left alone and allowed to grow. But highway
rights-of-way are mowed three or four times per year. This changes the development
of the native vegetation.

In  a  research  project  which  concluded  in  August  of  2005,  researchers  studied  na-
tive  seed  species  along  with  the  standard,  TxDOT-approved  seed  mix.  Using  soil
samples  taken  from  Austin,  Abilene,  Lufkin  and  Corpus  Christi,  TTI  researchers
tested the different seed mixes at greenhouse facilities and outdoor laboratories.

In  addition,  test  plots  were  planted  in  Georgetown,  north  of  Austin,  using  both
commercially  available  native  seed  mixes  and  the  standard  TxDOT  seed  mix.  Re-
searchers also monitored a second set of test plots at TTI’s Erosion Control Labora-
tory on the Riverside campus.

The  laboratory  at  TTI  is  a  unique  testing  facility  that  helps  us  cut  down  on  re-
search costs and yet still conduct accurate testing. One section of the test plots was
mowed according to TxDOT specifications and the typical mowing schedule. This en-
sured  that  the  performance  of  the  seed  mixes  is  evaluated  under  the  normal  condi-
tions grasses would encounter along roadways.

Vegetation along roadways plays an essential role in stabilizing soil banks, stem-
ming  erosion  and  protecting  habitats  and  waterways  from  too  much  sediment.  Be-
yond beauty, this is ultimately grass’ most important function.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Grass filters

77

Most environmental researchers agree that sediment is the number one pollutant
of  receiving  waters.  While  some  techniques,  like  construction  sequencing,  can  help
minimize  sediment  runoff  during  construction,  establishing  vegetation  is  the  single
most important step toward protecting waterways from harmful runoff.

Water streaming off the hard-packed surface of roads can grab sediment and pick
up  heavy  metals  and  organic  compounds  (like  motor  oil),  and  would  eventually  de-
posit such sediment in pipes, drainage systems and water bodies were it not for one
potent defense mechanism along roads: grassy filters.

The premise of this research was to study how vegetative buffer strips affect run-
off  from  highways.  Preliminary  findings  show  that  the  more  grass  water  runs
through,  the  cleaner  it  gets.  Leaving  vegetation  buffer  strips  near  roads  is  a  good
management practice.

To study how effective grassy strips are at filtering runoff, researchers buried 30-
foot  lengths  of  eight-inch  PVC  pipe  at  two,  four,  and  eight  meters  from  roadway
pavement  edges  along  Hwy  6  in  College  Station,  Texas,  and  Hwy  360  in  Austin.
Rainwater  is  collected  during  test  periods  and  is  then  sent  to  the  Lower  Colorado
River Authority in Austin for chemical analysis.

Research  into  how  vegetated  roadside  swales  (shallow  depressions  that  carry
water  mainly  during  rainstorms)  can  function  to  filter  storm  water  runoff,  reduce
the  need  for  end-of-channel  water  quality  structures,  and  improve  the  overall  qual-
ity  of  runoff  from  the  highway  system  is  important.  Understanding  the  properties
of and having good documentation of roadside water quality performance can poten-
tially  reduce  the  cost  and  size  of  end-of-channel  water  quality  structures  on  the
highway  system.  The  results  of  this  project  showed  that  up  to  a  certain  distance,
grass can be quite effective at trapping and filtering sediment.

Introducing Native Plant Life to Roadsides

Traveling  down  the  highway  can  be  tedious—miles  and  miles  of  road,  tens  of
thousands  of  lane  markers  and  traffic  signs.  Sometimes  the  scenery  is  the  only
thing that keeps you awake. But the Texas Department of Transportation (TxDOT)
sponsored a study conducted by the Texas Transportation Institute (TTI) to use na-
tive  plants  to  recreate  the  visual  character  of  the  regional  native  landscape.  Prior
to  this  time,  the  typical  approach  to  interchange  landscape  design  was  to  create  a
park-like setting dominated by canopy trees. Maintenance required mowing the area
at the same frequency as other sections of corridor.

This  project  explored  the  use  of  local  plants  in  landscaping  the  roadside  rather
than using a one-size-fits-all approach. This would not only give the roadside a ‘local
look,’  but  would  also  facilitate  the  growth  and  maintenance  of  the  landscaped  area
by using plant life native to the area.

An  interchange  in  Austin  was  used  as  the  test  case.  A  context-sensitive  design
was  used  to  enhance  both  the  local  community  and  the  natural  environment.  Lo-
cated in an urban area amid office buildings and shopping centers, the interchange
presented  some  design  challenges.  TxDOT  wanted  to  reduce  maintenance  while  de-
veloping  a  publicly  acceptable  landscape  aesthetic.  The  first  three  goals  of  the  de-
sign plan were established as eliminating the need for hand maintenance wherever
possible,  especially  near  travel  lanes,  preventing  erosion  on  slopes  and  improving
the appearance and maintainability of the detention ponds.

Researchers worked with various stakeholders—City of Austin Parks Department
representatives, representatives of the Lady Bird Johnson Wildflower Research Cen-
ter,  the  Texas  Parks  and  Wildlife  Department,  and  representatives  of  local,  grass-
roots environmental programs—to finalize the site design.

Water quality was identified as the key environmental issue since so much water
flowed  through  the  site.  The  plan  called  for  enhancing  the  siltation  function  of  the
ponds  by  installing  a  rock  filter  dam  and  reducing  mowing.  The  aesthetic  goal  was
to  recreate  the  visual  character  and,  as  much  as  possible,  the  ecological  character
of the Texas Hill Country live oak savanna.

Aesthetically,  the  site  today  resembles  some  commonly  seen  rural  landscapes  of
native  plant  communities.  The  new  maintenance  schedule  reduces  the  frequency  of
mowing, which, in turn, reduces management costs to TxDOT and taxpayers.

This  project  demonstrated  that  we  can  improve  maintenance,  make  the  roadside
look better, reduce erosion, and improve the environment for native plants and wild-
life, even in urban areas.

Future Research Needs and Federal Role

The  Green  Transportation  Infrastructure  initiative  is  bold  idea  that  will  impact
how  surface  transportation  is  designed,  built,  and  operated.  Thus,  it  is  imperative

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

78

that the industry fully understand the benefits of ‘‘going Green.’’ There is significant
research needed to fully explore the impact and benefit that will result from Green
Transportation  implementation.  The  research  must  take  a  holistic  approach  to  en-
sure direct benefits and secondary benefits are fully analyzed.

Furthermore, once the relationships between Green Transportation strategies and
the resultant impact are known, this information must get into the hands of trans-
portation design and construction industry. Research is only as good as the ones im-
plementing  it.  The  university  transportation  center  network  has  well  established
processes  and  delivery  methods  to  disseminate  and  train  the  transportation  indus-
try.

The  research  and  academic  community  has  not  always  had  direct  input  into  set-
ting the research agenda at the federal and State level. To ensure that Green Trans-
portation Infrastructure builds on successful past research and truly addresses gaps
in  research  going  forward  it  is  imperative  that  the  academic  community  has  input.
The  University  Transportation  Centers  have  successfully  created  the  environment
where academia and industry can collaboratively set research agendas.

BIOGRAPHY FOR CHRISTOPHER M. POE

Professional Interests

• Freeway management systems
• Intelligent transportation systems
• Advanced traffic management systems
• Geometric design
• High occupancy vehicle lanes

Education

• Ph.D.,  Civil  Engineering,  The  Pennsylvania  State  University,  University

Park, Pennsylvania, 1999.

• M.Eng., Civil Engineering, Texas A&M University, 1987.
• B.S., Civil Engineering, Texas A&M University, 1986.

Experience

• Assistant  Agency  Director,  Research  and  Implementation  Division—Dallas,

Houston, Texas Transportation Institute, December 2006–Present.

• Senior  Research  Engineer,  Research  and  Implementation  Division—Dallas,

Houston, Texas Transportation Institute, June 2005–Present.

• Senior  Research  Engineer,  Research  and  Implementation  Division—Dallas,

Houston, Texas Transportation Institute, June 2005–November 2006.

• Center  Director,  TransLink  Research  Center,  Texas  Transportation  Insti-

tute, December 1996–August 1999.

• Associate  Research  Engineer,  System  Monitoring  Program,  Texas  Transpor-

tation Institute, January 1996–August 1999.

• Research  Assistant,  Pennsylvania  Transportation  Institute,  1993–January

• Assistant  Research  Engineer,  System  Operation  Management,  Texas  Trans-

portation Institute, September 1991–August 1993.

• Engineering  Research  Associate,  System  Operation  Management,  Texas

Transportation Institute, December 1987–August 1991.

• Research Assistant, System Monitoring Program, Texas Transportation Insti-

tute, September 1986–December 1987.

• Junior  Structural  Engineer,  Hudson  Products  Corporation,  1985–December

1996.

1985.

• Junior Structural Engineer, Raymond Kaiser Engineers, 1984–May 1984.

Consulting

• Parsons Brinkerhoff Farradyne, Dallas, Texas, October 2002–May 2005.
• Parsons Brinkerhoff Farradyne, Dallas, Texas, August 1999–October 2002.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

79

Professional Registration
Registered Professional Engineer in Texas, Registration No. 70345.

Selected Publications
E.J.  Seymour,  J.D.  Carvell,  D.W.  Borchardt,  R.E.  Brydia,  C.M.  Poe,  M.D.  Bomar.
Development  of  Guidelines  for  Data  Access  for  Texas  Traffic  Management  Cen-
ters.  Research  Report.  0–5213–1.  Texas  Transportation  Institute,  College  Sta-
tion, TX. May 2007.

Selected Presentations
Technologies  for  Managed  Lanes.  Presented  at  ITS  America  Annual  Meeting,  Palm

Springs, California, June 2007.

Advanced Public Transportation Through Technology. Presented at Texas Transpor-

tation Summit, Irving, Texas, August 2006.

DISCUSSION

Chairman  WU.  Thank  you  very,  Dr.  Poe,  and  at  this  point  we
will  begin  with  the  first  round  of  questions,  and  as  Chair,  I  recog-
nize myself for five minutes.

For the next major surface transportation reauthorization, which
is coming up very soon, I would like to ask of each of the witnesses
what  you  all  think  are  the  key  research  priorities  for  the  Nation
for surface transportation in this next bill, especially in the context
of  reducing  life  cycle  energy  use  and  promoting  sustainability.
Whoever  is  right  can  proceed,  but  if  Mr.  Brubaker,  you  would  like
to start, perhaps we can just sweep from my left to my right.

Mr. BRUBAKER. Okay, Mr. Chairman, sounds great. I would sug-
gest that, I think we have laid the ground for, as we have laid out
our  priorities  for  research  in  the  Department,  particularly  in  the
areas  of  materials.  We  have  divided  up  the  research  portfolio  into
communities of interest, one of which is materials, and focusing on
that  and  ensuring  that  there  is,  you  know,  enough  visibility  and
enough  investment  going  into  that  particular  arena,  both  in  terms
of basic research development, some applied research development,
particularly  focusing  on  the  applied  side  and  then  the  technology
transfer  activities,  and  I  think  that  would  be  most  helpful,  as  well
as  the  continuation  of  the  Intelligent  Transportation  System  port-
folio  but  to  make  sure  that  it  is  focused  in  such  a  way  as  you  de-
scribed in your opening statement.

Chairman WU. Thank you.
Mr. Iwasaki.
Mr.  IWASAKI.  I  think  that  the  way  the  research  program  is  set
up  currently,  it  is  a  good  one.  The  problem  is,  it  doesn’t  have
enough money, and I mentioned in my testimony that the Strategic
Highway Research program was set up for $450 million and it was
reduced  to  $150  million.  There  are  some  key  components  that  are
left  out  that  we  could  take  a  look  at  not  only  on  congestion  relief
but on the material side as well, and being able to do our jobs fast-
er, better and for less money. So I think that make it performance-
based  however  you  do  it  but  I  think  we  ought  to  add  more  money
to  the  research  program  nationwide.  Percentage-wide  in  the  trans-
portation  business,  it  is  a  small  amount  of  money  versus  what
other  facets  of  industry  looks  at.  The  other  thing  is,  those  dem-
onstration  projects  are  pretty  critical  and  we  would  be  willing  to
submit  any  performance-based  criteria  proposal  to  Congress  to  get

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

80

some  of  that  money.  I  think  California  competes  very  well  and  we
love  to  compete  and  we  are  very  aggressive  at  it,  and  so  maybe
more  deployment  or  demonstration  projects  and  then  couple  that
with the resources necessary to get the word out on the benefits of
those demonstration projects.

Dr.  BERTINI.  Sure,  for  the  reauthorization,  there  are  a  couple
points that I made earlier. The first one is the data infrastructure,
so  if  we  want  to  have  a  transportation  system  that  is  sustainable
and  green,  we  need  to  be  able  to  measure  that,  and  so  having  the
infrastructure for robust data collection and evaluation is really im-
portant.  Evaluation—I  have—we  talk  about  one  percent  for  art  in
government-funded  buildings  and  projects.  I  sometimes  talk  about
X percent for evaluation. Sometimes I say four percent if I am talk-
ing  about  a  project  in  the  city  of  Portland  in  the  safety  area  that
we have going. Randy mentioned this need for ongoing—you know,
thinking of setting aside a percentage of what we do for evaluation
and  monitoring,  and  then  I  guess  the  idea  of  green  performance
measures  so  we  talk  often  about  reducing  congestion,  reducing
delay,  but  I  think  the  general  public  is  not  really  aware  of  what
the, let us say, sustainability impacts of that are, the fuel consump-
tion, emissions, noise and so on.

Mr.  VOIGT.  Thank  you.  I  think  our  industry’s  picture  of  what
would  be  needed  in  research  is  probably  best  split  into  two  major
focus  areas,  the  first  being  with  regard  to  the  material  side  and
things  we  can  do  to  further  enhance  the  sustainability  in  use  of
materials  within  concrete  particularly,  recycling  methods.  There  is
a great ability to recycle concrete and use it back into the mixtures
that are used directly in highways. There are a lot of agencies that
are  reluctant  to  do  that  in  certain  areas.  We  feel  that  there  is  a
lot  more  opportunity  there  as  well  as  further  use,  and  I  believe  it
was mentioned earlier in one of the remarks with regard to further
use of fly ash and further use of slag as part of concrete mixtures.
There  are  blended  cements  that  are  manufactured  by  the  U.S.  ce-
ment  industry  that  are  not  routinely  used  in  highway  pavements
that could be routinely used in highway pavements and they would
have  a  sustainability  benefit.  So  there  are  a  number  of  associated
materials  issues  that  could  be  addressed.  We  also  see  the  other
side  of  looking  at  the  sustainability  of  the  use  of  the  paving  struc-
tures,  and  by  that  what  we  are  getting  at  is,  some  of  those  things
I directed in my comments earlier with regard to the fuel efficiency
of vehicles on the pavements, the lighting and energy savings that
could be derived by the reflectivity of the pavements, and those as-
sociated  benefits  in  energy  savings  that  we  are  not  currently  ac-
counting for in the selection and the use of pavement systems. And
so we see need for research and further development of our under-
standing along those areas coupled with a decision framework that
needs  to  be  put  into  place  to  include  those  sustainability  benefits
as  part  of  the  selection  criteria,  and  that  simply  is  not  happening
right now. It is purely a cost basis method of selection that is being
used. So we see a need along those lines.

Chairman WU. Thank you.
Dr. Poe.
Dr.  POE.  Two  things.  Let  me  echo  Dr.  Bertini’s  comments  about
evaluation.  If  we  are  going  to  challenge  the  industry  to  do  things

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

81

differently,  new  transportation  solutions,  we  better  know  the  im-
pact  of  those  and  what  the  relationship  between  those  transpor-
tation  solutions  are  and  the  impact  on  our  environment,  and  that
closely ties a measure and be able to evaluate is highly important.
The  second  thing  is,  green  transportation  is  a  very  broad  topic.  It
involves  researchers  and  industry  working  all  different  parts,  and
by bringing—currently right now they are kind of working in their
areas, and by bringing attention to green transportation and allow-
ing  to  come  under  one  umbrella  and  getting  those  collaborations
between  the  research  environment  and  industry  working  together
on one solution, how do we reduce the impact on our environment,
will  go  a  long  way  in  reauthorization  to  come  up  with  good  solu-
tions.

Chairman  WU.  Terrific.  Thank  you  very  much  to  all  the  wit-

nesses.

Dr. Gingrey, you are recognized for five minutes.
Mr. GINGREY. Mr. Chairman, thank you. I was at a meeting early
this morning, the Oversight and Investigation Subcommittee of the
House Armed Services, of which I am a Member, and we were talk-
ing  about  making  sure  that  people  understand  the  difference  in  a
strategic plan and how that leads to policy and operational activity,
and  so  I  want  to  ask  a  real  direct,  simple  question  of  all  the  wit-
nesses and start with Mr. Brubaker, and that is, what do you think
is  the  single  most  important  thing  that  the  Federal  Government
could  do  to  increase  adoption  of  new  transportation  technologies
from  a  strategic  perspective  as  we  go  forward  to  set  policy  for  the
21st century in regard to surface transportation?

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  I  am  glad  you  asked  that  question.  Fundamen-
tally,  knowledge  sharing,  and  it  is  an  area  of  focus  that  we  have
put  into  our  strategic  plan  but  the  good  news  about,  you  know,
having it in our strategic plan is, we have actually made it action-
able.  We  are  actually  coming  up  with  a  construct  to  share  knowl-
edge,  particularly  and  beginning  with  the  University  Transpor-
tation Centers. It is very—it was very telling when I took over this
organization that we had a lot of great activity going on in various
University Transportation Centers and out in the research commu-
nity  generally  but  that  knowledge,  that  research  wasn’t  being
shared amongst researchers who were doing work in similar areas.
That  is  one  aspect  of  it.  The  other  aspect  of  it  is,  we  would  have
these  great  meetings  where,  you  know,  the  research  community
might get together once a year, and particularly at TRB, Transpor-
tation  Research  Board’s  annual  meeting,  and  they  would  commu-
nicate with other researchers as opposed to making a concerted ef-
fort  to  share  knowledge,  capture  that  knowledge  and  be  able  to
transfer  that  knowledge  to  the  private  sector  or  to  not-for-profits
who  could  actually  look  at  commercializing  some  of  these  things
and deploying them and develop standards that you could actually
use  for  deploying  these  technologies  and  getting  them  out  in  the
field. So that is key to us.

Mr. GINGREY. Thank you.
Mr. Iwasaki.
Mr. IWASAKI. I think the best way to phrase this would be, in our
strategic  plan,  we  have  guiding  principles,  and  one  of  our  guiding
principles is innovation, and there are a lot of mothers and fathers

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

82

of  innovation  when  it  works  right.  There  are  no  takers  when  it
doesn’t work, and so how does the Federal Government help states
deploy innovation? Accept some of the risk. Take a risk, don’t make
us  go  through  these  arduous  review  processes  and  get  that  tech-
nology deployed sooner because at the end of the day it is just cost-
ing  us  more  money,  so  it  is  going  to  take  some  time,  but  I  think
on a strategic level, accept some more risk.

Mr. GINGREY. Dr. Bertini, in Oregon?
Dr.  BERTINI.  I  would  say  if  I  had  to  say  one  word,  I  would  say
incentives, so there are incentives built into the way transportation
systems  are  developed  now.  People  are  rewarded  by  feeling  proud
about  a  big  project,  a  big  bridge.  I  got  into  transportation  because
of  the  Golden  Gate  Bridge.  When  I  was  a  kid,  I  loved  this  bridge.
But  people—you  know,  I  get  excited—Mr.  Iwasaki  mentioned  this
earlier this morning, I get excited when a new sensor is placed out
on  the  roadway  network,  but  are  there  incentives  for  transpor-
tation agencies to make sure that the underlying hidden infrastruc-
ture is as good as it can be, as advanced as it can be, so incentives
across the board for the individual, let us say, people who are doing
the work, for them to become more educated and more inspired by
implementing  advanced  technology  and  for  the  agencies  who  are
building and maintaining the systems as well.

Mr. GINGREY. Mr. Voigt.
Mr.  VOIGT.  Thank  you.  I  would  go  back  to  address  the  question
to  some  of  the  remarks  in  my  testimony.  I  think  that  most  pave-
ment decisions right now are really based on a first cost or a lowest
cost  method.  That  really  is  not  necessarily  easily  linked  to  doing
more  sustainable  construction  unless  you  include  within  that  deci-
sion  process  those  benefits  and  economic  impacts  of  the  longevity
and the other things that are associated with sustainable practices.
Mr.  GINGREY.  And  that—if  you  will  permit  me  to  interrupt,  that
is  basically  what  I  was  getting  at  in  regard  to  strategic  planning,
and I think you are getting to that point.

Mr.  VOIGT.  Yeah,  you  know,  we  have  looked  at  a  number  of  re-
search studies that indicate that there is some benefits that simply
we  haven’t  accounted  for  in  the  methods  that  we  are  using  in  the
processes we are using, so what we feel that the federal level could
really be helpful in this regard is to develop a strategic framework
for  including  those  factors  of  sustainability  and  those  benefits  and
features, perhaps creating that and deploying that within the more
local  agencies.  That  would  be  motivation,  I  think,  and  guidance
perhaps  to  allow  that  practice  to  pervade  across  the  country,  but
I think it needs to—personally, I think it needs to start at the fed-
eral  level  to  provide  that  framework  and  that  guidance  to  go  on
down.

Mr. GINGREY. Thank you.
Mr. Chairman, if you will permit me to allow Dr. Poe to respond

as well? Thank you very much for your generosity.

Dr. Poe.
Dr.  POE.  Similar  to  what  was  said,  I  think  incentives  and  some
reward  for  challenging  the  community  to  further  pursue  green
transportation.  As  I  was  saying  just  earlier  to  Chairman  Wu,  we
have  researchers  working  on  soil  erosion,  we  have  researchers
working on pavements, we have researchers working on traffic con-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

83

gestion and traffic signals, but by calling attention to this and giv-
ing  incentives  for  the  states  and  universities  to  work  on  this  prob-
lem  brings  those  collaborations  together  and  I  think  that  will  ad-
vance the whole area significantly.

Mr. GINGREY. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Gingrey.
The gentlelady from California, Ms. Richardson, is recognized for

five minutes.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Yes, thank you, Chairman Wu.
First  of  all,  a  statement  for  all  of  the  panelists  that  we  have
here.  Much  has  been  said  about  providing  additional  funding  for
research  but  I  would  like  to  respectfully  request  that  you  provide
to  the  Committee  is  specifically  how  much  do  you  think  would  be
needed  and  for  what  specific  projects.  As  we  go  through  looking  at
SAFETEA–LU  reauthorization  and  various  appropriation  changes
that  we  can  do  in  the  upcoming  year,  if  you  give  us  specific  exam-
ples of what you would like us to consider, I am sure the Chairman
and others would welcome that thought.

Mr.  Iwasaki,  coming  from  California,  I  apologize  that  I  wasn’t
here to properly welcome you to the great area here of Washington,
D.C.,  but  California  is  known  to  be  at  the  forefront  and  more  peo-
ple  need  to  know  the  tremendous  work  that  is  done  at  Caltrans,
so thank you for being here. My question for you is, has California
carried  out  any  cost-benefit  analysis,  which  is  leading  really  into
the  last  comments  that  were  made,  for  specific  technologies  and
materials  that  you  described  in  your  testimony?  If  so,  what  were
your  findings  and  how  do  life  cycle  costs  and  benefits  affect  your
decisions about which technologies and materials to use?

Mr.  IWASAKI.  We  are  currently  analyzing  the  cost-benefit  basis
for  a  lot  of  the  technologies  that  I  mentioned,  the  system-wide
adaptive  ramp  metering,  those  kinds  of  things.  We  did  an  18-
month project and deployed signal synchronization down in the Los
Angeles area as well as a SWARM project along the 210 which has
dramatically  improved  the  throughput  through  that  corridor,  and
what  we  are  doing  now  is,  we  are  analyzing  the  benefit-cost  infor-
mation  then  to  pass  onto  other  regions  for  that  technology.  We
have  done  some  benefit-cost  analysis  on  some  of  the  demand  man-
agement strategies like freeway service patrol. In some cases where
you have a highly congested corridor, it is 22 to one and it is better
than any new freeway STIP project that you could ever achieve but
it  is  not  really  sexy.  It  a  freeway  service  patrol.  But  as  far  as  get-
ting  people  on  the  move,  it  is  a  very,  very  effective  tool.  I  think
some  of  the  things  in  the  future,  what  we  are  trying  to  do  is,  we
are  trying  to  on  our  corridor  mobility  improvement  account,  the
$19.925 billion bond, the $4.5 billion worth of projects, on those we
are  doing  before-and-after  studies  to  see  how  effective  the  change
was that we made.

As  far  as  materials  are  concerned,  we  don’t  do  a  lot  of  benefit-
cost analysis on our material-type selection. We do it based on, we
design to a certain life so if we want a 20-plus-year pavement, gen-
erally  we  go  to  Portland  cement  concrete.  If  we  do  a  rehabilitation
project,  we  will  do  an  asphalt  concrete.  And  so  in  those  cases,  we
are driven by past practices.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

84

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  And  some  of  the  other  Members  spoke  about
the fact that when you are responding to bids, it is typically on an
initial cost perspective. So you find that your states are being more
supportive of looking at the more lifetime, lifespan cost and making
sure  that  they  are  really  evaluating  the  cost  of  the  project  effec-
tively?

Mr.  IWASAKI.  Well,  absolutely.  If  you  look  at  the  rapid  rehab
project that we did at Devora on I–15 heading to Las Vegas, it was
done in about 17 days. It cost a lot more money initially but it put
the  utility  back  in  the  hands  of  the  public.  I  say  you  are  going  to
take  your  castor  oil  over  an  eight-month  period  or  are  you  going
to  do  it  over  a  17-day  period.  Most  people  would  rather  do  it  on  a
short-term  basis.  Currently,  we  are  rehabilitating  the  boat  section
in  Sacramento.  We  did  each  direction  in  10  days,  and  we  used  a
new,  fast-setting  concrete  mix  designed  there  so  it  would  limit  the
amount  of  shrinkage  and  those  kind  of  things,  and  that  project  is
going  to  last  another  50  years,  but  we  had  to  take  traffic  off  of  it
and so it cost us more money up front but the benefits far outweigh
the initial costs.

Ms.  RICHARDSON.  Okay.  And  Mr.  Voigt,  a  couple  questions  for
you. You note in your testimony that many State transportation de-
partments  do  not  consider  life  cycle  costs  when  making  decisions
regarding  transportation  infrastructure.  How  does  the  concrete  in-
dustry determine life cycle costs, especially when multiple variable
factors,  such  as  the  cost  of  fuel,  come  into  play?  What  research  is
needed  to  better  understand  the  life  cycle  costs  of  transportation
infrastructure?

Mr. VOIGT. Let me clarify that where the states are not using in
many  cases—I  have  to  be  a  little  careful  with  making  judgments
across many states because the practices vary so widely but in gen-
eral,  where  we  see  less  decisions  being  based  on  a  life  cycle  basis
is on the maintenance and the preservation end of the system, and
so  that  is  an  area  where  we  feel  there  could  be  more  done,  but
going back to linking the usage end, this is the key piece to us, the
usage  end  of  the  roadways,  there  are  many  sustainability  benefits
and/or  disadvantages,  depending  on  what  you  are  looking  at  for
your  project,  that  are  simply  not  accounted  for  in  the  process  and
we  feel  that  again  if  we  begin  to  account  for  those,  then  that  will
in  and  of  itself  incent  the  use  of  more  sustainable  practices.  It
would  be  simply  looking  at  it  maybe  from  a  local  government  per-
spective of saying we are paying so much energy for lighting costs,
but  if  we  use  this  pavement  selection,  we  would  reduce  that  cost
on  this  side  of  our  budget  while  we  may  have  to  pay  a  little  bit
more  up  front  on  this  side  of  our  budget,  but  in  the  long  run,  it
will  take  down  the  entire  budget  of  the  agency.  It  is  a  matter  of
looking  just  simply  not  at  the  paving  materials  end,  the  projects
themselves, but looking across the perspective.

Ms. RICHARDSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I yield back.
Chairman WU. Thank you.
The gentleman from Michigan, Dr. Ehlers.
Mr. EHLERS. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.
Mr. Brubaker, what is the total annual budget of the federal De-

partment of Transportation?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

85

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  That  is  a  good  question.  It  is  in  the  high  60s.  I
will  get  you  an  exact  number  for  the  record  but  it  is  in  the  high
60s.

Mr. EHLERS. Okay. Now, that includes what? Is that everything?

That includes the FAA as well as the highways, et cetera?

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  No,  I  don’t  think—I  think—my  staff  informs  me

that that is the total budget.

Mr. EHLERS. How much did you say, 80?
Mr. BRUBAKER. No, close to—it is in the high 60s.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Okay.  And  what  is  the  budget  of  RITA,  your  little

type——

niche there?

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Well,  that  is  a  great  question.  The  appropriated
budget for operations is in the neighborhood of $12 million but that
doesn’t  include  fee-for-service  organizations  such  as  the  Transpor-
tation Safety Institute which adds probably another $20 million in
revenue  plus  an  additional—and  I  will  get  you  the  exact  numbers
for  the  record—plus  the  Volpe  National  Transportation  Center,
which  is  a  fee-for-service  organization  that  adds  another  $160  mil-
lion or so to the operation.

Mr. EHLERS. Where does that money for that come from?
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  That  comes  from  customers  on  a  fee-for-service

Mr. EHLERS. And who are the customers primarily?
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  The  customers  are  primarily  the  transportation

modes within DOT. It is a fee-for-service-type arrangement.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Okay.  The  reason  I  am  asking  these  questions,  do
you  know  any  private  sector  company  with  an  annual  budget  of
$70  billion  which  would  have  a  research  budget  somewhere  in  the
low millions?

Mr. BRUBAKER. No, sir, I do not.
Mr.  EHLERS.  And  I  suppose  you  understand  there  is  a  reason

why they spend more than that.
Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes, sir, I do.
Mr. EHLERS. Because they want to stay in business, right?
Mr. BRUBAKER. Yes, sir.
Mr.  EHLERS.  And  you  can’t  stay  in  business,  you  can’t  do  a  job
without  the  research  money.  The  reason  I  am  asking  this  is,  we
have to publicize the fact that the government is being very stupid
in  this,  and  I  have  to  implicate  the  Congress  in  that  as  well.  The
private  sector  has  learned  that  if  you  want  to  stay  alive,  you  have
to do the research. This committee has the responsibility for the re-
search direction and funding and yet we are advisory in a sense to
the Transportation Committee. When we went through the last go-
round and Mr. Wu, our roles were reversed then but as you recall,
we  worked  together  very  hard  to  improve  the  amount  of  funding
going for research in the transportation department, particularly in
RITA, and it got knocked down by the House Transportation Com-
mittee, got knocked down every more by the Senate Transportation
Committee,  and  what  we  had  submitted  was  not  nearly  as  much
as  you  should  have.  You  can  demonstrate  that  research  money
saves  money  in  construction,  no  question  about  it,  and  yet  we  are
not  doing  it.  We  are  throwing  away  a  lot  of  taxpayers’  money  in
the name of getting projects done without researching the best way
to  do  it,  and  I  think  we  simply  have  to  publicize  this  so  that  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

86

next  go-round,  we  can  give  you  the  kind  of  funding  you  need,  and
I am not saying you are not doing a good job. I think you are doing
a  great  job  with  the  small  amount  of  research  funding  that  you
have,  but  it  is  just  unconscionable  to  me.  It  is  not  just  because  I
am a physicist and a researcher, but any businessperson looking at
this would say good grief, if we can do enough research to add just
an  extra  year  to  the  life  of  the  concrete  we  are  laying  this  year,
how  much  do  we  save?  Well,  obviously  you  would  save  enough  to
pay for the research many times over. Similarly, the different types
of  concrete,  as  Mr.  Voigt  mentioned,  and  all  the  research  that  is
being  done  there,  and  similarly  for  asphalt.  We  are  being  penny-
wise and pound-foolish. Now, this is pretty much the end of my ser-
mon,  and  I  know,  I  am  preaching  to  the  choir  when  I  talk  to  you
or  to  this  group,  but  we  really  have  to  make  that  impact  on  the
Transportation Committee on the next go-round. Mr. Brubaker.

Mr. BRUBAKER. I would like to make a couple of clarifying points
just  so  we  understand  what  we  are  talking  about  here.  The  num-
bers  I  was  giving  you  or  I  gave  you  are  the  operational  numbers
of RITA, and staff reminded me that there is an additional $27 mil-
lion going for the Bureau of Transportation statistics, which is the
data  side  of  the  house.  But  just  to  be  clear,  I  want  everybody  to
understand that the total research budget of the Department is al-
most  $1.2  billion,  so  there  is  sufficient—we  can  talk  about  suffi-
cient—what I want to make sure of is that we understand that the
total research budget dollars that are allocated for research-related
activities  in  the  Department  of  Transportation  amount  to  about
$1.2 billion a year. Now, getting to your question, I don’t know any
similar  ratio  in  a  technology-intensive  private  sector  firm  that
would even equate to that, so your point is still well taken.

Mr.  EHLERS.  And  I  am  not  criticizing  your  department  or  your
operation  in  any  way.  I  want  to  make  that  clear.  That  is  not  the
reason  for  the  questions.  The  reason  is  simply  to  say  we  have  to
do better than that, and if we are really talking about running gov-
ernment efficiently, then we have to design projects efficiently and
you  have  to  build  them  efficiently,  and  I  am  convinced  that  we
could add a considerable amount to RITA’s budget and have it pay
for  itself  by  doing  the  research  properly  and  building  bridges  and
highways properly and so forth. So this is just a plea to you to help
us in our battles with the Congress next time around to make sure
you  get  the  funding  that  you  need  and  that  will  really  pay  for
itself.  I  think  the  states  will  all  agree  with  that  too,  and  I  know
states, individual states spend money on research too. When I was
in the Michigan legislature, I helped get some funding for research
at one of the universities.

But  putting  it  all  together,  we  are  just  not  doing  it  as  well  and
as efficiently as we could, and so let us all join this battle together
next go-round and make sure we start off from the blocks running
and make a very strong case. Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

Chairman WU. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers.
Mr. Brubaker, when Dr. Ehlers is trying to push research money
your way, my recommendation is to just accept is graciously, espe-
cially when you take into account the building dollars that come in
from  city  sources,  county  sources,  State  sources,  and  what  I  would

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

87

guess  would  be  proportionately  smaller  research  budgets  at  those
levels. I am going to try to squeeze in two quick questions.

Mr. EHLERS. Mr. Chairman, may I just add one comment?
Chairman WU. Of course.
Mr. EHLERS. I am sure that you are aware that if we do increase
the research budget, that a good share of it gets shoveled off to Dr.
Bertini’s institute and other institutes in Oregon.

Chairman  WU.  That  thought  had  not  occurred  to  me  but  I  am
glad you point that out. Metrics—we have had some sort of cursory
discussion  of  metrics  but  how  do  you  measure  lifetime  environ-
mental  impact  or  energy  costs  or  other  costs,  what  methods  exist,
what  are  the  metrics  that  are  being  used?  To  the  extent  that  any
of  you  all  can  expand  on  the  discussion  that  we  have  already  had,
I  would  greatly  appreciate  that.  And  if  we  do  this  quickly,  then  I
will try to rush on to a second question.

Mr.  VOIGT.  I  can  respond  to  that  to  some  degree.  The  National
Research  Council  of  Canada  has  done  work  in  looking  at  the  life
cycle  of  paving  systems.  That  includes  all  of  the  energy  and  the
embodied  energy  in  the  materials  that  are  used  as  well  as  the  en-
ergy used to place the pavements, to recycle the pavements or to—
I  should  say  to  rehabilitate  the  pavements  over  many  cycles.  They
did  a  50-year  analysis.  That  was  information  that  we  had.  It  is
cited  in  my  written  testimony.  And  I  think  a  similar  thing  would
be  very  helpful  here.  Now,  the  one  thing  the  Canadian  study  did
not  include  was  the  operational  fuel  issues  but  that  could  I  think
also  be  included,  linked  up  with  some  research  on  the  fuel  effi-
ciency  issues.  So  there  is  some  work  that  has  been  done.  It  needs
to  be  expanded  but  I  think  it  would  be  greatly  helpful  to  making
this  connection  and  this  framework  that  we  need  to  really  put
those sustainability issues into practice.

Chairman WU. Thank you.
Dr. Bertini.
Dr. BERTINI. In my testimony, I talk about standard metrics that
are  used  and  I  think  we  know  how  to  estimate  the  emissions,  let
us say, costs of different alternatives and different projects or prod-
ucts. We know how to estimate the noise impacts, fuel consumption
impacts.  One  of  the  problems  is  that  these  impacts  accrue  to  dif-
ferent  people  in  different  ways  so  in  the  case  of  a  project  that
Caltrans  wants  to  build,  their  capital  budget  has  to  pay  for  addi-
tional  capital  costs  of  the  17-day  project  versus  the  eight-month
project.  The  benefits,  if  I  save  time  or  if  I  live  near  there  and  I
breathe  fewer  particulates,  there  isn’t  some  slot  machine  where
coins are coming out and going into my pocket. Those are costs that
are  spread  out  and  not  accounted  for  anywhere,  even  though  they
are  a  benefit  to  society,  so  I  think  a  lot  of  the,  let  us  say,  green
and  sustainable  benefits  of  projects  are  not  ones  that  show  up  in
a  capital  budget,  they  are  ones  that  show  up  over  a  much  longer
term  in  people’s  health,  in  the  health  of  our  economy  and  so  on.
So I think incentives and rewards for finding ways to include those
slightly  more  intangible  benefits  are  really  important.  There  was
seminal  work  done  at  the  University  of  California–Davis.  I  should
say  I  am  a  product  of  the  UTC  at  UC–Berkeley  so  the  UTC  pro-
gram is, you know, creating generations of transportation research-
ers  and,  in  my  case,  UTC  directors.  But  at  UC–Davis,  Mark

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

88

Delukey  has  done  a  lot  of  work,  it  would  probably  fill  this  table,
with  trying  to  quantify  the  full  cost  of  transportation  on  society  in
some  of  these  unquantified  ways  so  a  lot  of  that  has  already  been
established. It is just a question of how to account for it.

Chairman WU. A lot of these methods exist. Some need to be dis-
seminated,  and  then  to  the  extent  that  others  are  missing,  I  am
particularly interested in that, particularly with respect to new ma-
terials or methods. Does anyone else want to—Dr. Poe?

Dr.  POE.  Just  on  congestion  specifically,  one  of  the  things—we
spent  a  lot  of  time  trying  to  relate  to  the  public  and  media,  how
do you convey this congestion. Travel time is very well understood.
How much time does it take you to get from where you are starting
your  trip  to  your  destination  and  how  much  time  you  actually
spend in congestion. The public measures this on a daily basis. But
the  other  thing  that  is  gaining  increased  importance  is  reliability,
and  reliability  is,  how  much  extra  time  do  you  have  to  plan  for  to
make  it  to  your  trip  on  time,  and  people  really  understand  that,
and  so  trying  to  come  down  to  this  hearing  itself,  how  much  extra
time  did  you  have  to  budget  in  your  day  and  your  trip  to  make  it.
It  plays  very  well  and  the  public  understands  that  and  they  are
paying the price right now with congestion.
Chairman WU. Anyone else? Mr. Iwasaki.
Mr. IWASAKI. I will just add this. Through the bond initiative, we
are looking at how green our projects are, and it is project-specific.
The problem is, we don’t have data for every project and so we are
having  to  go  put  detection  systems  in  to  gather  the  information  to
correlate  the  reduction  in  carbon,  for  example,  and  so,  that  is  the
other  piece  is  that  we  need  data.  We  need  a  reliable,  good  source
of  data  then  to  make  the  calculations  and  that  is  not  everywhere
in  the  United  States  and  so  we  need  to  kind  of  keep  that  in  mind
when  we  do  these  things.  It  is  not  a  model.  You  have  to  get  down
specifics  of  a  project  and  the  benefits  and  that  is  what  is  harder
to do, and we worked very closely with one of the UTCs, UC–Davis,
on the sustainability issue.

Chairman WU. Thank you very much. Since I seem to be the lone
person standing, I choose to recognize myself for an additional five
minutes.  What  has  happened  in  the  course  of  this  hearing  is  one
graphic  illustration  of  what  you  plan  for  and  then  sort  of  the  dis-
persion  of  time  that  can  occur.  My  flight  might  leave  from  Dulles
at  6:15  and  if  everything  goes  right,  I  could  leave  the  Hill  at  5:00,
but that would be very unwise. I try to leave at 3:00, and if every-
thing  goes  right,  I  am  at  the  gate  at  3:45,  but  if  things  go  wrong,
and  that  happens  about  40  percent  of  the  time,  yeah,  that  time
gets  taken  down  and  I  have  to  plan  for  that  no  matter  what,  and
I think the general public gets that very, very well, and I just want
to  work  with  you  so  that  we  can  all  get  a  little  bit  more  certainty
on  our  planning.  We  can  enhance  our  research  budgets  where  we
need them to be on the transportation side.

I wanted to ask a pretty general question about workforce train-
ing. Until I got more familiar with some of your work, I was quite
frankly  a  user  of  the  end  product  or  service  but  not  well  aware  of
you  all’s  work,  and  I  am  sure  that  there  is  not  only  a  huge  work-
force  in  building  the  transportation  networks  but  there  is  signifi-
cant  issues  in  workforce  training  on  the  research  side  and  on  the

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

89

implementation side, and if you could try to address some of those
workforce issues, whether it is at the research end or at the far end
of actually getting things built and everything in between about re-
moving barriers to better transportation system.

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Just  on  the  research  side,  if  I  may,  and  this  is
a  dangerous  thing  to  say  sitting  at  a  table  with  a  whole  bunch  of
civil engineers, but, you know——

Chairman WU. And they are civil.
Mr. BRUBAKER. And they are civil, with an emphasis on the civil.
The  point  you  were  asking  or  the  question  that  you  were  asking
before about data, I think it illustrates what I am about to say. We
really  have  to  have  a  better  understanding  of  the  holistic  perform-
ance  of  the  supply  chain,  of  passenger  movement,  of  system  per-
formance  generally  speaking  and  then  understand  and  mitigate
whatever  impacts  that  construction  projects  may  have  on  system
performance,  disruptions,  manmade  or  natural,  have  on  that  sys-
tem  performance.  In  order  to  best  do  that,  it  is  really  imperative,
and particularly when this comes to planning as well, that we had
taken  an  interdisciplinary  approach  to  the  research,  that  we  bring
not  just  civil  engineers  to  the  table  but  we  bring  economists,  busi-
ness  people,  you  know,  social  scientists,  behaviorists  so  that  we
have this holistic understanding of system performance and disrup-
tions  to  the  system  and  what  that  may  mean  for  the  economy  and
how  people  respond  and  react  as  well  as  getting  into  the  material
side of sustainability issues but also the business side of it. For ex-
ample,  when  Mr.  Iwasaki  was  describing,  you  know,  the  17-day
project  and  the  reason  why  they  do  that,  it  is  because  they  recog-
nize  that  there  is  an  economic  cost  to  that  disruption  that  has  to
go into that equation when they determine what is the best course
of  action  for  the  public.  So  that  is  what  I  would  say  in  terms  of
workforce,  to  ensure  that  we  are  training  researchers  and  opening
our aperture, if you will, to embrace folks from multiple disciplines
and  not  just  the  civil  engineering  community  anymore,  not  that
they are not important and critical to this but it needs to go beyond
that.

Chairman WU. Mr. Iwasaki.
Mr.  IWASAKI.  About  50  percent  of  the  managers  in  California
State  government  are  eligible  for  retirement  over  the  next  five  to
seven  years.  That  includes  Caltrans,  and  that  really  concerns  us.
Of  course,  that  is  not  me.  I  am  too  young  for  that  yet.  But  ulti-
mately I will retire and so somebody has to replace us and so that
was  a  focus.  So,  with  this  influx  of  new  money  from  our  bond  ini-
tiative,  we  created  what  we  call  ICE.  It  is  Industry  Capacity  Ex-
pansion. So we need more aggregate because we are going to build
more.  We  need  more  people  to  go  to  the  trades.  How  do  we  go  out
to the grammar schools, the grade schools and get people energized
about going into trades, to be finishers, concrete finishers, to drive
trucks.  And  then  how  do  we  work  with  the  UTCs  to  generate  the
next generation, like Dr. Rob here, he is a product of the UTC sys-
tem  so  he  is—because  you  fund  UTCs,  he  is  a  product.  Now  he  is
a leader. He is one of the directors of a UTC. It is a great process.
But how do we get these people energized into going into civil engi-
neering  rather  than  becoming  the  next  owner  of  Google  or  some-
thing  else  because  that  is  really  what  our  video  games  and  those

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

90

kinds of things. And so we are trying to energize the young people,
and  also  we  have  the  Garrett  Morgan  symposium  where  we  adopt
high  schools.  Caltrans  has—we  try  to  adopt  12  different  high
schools  in  California  and  talk  about  science  and  mathematics  and
get them interested in not only engineering but the trades as well.
And  so  we  recognize  the  problem.  How  do  we  rebuild  America?
How do we rebuild America smart and use existing labor? We can’t.
We need more people. And so we are trying to do that through var-
ious tools.

Chairman WU. Dr. Poe, did you have something? Dr. Bertini.
Dr.  BERTINI.  Going  in  order.  It  is  safe  to  say  that  we  have  a
workforce  crisis  in  the  transportation  field  and  many  of  us  are
working hard to respond to that, and the technology transportation
and education mission of the UTC program in addition to research
is critical to that, and it is exciting to me in our UTC that I believe
have about 12 different disciplines working on projects, working to-
gether. I am a civil engineer but my colleagues from statistics and
computer science, urban planning, geography, psychology and land-
scape  architecture  and  more  are  working  together,  sitting  around
the  table  working  to  solve  problems,  and  that  extends  to  students,
so  you  visited  our  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  lab  and  we
have students there from not only civil engineering but urban plan-
ning,  statistics  and  computer  science,  and  they  are  working  to-
gether on projects and learning to communicate in each other’s lan-
guage, which I think is part of this issue. Communication from the
various disciplines is a little bit different. So I think the workforce
crisis can be solved. There are some easy things in my written tes-
timony  that  I  talk  about,  so  part  of  it  has  to  do  with  funding.  The
other part has to do with some policies that could be easily changed
with  regard  to  out-of-state  travel,  so  if  a  staff  member  of  a  trans-
portation agency in Oregon wants to come to Washington, D.C., for
the  Transportation  Research  Board  annual  meeting,  perhaps  they
work  on  their  own  time  on  a  paper  that  gets  accepted  for  presen-
tation  but  the  agency  policies  won’t  allow  them  to  leave  the  state,
won’t even allow them to spend the night in Washington State. So
I  think  thinking  about  the  fact  that  we  want  to  retain  the  top  tal-
ent that we have and giving them opportunities to share knowledge
about  their  projects  and  learn  about  other  projects  in  other  states,
I think is a very small price to pay and those policies could be eas-
ily changed.

Mr. VOIGT. I represent a lot of companies that have laborers and
it  is  a  challenge  to  get  practices,  you  know,  and  get  those  folks  to
the  point  where  they  are  able  to  apply  the  technology.  What  we
started  in  2006  really  was  the  National  Concrete  Pavement  Tech-
nology Center. It is centered at Iowa State University, and we took
a  different  approach  with  that,  somewhat  based  on  a  frustration
level on how long it takes for new technology to come into practice,
and  we  hear  different  people  say,  you  know,  different  things,  and
our  estimation  is,  it  is  somewhere  between  10  and  15  years  in  the
transportation area for new technologies to really pervade practice,
and that is just not good enough, and so we put a technology center
together  and  the  idea  behind  that  was  collaborative  research,  and
we feel when we involve the industry with the states and the Fed-
eral Highway Administration Together, creating the technology and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

91

doing  the  research,  that  the  acceptance  to  put  into  practice  should
be  shortened  and  we  are  starting  to  see  some  fruits  from  that.  So
I think as we look forward to, you know, new technologies and sus-
tainability  and  energy  efficiencies  and  many  of  things  we  have
talked about this morning, we have got to also factor in that work-
ing together is the way to get that into practice faster and we have
really  looked  at  it  that  way  in  the  way  we  are  approaching  all  of
our  research  and  technology  areas.  The  last  thing  I  would  say  is,
in our industry, we are just now starting to use technology, putting
technology on our sides, webinars and those types of things as just
additional ways to get the information into the hands of the people
that need to do it. For many of the challenges that we see out there
from  our  traditional  education,  people  can’t  travel  across  State
lines.  You  can’t  do  regional  seminars.  We  have  to  find  other  ways
to get the information into their hands.

Chairman WU. Mr. Voigt, you talked about the program at Iowa
State  that  your  organization  was  setting  up.  I  have  seen  Dr.
Bertini’s  transportation  research  center.  Is  there  a  role  at  a—is
there a role for our community colleges apart from research in this
human training need?

Mr.  VOIGT.  I  would  think  yes.  I  would  think  that  there  could  be
very  interesting  benefits  to  that  and  some  programs  that  could  be
created  at  that  level.  At  a  time  in  a  young  person’s  life  when  they
are  still  maybe  looking  at  what  it  is  they  want  to  do,  that  could
inspire  them,  and  we  are,  I  don’t  think,  doing  a  lot  in  that  area
that  I  am  aware  of  across  the  industry,  the  transportation  indus-
try. I think that sounds like an interesting idea.

Chairman  WU.  Dr.  Poe,  anything  to  add,  or  do  we  have  further

comment?

Mr. IWASAKI. I just want to really quickly add, at the community
college,  we  actually  work  with  a  community  college  to  help  train
equipment  operations  in  the  Stockton  area  so  we  have  a  joint  pro-
gram  with  the  community  colleges  there.  We  also  have  a  program
with  the  community  colleges  to  help  sign  up  DBE  participants.
They  explain  how  to  fill  out  the  forms  and  those  kinds  of  things
and  so  that  helps  us  get  more  DBEs  under  federally  funded  con-
tracts.

Dr.  POE.  Just  real  quickly,  I  will  just  say  that  when  you  invest
in  research,  the  workforce  training  is  a  byproduct  of  that.  You  not
only invest in the researcher doing the work but the students that
are  helping  the  researcher  do  the  work  and  it  helps  broaden  the
workforce.  We  have  added  a  technology  transfer  component  on  re-
searcher proposing projects. They have to get funded. They have to
show  a  path  that  they  are  going  to  take  technology  transfer  train-
ing, so we don’t even fund projects through out UTC now that don’t
have that built into the whole project from the start.

Chairman  WU.  With  respect  to  intelligent  highway  systems,  is
there  an  inter-operability  or  compatibility  issue?  And  I  am  asking
this  question  because  in  other  context,  for  example,  in  first  re-
sponders, we have significant inter-operability compatibility issues.
Is there a parallel issue in intelligent highway systems?

Mr.  BRUBAKER.  I  think  it  is  fair  to  say  that  there  is  a  concern
but it has been somewhat obviated by the fact that we have got an
intelligent transportation system architecture that we have more or

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

92

less  prescribed.  We  have  laid  it  out  there  for  people  to  build  to  so
we have got an architecture that establishes certain communication
standards,  certain  communication  protocols  to  ensure  inter-oper-
ability for that very specific reason. And we are in the process right
now  of  refocusing,  re-energizing  that  architecture,  particularly  at
the  communications  layer  to  ensure  inter-operability  in  the  future.
So  it  is  a  significant  concern,  particularly  when  you  have  got  new
communications  capabilities  that  are  coming  on  line  that  we
haven’t  really  dealt  with  before  like  wireless  communications  and
wi-fi and wi-max and some use of cellular and radio spectrum that
we  are  interested  in  exploiting  to  enable  future  intelligent  trans-
portation systems applications. So it is an issue but I think we are
working  hard  to  make  sure  that  it  doesn’t  overwhelm  us  and  that
we can ensure inter-operability.

Chairman WU. Okay. I have many other questions that I will ei-
ther submit in writing or just keep to myself until some future date
when we meet in a far, far better world where the premium of time
is a lot less, but I do want to ask one further question of the panel
and  particularly  Dr.  Bertini.  Sometimes  I  am  a  quick  adopter  of
technology.  Most  frequently  I  am  a  late  adopter  because  I  want  to
make sure it works. The one thing that would drive me to have one
of those little display screens on my dash that shows a map of the
street grid, I have seen it in your laboratory, the current traffic sta-
tus  from  red  to  yellow—I  am  sorry—from  green  to  yellow  to  red,
I  believe.  There  is  this  horribly  slow  way  of  getting  traffic  news
through  the  radio,  and  I  frequently  wondered  why  does  this  late-
model car not have a little pop-up so that I can access not only the
map,  the  static  map  but  I  can  access  the  current  flow  information
on  the  highway  grid.  Does  that  exist  and  I  am  just  not  using  it?
Go ahead, whoever wants to take that.

Mr.  IWASAKI.  In  California  we  have  predicted  travel  times  so  we
have the algorithm set up to give you on changeable message signs
from,  let  us  say,  Navado  to  SFO  so  that  you  as  a  traveler,  if  you
take that often, you are going to——

Chairman  WU.  No,  I  have  seen  those  and  I  really  appreciate

that. I am just wondering if——

Mr.  IWASAKI.  In  the  next  generation  of—we  just  recently  were
the  recipient  of  a  Safe  Trip  21  grant,  actually  the  only  one  so  far
at  Caltrans.  We  got  it  at  Caltrans.  It  is  a  $12  million  proposal,  a
public-private partnership where we are going to use the next gen-
eration  of  cell  phones,  which  are  GPS  enabled  which  will  give  you
data  from  all  over  the  arterials.  So,  the  plan  is  to  send  thousands
of  these  phones  out  in  the  Bay  area,  San  Francisco  Bay  area,  and
then  get  information  on  travel  times  on  the  local  arterials  as  well
as  the  freeways  so  you  will  be  able  to  plug  into  your  dash  a  nav
unit that says shortest trip, shortest time trip and that is what you
are really looking for, right? I mean, you are looking for the ability
to maneuver——

Chairman  WU.  Will  I  have  to  get  new  hardware  in  order  to  do

Mr.  IWASAKI.  Well,  it  depends.  I  mean,  it  depends  on  what  kind
of nav unit you have, but possibly, yeah, absolutely, but that is the
next generation of nav unit, that we are taking the imbedded com-

that?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

93

munications  and  we  are  putting  it  into  the  consumers’  hands  and
then using those as probes.

Mr. BRUBAKER. Just—I am not sure if everybody on the panel is
aware  of  it  but  that  capability  actually  does  exist  today.  There  is
really  a  handful  of  companies  that  produce  GPS  devices  that  actu-
ally provide real time—some provide real time, some provide probe
data, some provide historic data. There is one in particular that ac-
tually acts as a probe in a network that you can use leveraging wi-
fi  communications.  It  is  a  company  from  California  called  Dash.  I
actually  went  out  and  bought  a  unit  myself  because  I  wanted  to
test  it,  and  there  are  several  hundred  other  folks  in  the  area  who
have  them  and  it  acts  as  sort  of  a  self-contained  network  so  I  can
see where other people have gone before me real time and pick up
on  that  data  and  it  is  integrated  with  this  historic  data  that  is
probe  data  from  vehicles,  delivery  vehicles,  commercial  vehicles
and such, and it tells a much better picture. Now, is it perfect? No,
but  does  it  tell  me  that,  you  know,  I  have  got  congestion  on  Route
66  when  I  am  trying  to  get  on  the  same  flight  probably  you  are  to
the  West  Coast  to  Dulles  airport  and  that  I  should  take  an  alter-
native  route.  Yes,  it  will  do  that.  Not  perfect  but  it  is  pretty  darn
good.  Likewise,  I  was  just,  you  know,  recently  using  a,  I  believe  it
was a Garmin unit that I got from a rental car company that I was
late  getting  to  Logan  airport  and  it  told  me  to  take  an  alternative
route,  and  I  don’t  know  what  they  use  for  that  but  it  was  very
helpful.  So  that  technology  exists.  It  is  not  quite  perfect.  What
Randy  is  describing  here  is  a—and  I  will  change  that  to  Mr.
Iwasaki for the record.

Mr. IWASAKI. You can call me Randy.
Mr.  BRUBAKER.  Okay.  What  Randy  is  describing  is  going  to  pro-
vide a much higher level of fidelity in the data and much more cur-
rent data as opposed to a probe from somebody that went down the
road,  you  know,  five  minutes  before  I  did  or  10  minutes  before  I
did.  When  you  have  got  10,000  phones  and  eventually  100,000
phones and millions of phones out there that are GPS enabled and
everybody is sort of acting as a probe, privacy protected, hopefully,
I  mean  that  is  the  game  plan,  making  sure  that  we  are  protecting
privacy here but at the same time getting better situational aware-
ness. That in effect is the goal so that people can plan their routes
better  and  avoid  traffic  and  keep  traffic  moving,  which  is  totally
green.

Mr. IWASAKI. I would invite the Committee to come to California
and kick the tires of ITS. If you want to come down to the Berkeley
area,  we  can  take  you  out  to  the  Richmond  field  station  and  show
you  the  next  generation  of  these  types  of  technologies,  ITS  tech-
nologies.

Chairman WU. Why don’t we go to the mother lode of traffic and

try it in the Hollywood Freeway on a Friday afternoon?

Mr. IWASAKI. We can take you down there as well, absolutely.
Chairman WU. Dr. Bertini.
Dr.  BERTINI.  These  are  great  examples,  and  I  think  the  answer
to  your  question  is,  some  places  and  some  times  you  can  get  real-
time  information  that  is  useful  for  you.  The  problem  is,  this  is  a
big  jigsaw  puzzle,  and  I  have  been  involved  in  this  for  maybe  the
last  13  years  and  have  seen  different  generations  of  these  compa-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

94

nies  with  different  technologies,  different  ideas.  I  visited  other
countries and kind of kicked the tires of different systems in Japan
and Europe. We have done some research with BMW looking at the
real-time  traffic  information  system  on  some  of  the  autobahns
there.  So  if  you  go  to  a  place  that  is  kind  of  like  a  test  bed  or  has
data in place that has been validated, my concern is that what we
have  is  not  consistent  across  the  country,  so  if  you  have  a  vehicle
and  you  want  to  use  it  in  Portland  but  you  cross  the  Columbia
River to Vancouver, Washington, it may not work because the sen-
sor  infrastructure  may  not  be  there,  the  communication  system
may  be  different.  So  we  have  got  pieces,  we  have  got  demos,  we
have got examples and we have got lots of great ideas but what we
don’t  have  are  fully  deployed  projects.  I  think  we  would  all  like
would be something that is real time, that is available to everyone,
that  is  low  cost,  that  is  proven,  that  you  can  customize  so  you  are
not  getting  information  that  you  don’t  need  or  information  that  is
old.  Maybe  it  is  even  alerting  you  so  you  might  get,  you  know,  a
message that you need to leave for Dulles airport now or you might
get a call, a wake-up call in the morning and it would say take the
Metro  today  because  the  freeway  is  going  to  be  all  jammed  up.  So
the  idea  that  each  user  can  interact  with  the  system  so  they  are
not  getting  information  that  is  outside  their  purview  I  think  is
where  we  are  all  interested  in  going.  We  still  have  a  ways  to  go.
Chairman  WU.  Perfect.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  just  want  to—
as  I  was  listening  to  you  and  the  challenges  that  we  face,  it  is  a
challenge. It is an opportunity. To all of you on the panel, it is kind
of  like  Dr.  Goddard  fooling  around  with  sounding  rockets  in  the
1920s.  To  the  folks  on  this  side  of  the  dais,  it  might  be  like  being
a Congressman and having the Internet and being Al Gore in 1975.
A small political joke, a very small one.

Before we bring the hearing to a close, I want to thank all of our
witnesses.  We  look  forward  to  working  together  with  you  all,  with
Republicans  and  Democrats,  everyone  who  is  interested  in  helping
move  people  the  way  that  they  want  to  be  moved  and  particularly
before  the  next  reauthorization  of  the  Surface  Transportation  Bill.
The  record  will  remain  open  for  additional  statements  from  Mem-
bers and for questions and answers to any follow-up questions that
the  Committee  or  individual  Members  may  ask  of  the  witnesses.  I
want  to  thank  the  witnesses  for  their  tremendous  flexibility,  toler-
ance  and  patience  and  also  the  attendees  in  the  room  today,  and
with  that,  the  witnesses  are  excused  and  the  hearing  is  now  ad-
journed.

[Whereupon, at 12:20 p.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 1:

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

(95)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

96

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses by Paul R. Brubaker, Administrator, Research and Innovative Technology

Administration, U.S. Department of Transportation

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. What  are  the  primary  impediments  to  inter-operability  for  intelligent  transpor-
tation  systems  (ITS)?  If  there  are  technical  challenges,  what  research  is  needed
to overcome those challenges? What actions should the Federal Government take
to promote inter-operability for ITS across regions?

A1. In  general,  the  primary  impediment  to  inter-operability  is  the  lack  of  suffi-
ciently  mature  and  robust  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  (ITS)  standards.  ITS
standards are critical to all applications of ITS, such as ITS infrastructure, traveler
information, and vehicle-based safety technologies. Each area has unique issues that
must  be  addressed,  in  addition  to  development  of  standards.  For  example,  lack  of
staff  experience  in  successfully  procuring  and  operating  standards-compliant  sys-
tems  is  a  particular  impediment  to  deploying  ITS  infrastructure  at  the  State  and
local  level.  For  emerging  wireless  communications  for  vehicle-based  safety,  impedi-
ments  include  resolving  diverse  interests  and  standards  requirements  of  the  broad
range of stakeholders, from traditional ITS equipment manufacturers and customers
to the vehicle and communications equipment industries.

These  technical  challenges  require  research  to  develop  sufficiently  robust  stand-
ards and associated procedures and tools to test conformity; a time-consuming proc-
ess due to the complex nature of ITS technologies. The U.S. DOT ITS program pro-
vides technical and financial support to facilitate standards development, create test
procedures,  and  evaluate  test  results  to  facilitate  the  broad  adoption  of  inter-oper-
able  ITS  technologies  by  State  and  local  governments,  transit  agencies  and  others.
For  emerging  wireless  communications  technologies,  challenges  include  developing
standards  concurrently  with  a  rapidly-advancing  state  of  the  technological  art  and
cooperating  with  both  vehicle  and  traditional  ITS  equipment  manufacturers  and
customers  to  agree  on  standards  that  meet  their  respective  needs.  The  vehicle  in-
dustry  is  a  global  one;  the  most  cost-effective  standards  would  meet  international
as  well  as  U.S.  market  requirements.  Developing  standards  is  complicated  by  the
diversity of worldwide ITS standards and practices.

The  Federal  Government  maintains  a  strong  role  in  promoting  inter-operability.
Facilitating  inter-operability  of  ITS  technologies  remains  a  primary  focus  of  the
DOT’s  ITS  program  for  traditional  ITS  hardware  and  software,  as  well  as  for  the
emerging  vehicle  to  infrastructure  and  to  vehicle  communications  technologies.
DOT’s primary roles include expediting development of standards, enabling testing,
providing  education  and  technical  assistance  on  the  use  of  standards,  and  facili-
tating easy access to information about standards. In accordance with legislative di-
rection,  DOT  developed  the  National  ITS  Architecture  and  mandated  that  project
architectures  be  developed  that  comply  with  the  National  ITS  Architecture.  DOT
provides technical and financial support to develop ITS standards to define architec-
ture interfaces.
Q2. How do energy efficiency and sustainability fit within RITA’s priorities? Do you
anticipate  any  changes  in  the  amount  of  support  for  projects  related  to  energy
efficiency  and  sustainability?  What  percentage  of  university  transportation  cen-
ters  (UTCs)  have  as  increased  energy  efficiency  or  sustainability  as  one  of  their
research  goals?  Should  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  goals  be  integrated
into the R&D at all the UTCs?

A2. Energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  research  supports  DOT’s  ‘‘environmental
stewardship’’ strategic goal, and the DOT research strategy that addresses ‘‘environ-
mental  sustainability.’’  Within  RITA,  the  Hydrogen  Fuels  R&D  Program  and  some
of  the  work  of  the  University  Transportation  Centers  (UTCs)  address  these  prior-
ities.  Thirteen  of  the  UTCs  (22  percent)  have  energy  efficiency  as  primary  research
themes,  and  11  centers  (18  percent)  have  environmental  sustainability  as  primary
research  themes.  We  anticipate  minimal  changes  to  this  support  in  the  near-term,
pending the results of the next surface authorization act.

Energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  goals  should  be  integrated  into  the  R&D  at
all  the  UTCs,  but  only  to  the  extent  practicable.  Due  to  the  differing  research  and
technology strengths and thematic goals of the individual UTCs, the extent of inte-
gration  of  energy  and  environmental  aspects  will  vary  considerably.  All  UTCs  al-
ready have energy efficiency and environmental sustainability issues integrated into
their curricula.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

97

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey

DOT Views and Priorities
Q1. What are the priority research areas for the Research and Innovative Technology
Administration?  How  do  you  plan  to  transfer  successful  research  projects  to
State  DOTs  and  industry  where  they  can  be  implemented?  Additionally,  do  the
statutes governing departmental and university research programs at RITA cur-
rently allow you to effectively manage the Federal Government’s research invest-
ments? If not, do you have suggestions for potential improvements? Finally, does
the funding for current projects within the Department and University Transpor-
tation Centers accurately reflect the Administration’s research priorities?
A1. RITA’s priority research areas mirror the Secretary’s RD&T focus areas:

• Enhance System Performance;
• Reduce Congestion;
• Improve Safety;
• Address Climate Change and Environmental Linkages to Quality of Life;
• Maintain Infrastructure Integrity;
• Meet Freight Logistics and Global Challenges; and
• Assess Policy and System Financing Alternatives.

To a lesser degree, DOT’s priority research areas reflect the Administration’s Re-

search and Development (R&D) Priorities:

• Homeland Security and National Defense;
• Energy and Climate Change Technology;
• Advanced Networking and Information Technology;
• National Nanotechnology Initiative;
• Understanding Complex Biological Systems;
• Environment;
• Next Generation Air Transportation System;
• Federal Scientific Collections; and
• Science of Science Policy.

There cannot be a direct correlation with the Administration’s R&D Priorities, be-
cause  the  Priorities  do  not  include  all  of  DOT’s  mandated  missions  in  safety,  re-
duced  congestion,  global  connectivity,  environmental  stewardship  and  security,  pre-
paredness  and  response.  However,  through  the  DOT  research  coordination  process,
RITA  and  the  other  Operating  Administrations  are  engaged  to  some  degree  in  all
of  the  Priorities.  Flexibility  to  shift  funding  to  the  Administration’s  R&D  Priorities
is  limited  by  legislative  designations  for  specific  research  and  technology  programs
and projects.

Planning  for  research  and  technology  implementation  is  a  priority  for  all  Oper-
ating  Administrations,  with  research  partnerships  including  likely  State  and  local
or industry implementers, and research plans and contracts requiring an implemen-
tation  segment.  Within  RITA,  each  University  Transportation  Center  (UTC)  is  re-
quired  to  present  its  technology  transfer  plan  as  part  of  its  UTC  Strategic  Plan,
which  is  reviewed  by  representatives  of  FHWA,  FTA,  OST,  RITA  and  other  parts
of  DOT.  In  those  plans,  each  UTC  addresses  how  it  plans  to  transfer  successful  re-
search projects to State DOTs and to industry.

In  each  UTC’s  annual  report  to  RITA,  the  UTC  is  required  to  specify  how  it  has
transferred its research results to State DOTs and industry. Each UTC also receives
a  periodic  formal  site  visit  from  a  RITA  team  that  specifically  inquires  about  the
UTC’s  technology  transfer  activities  and  accomplishments  and  includes  face-to-face
interviews  with  representatives  of  the  relevant  State  DOTs  and  industry  regarding
technology transfer.

RITA has sufficient authority to coordinate, facilitate, and review DOT’s research
and  development  programs  and  activities,  and  to  advance  innovative  technologies,
as provided by the Norman Y. Mineta Research and Special Programs Improvement
Act (‘‘Mineta Act,’’ P.L. 108–426, November 30, 2004).

RITA Planning and Coordination
Q2. What led you to institute the new Research Planning and Investment Coordina-
tion  process  at  RITA?  How  will  this  process,  and  especially  the  new  Commu-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

98

nities  of  Interest  model,  affect  current  University  Transportation  Centers?  In
your  testimony  you  state  that  all  projects  will  be  required  to  have  a  mechanism
for  technology  transfer  and  deployment.  Will  currently  funded  projects  be  re-
viewed for compliance?

A2. RITA  is  implementing  the  Research  Planning  and  Investment  Coordination
process,  with  the  full  support  of  DOT,  as  a  means  of  pursuing  the  primary  goals
of the research coordination program, including:

• Completing a full inventory of all DOT R&D projects;
• Assessing those projects for unnecessary duplication;
• Ensuring that all projects support an Administration or Secretarial R&D Pri-

ority;

• Reviewing all projects to ensure that they meet the goals of the R&D Invest-

ment Criteria—relevance, quality and performance.

• Reviewing  funded  and  planned  projects  for  compliance  with  the  requirement

for technology transfer and deployment plans.

The  RPIC  process  builds  upon  the  Research,  Development  and  Technology
(RD&T)  Planning  Council,  Team  and  Process,  established  by  RITA  in  2005.  The
RPIC  process  will  not  affect  current  UTCs,  except  to  tie  in  the  expertise  found  at
the  UTCs  into  the  Communities  of  Interest,  building  the  corporate  expertise  of  the
transportation community. The initially-planned Communities of Interest are:

1. Transportation Planning and Policy Research;
2. Systems Performance Research;
3. Human Factors Research and Applications;
4. Transport, Logistics and Infrastructure Research;
5. Advanced Materials Research;
6. Hazardous Materials Research;
7. Vehicle Systems Research;
8. Communications,  Navigation  and  Surveillance  (CNS)/Traffic  Management;

and

9. Safety Analysis and Risk Management.

Tech Transfer
Q3. In the end, implementation of new technologies will require local developers and
planning  boards  to  accept  and  cooperate  in  their  use.  Do  local  decision-makers
have  access  to  comprehensive  and  comprehensible  data  on  potential  new  tech-
nologies?  Are  pilot  projects  enough  to  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  wide
variety of weather and built environments?

A3. Within  RITA,  the  Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  Joint  Program  Office’s
(ITS  JPO)  Electronic  Document  Library  (EDL)  provides  historical  and  comprehen-
sible  information  on  new,  innovative  technologies  for  transportation.  The  EDL,  a
web-accessible collection of RITA’s National Transportation Library (NTL), provides
access to over 2,100 research reports, lessons learned, product evaluations, and arti-
cles  published  or  sponsored  by  ITS  JPO.  On  average,  over  150  items  are  added  to
EDL annually.

Beyond  ITS  technologies,  the  NTL  cooperates  with  libraries  and  information  pro-
viders  in  State  and  local  agencies  through  regional  networks.  The  purpose  of  these
networks  is  to  facilitate  knowledge  transfer,  including  technology  information  and
applications  reports,  between  members  and  across  other  transportation  stakeholder
groups. This outlet also provides local decision-makers with access to comprehensive
and comprehensible data on new technologies.

Pilot  projects,  and  more  importantly  their  results  and  lessons  learned,  provide
local decision-makers with critical information for the research implementation and
project investment planning process. Depending on the scope of the pilot project, re-
sults  may  or  may  not  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  spectrum  of  environ-
ments  in  the  U.S.,  but  they  do  provide  a  level  of  evaluation  upon  which  other  re-
search  can  be  built  or  technology  investment  decisions  made.  Stakeholder  feedback
on NTL collections indicates that pilot projects, implementation of new technologies,
and  evaluation  of  these  experiences  are  of  high  value  to  State  and  local  decision-
makers, and that more data and information of this type is desired. Successful prac-
tices will also be promulgated through various trade journals, conferences and tech-
nology customers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

99

The  most  effective  support  to  local  agency  technology  transfer  is  FHWA’s  Local
Technical  Assistance  Program  (LTAP).  LTAP  is  a  network  of  transportation  tech-
nology  transfer  centers  established  specifically  to  enhance  local  agency  road  man-
agement and safety. There are 51 LTAP Centers, one in each state and Puerto Rico,
and seven regional Tribal Technical Assistance Centers (TTAP) that help tribal gov-
ernments  improve  transportation  management.  The  LTAP–TTAP  Centers  provide
training  and  materials  to  over  12,500  local  communities.  In  2007,  the  LTAP  and
TTAP  Centers  provided  training  and  technology  transfer  services  to  more  than
115,000 people at 4,000 training sessions; provided information newsletters to more
than  131,000  local  contacts,  and  distributed  250,000  materials  to  local  agencies.
RITA’s University Transportation Centers (UTCs) often host LTAP Centers, making
the transition from technology to local training easier.

Workforce Training
Q4. The U.S. DOT estimates that there are 349 thousand people employed in bridge,
street,  and  highway  construction.  What  impacts  do  the  research  activities  dis-
cussed at the hearing have on these workers? Will implementation of sustainable
transportation technologies require wide-scale training and education? If so, who
is responsible for providing this training?

A4. We  are  pleased  the  committee  recognizes  the  essential  role  of  a  well  trained
workforce as a key component of a viable transportation system. Our experience has
shown that addressing this need requires partnership across the industry which in-
cludes  the  collaborative  efforts  of  the  private,  education  and  public  sectors.  DOT,
and  especially  FHWA,  have  sponsored  numerous  activities  to  support  workforce
partnerships,  including  partnering  with  the  Transportation  Research  Board  and
Council  of  University  Transportation  Centers  (CUTC)  on  studies  and  workshops,
and working with the Education Subcommittee of the President’s President’s Coun-
cil  of  Advisors  on  Science  and  Technology  to  develop  a  federal  agenda  of  actions.
Through  implementation  of  SAFETEA–LU,  we  have  expanded  the  number  of  uni-
versities focusing on transportation, and initiated new grant programs for attracting
students  to  transportation  careers  and  development  of  new  transportation  curricu-
lums.

To  obtain  the  benefits  of  new  research  and  technologies,  whether  from  federal  or
State  research,  educational  institutions  or  other  parts  of  the  transportation  indus-
try,  joint  efforts  from  across  the  transportation  community  are  required  for  imple-
mentation.  For  example,  in  2007  FHWA’s  National  Highway  Institute  conducted
over 700 training and professional development activities reaching over 19,000 peo-
ple,  and  the  LTAP–TTAP  centers  provide  training  to  transportation  employees  at
professional,  journeyman  and  apprentice  levels.  We  partner  with  professional  asso-
ciations and organizations (e.g., American Association of State Highway and Trans-
portation  Officials,  American  Public  Transportation  Association,  Institute  of  Trans-
portation  Engineers,  American  Public  Works  Association,  National  Association  of
County  Engineers)  to  move  innovation  from  research  to  application  through  profes-
sional development and training activities. The expanding FHWA and FTA partner-
ships  with  RITA’s  UTCs  goes  far  in  addressing  transportation’s  future  workforce
needs through education and professional development.

Coordination
Q5. How  can  RITA  and  the  other  agencies  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  in-
crease  the  coordination  within  the  research  community  and  awareness  of  re-
search results in the broader community

A5. RITA, in collaboration with the other Operating Administrations, has made sig-
nificant progress in improving coordination within the transportation research com-
munity,  and  across  the  broader  transportation  planning,  design,  construction,  oper-
ations  and  maintenance  enterprise.  All  OAs  are  active  members  of  the  DOT  RD&T
Planning  Council  and  Planning  Team,  which  has  been  successful  in  increasing
program-  and  project-level  coordination  within  the  DOT  research  community.  All
OAs  continue  to  develop  the  needed  external  partnership  with  State  and  local
DOTs,  universities,  other  research  entities,  and  stakeholder  organizations,  to  in-
crease  awareness  of  research  in  progress,  and  research  results.  Specifically,  the  ex-
isting  relationship  between  RITA’s  National  Transportation  Library  and  the  Trans-
portation Research Board has increased broad community awareness of research re-
sults and new technologies. The development of regional Transportation Knowledge
Networks (TKNs), bringing federal, State, university, association and other partners

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

100

together  specifically  in  collaboration  for  information  sharing,  promises  significant
benefits in dissemination and deployment of research results.

Operations & Maintenance Costs
Q6. A recurring criticism of some sustainable transportation practices is the need for
regular  maintenance  or  significantly  increased  initial  deployment  costs.  Are
transportation research agencies and centers capable of adequately assessing life
cycle costs when developing new technologies and processes?

A6. We  believe  that  the  University  Transportation  Centers  (UTCs),  and  other  re-
search centers supporting DOT, State DOTs and industry have the capability to con-
duct life cycle costing in support of technology transfer and commercialization. Most
of  RITA’s  UTCs  use  life  cycle  costing  as  a  standard  practice,  and  offer  their  exper-
tise to State DOTs and other implementing agencies.

Questions submitted by Representative Adrian Smith
Q1. By how much does the total cost of construction of a mile-lane increase for every

$1/gallon increase in fuel?

A1. The U.S. Department of Transportation does not collect information that allows
calculation  of  the  increase  in  lane-mile  construction  costs  as  a  result  of  fuel  price
increases. RITA’s Bureau of Transportation Statistics (BTS) could not find a reliable
estimate of this impact; anecdotal calculations vary widely.

FHWA provides guidance to State Departments of Transportation (DOT’s) for use
in  preparing  fuel  price  escalation  clauses  in  highway  construction  contracts.  This
guidance  indicates  a  scope  of  construction  cost  impacts  from  on-site  fuel  costs,  but
not  the  significant  impact  of  fuel  costs  on  materials  such  as  asphalt  and  steel.  The
FHWA  Technical  Advisory  may  be 
found  at:  http://www.fhwa.dot.gov/
programadmin/contracts/ta50803.cfm.  Broader  discussions  of  recent  highway  con-
struction  cost  increases  and  issues  are  available  at:  http://www.fhwa.dot.gov/
programadmin/contracts/price.cfm

In addition, there is abundant anecdotal evidence of energy prices driving up the

costs of highway construction,. Some illustrative examples include:

June 

2008. 

Analysis, 

• Florida Department of Transportation finds that leading indicators, including
diesel  prices,  continues  to  put  upward  pressure  on  construction  prices,  but
competitive  pressures  have  some  moderating  impacts  on  those  increases.
Highway  Construction  Leading  Indicator  Report,  June  2008.  http://
www.dot.state.fl.us/planning/policy/costs/indicators-may08.pdf
• Washington State Department of Transportation provides a summary of mar-
ket  analyses  of  several  key  markets  from  various  publications,  including  as-
phalt,  concrete,  fuel,  lumber  and  plywood,  steel,  and  highway  material  and
construction.  WSDOT  Market 
http://
www.wsdot.wa.gov/biz/construction/CostIndex/CostIndexPdf/20082QMarket
%20Analysis.pdf
• California Department of Transportation reports price trends for several con-
struction  items,  including  roadway  excavation,  aggregate  base,  asphalt  con-
crete  pavement,  Portland  cement  concrete  pavement,  Portland  cement  con-
crete  structures,  bar  reinforcing  steel,  and  structural  steel.  Summary,  Price
Index  for  Selected  Construction  Items,  Second  Quarter  ending  June  30,  2008.
http://www.dot.ca.gov/hq/esc/oe/contract¥progress/cost-index-summary.pdf
• The  American  Road  and  Transportation  Builders  Association  reports  on  the
increases  in  highway  construction  materials  prices.  Highway  Construction
Producer  Prices,  July  2008.  http://www.artba.org/economics¥research/re-
cent¥statistics/prod¥price¥index/PPI%20July%2008%20Report.pdf
• The Associated General Contractors of America reports on the increased costs
of  steel  and  fuel  and  their  impacts  on  construction  costs.  Construction  News,
April 
http://agc.org/cs/news¥media/press¥room/press¥release?
pressrelease.id=167
• The U.S. DOT Office of the Inspector General reports on the extent of recent
price  increases  in  project  construction  costs,  the  main  drivers  of  those  in-
creases,  whether  the  increases  are  transitory  or  structural,  and  the  extent  of
regional differences. Growth in Highway Construction Costs and Maintenance
Costs,  Report  CR–2007–079, 
http://www.oig.dot.gov/
StreamFile?file=/data/pdfdocs/Growth¥in¥Highway¥Construction¥and¥
Maintenance¥Costs¥Final.pdf

2007. 

2008. 

Sept. 

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

101

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Randell  H.  Iwasaki,  Chief  Deputy  Director,  California  Department  of

Transportation

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. What  are  the  primary  impediments  to  inter-operability  for  Intelligent  Transpor-
tation  Systems  (ITS)?  If  there  are  technical  challenges,  what  research  is  needed
to overcome those challenges? What actions should the Federal Government take
to promote inter-operability for ITS across regions?

A1. Inter-operability  is  seamless  and  efficient  interconnectivity.  Caltrans  has  ac-
tively  participated  in  many  of  the  national  ITS  standards  development  efforts,  and
it is considered a pioneer in the field of ITS inter-operability. Starting from the Mo-
bility 2000 Initiative and the early Intelligent Vehicle-Highway Systems (IVHS) Ar-
chitecture  efforts,  Caltrans  established  the  Testbed  Center  for  Inter-operability
(TCFI: 1992–2002), which addressed many ITS inter-operability issues, including:

• Technical  inter-operability,  such  as  communication  inter-operability  and  traf-

fic control inter-operability.

• Information inter-operability.
• Operational inter-operability, especially in the areas of regional ITS.

In  response  to  9/11  and  other  natural  disaster  events,  better  situational  aware-
ness  and  new  emergency  management  approaches  put  ‘‘First  Responders’’  inter-
operability  at  the  top  of  most  agencies’  goals  for  safety  and  security.  To  this  end,
Caltrans has participated in the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) efforts to
address First Responders’ inter-operability needs for the 21 Century.

Primary Impediments:

a. Availability  of  funds  to  develop,  implement,  and  ensure  compliance  with

standards and inter-operability best practices.

b. Weak  public  agency  involvement  in  the  standards  testing  programs,  espe-
cially  compared  with  the  early  days  of  IVHS/ITS.  Public  sector  ITS  practi-
tioners are the best agents of change within government.

Technical challenges:

a. Many  ITS  projects  address  inter-operability  as  an  after  thought,  and  in  ad-
hoc  way.  A  ‘‘Design  for  Inter-operability’’  philosophy  needs  validated  stand-
ards,  test  metrics,  and  identified  best  practices,  many  of  which  don’t  exist
today.

b. Developing  inter-operability  best  practices  requires  familiarity  with  the

evolving standards and the system(s) in an ongoing basis.

c. There are excessive delays between research completion and dissemination of

research findings/publications.

d. There  is  a  lack  of  standards  quality  assurance  (validation  and  testability).
e. Gaps  exist  between  research  and  real-world  operations  (internal  technology

transfer).

Needed research:

a. Standards testing and validation.
b. Inter-operability testing of new and after-market technologies.
c. Integration and standards compliance.

Actions needed from the Federal Government:

a. Increase  the  level  of  funds  for  State  and  local  agencies  to  implement  and

validate measures of inter-operability.

b. Help  make  research  findings  available  to  the  ITS  community  and  require
that  lessons  learned,  test  procedures,  and  metrics  be  widely  distributed  and
reviewed beyond the funded entities.

c. Facilitate the use of Web technology to accelerate the dissemination and vali-

dation of current research activities.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

102

Q2. How  do  you  find  a  balance  between  competing  requirements  for  infrastructure
such as safety, cost, and sustainability? Is there adequate data to provide a real-
istic picture of the benefits and disadvantages of various technologies and mate-
rials?

A2. As the owner and operator of the State Highway System, Caltrans is frequently
challenged  to  find  an  acceptable  balance  between  safety,  cost,  and  sustainability
when deploying new infrastructure. To overcome this challenge, we adhere to State
laws,  established  policies,  and  specific  work  plans  that  guide  our  actions.  Per  the
California  State  Legislature,  Section  167  of  the  California  Streets  and  Highways
Code establishes the sequence of priorities for Caltrans as:
1. Stewardship of the existing State Highway System.
2. Improving safety.
3. Expanding capacity.
4. Reducing environmental impact.

This legislation also identifies specific plans that we develop to guide us in imple-
menting these priorities. For stewardship, we have the Rehabilitation Plan and the
Maintenance Plan under the State Highway Operation and Protection Program. For
safety,  we  follow  the  Strategic  Highway  Safety  Plan.  For  capacity,  we  use  the  Re-
gional Improvement Plan and the Inter-regional Improvement Plan under the State
Transportation  Improvement  Program.  Finally,  for  protecting  the  environment,  we
follow  the  guidelines  under  the  Environmental  Enhancement  and  Mitigation  Pro-
gram.

Caltrans has also adopted departmental goals that are closely related to the prior-
ities  listed  above.  We  consider  these  goals  when  making  trade-offs  between  safety,
cost, and sustainability. Here are the five goals for Caltrans:

• Safety—Provide the safest transportation system in the Nation for users and

workers.

• Mobility—Maximize transportation system performance and accessibility.
• Delivery—Efficiently deliver quality transportation projects and services.
• Stewardship—Preserve and enhance California’s resources and assets.
• Service—Promote quality service through an excellent workforce.

Regarding the availability of data that identifies the benefits and liabilities of new
technologies, we typically make the pursuit of this information a crucial part of the
research  that  leads  to  the  deployment  of  new  technologies.  Whenever  possible,  we
use  pilot  deployments  to  help  capture  this  data,  so  that  decision-makers  can  con-
sider  real-world  experience  when  determining  whether  or  not  to  fund  full-scale  de-
ployment.
Q3. What  methods  does  California  use  to  encourage  private  developers  to  follow  the
state’s  example  with  implementation  of  sustainable  and  energy  efficient  prac-
tices,  materials  and  technologies?  Are  there  incentives  for  the  use  of  these  tech-
nologies and materials?

A3. Two pieces of recent legislation, one enacted and one pending, provide the basis
for answering these questions. Both are described in detail below.
Assembly Bill 32 (AB 32), Nunez. Air pollution: Greenhouse Gases: California Global
Warming Solutions Act of 2006.

In response to the requirements set forth in AB 32, on or before January 1, 2009,
the state’s Air Resources Board (ARB) shall prepare and approve a Scoping Plan for
achieving  the  maximum  technologically  feasible  and  cost-effective  reductions  in
greenhouse gas (GHG) emissions from sources or categories of sources of greenhouse
gases  by  2020.  On  June  26,  2008,  ARB  staff  presented  the  initial  draft  of  the  AB
32 Scoping Plan for Board review. The AB 32 Scoping Plan contains the main strat-
egies California will use to reduce the GHGs that cause climate change. It includes
incentives  for  use  in  GHG  reductions,  including  the  use  of  ‘‘feebates’’  (which  would
combine  a  rebate  program  for  low-emitting  vehicles  with  a  fee  program  for  high-
emitting  vehicles),  congestion  pricing,  Pay-As-You-Drive  (PAYD)  insurance  pro-
grams  (in  which  motorists  could  lower  their  insurance  costs  by  driving  less),  and
Indirect Source Rules (which are designed to address air pollutant emissions associ-
ated  with  residential  and  commercial  developments  through  better  urban  design
and development patterns).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

103

Pending  Legislation:  Senate  Bill  1754  (SB  1754),  Kehoe.  Energy:  California  Alter-
native  Energy  and  Advanced  Transportation  Financing  Authority.  2007–2008  Ses-
sion.

This  bill  would  establish  an  authority  to  finance  renewable  energy  sources.  The
authority  would  establish  a  renewable  energy  program  to  provide  financial  assist-
ance to public power entities, independent generators, utilities, or businesses manu-
facturing components or systems, or both. Assistance would be used to generate new
and  renewable  energy  sources,  develop  clean  and  efficient  distributed  generation,
and  demonstrate  the  economic  feasibility  of  new  technologies,  such  as  solar,  photo-
voltaic, wind, and ultra-low emission equipment.

In addition, this bill would authorize the authority to purchase alternative source
energy  or  projects  for  sale  to  a  specified  participating  party  and  to  make  a  loan  to
a participating party to purchase alternative source energy or projects.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey

Tech Transfer
Q1. In the end, implementation of new technologies will require local developers and
planning  boards  to  accept  and  cooperate  in  their  use.  Do  local  decision-makers
have  access  to  comprehensive  and  comprehensible  data  on  potential  new  tech-
nologies?  Are  pilot  projects  enough  to  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  wide
variety of weather and built environments?

A1. Pilot  projects  are  valuable  mechanisms  to  evaluate  technologies  within  specific
parameters. However, the achieved results are specific to the conditions set forth in
the  variables  of  the  project,  and  may  not  be  appropriate  across  varying  cir-
cumstances.

Activities proposed under the AB 32 Scoping Plan both (a) create a need for better
information  to  be  made  available  as  part  of  the  local  decision-making  process,  and
(b) offer a new source of data that can be used to analyze effectiveness of new tech-
nologies in a variety of situations.

Under  AB  32,  local  governments  and  regional  government  agencies  are  seen  as
essential partners in achieving California’s greenhouse gas goals. Local governments
are  encouraged  to  build  on  existing  strategies  and  adopt  best  practices,  such  as
those  developed  by  the  Institute  for  Local  Government’s  ‘‘California  Climate  Action
Network,’’  to  achieve  greenhouse  gas  reductions.  They  are  also  encouraged  to  de-
velop  climate  action  plans,  to  set  2020  targets  to  reduce  greenhouse  gas  emissions,
and to incorporate greenhouse gas reduction measures and regional blueprint plans
into their general plans.

As  part  of  process,  the  California  Air  Resources  Board,  along  with  relevant  State
agencies,  will  work  with  the  California  Climate  Action  Registry,  ICLEI–Local  Gov-
ernments  for  Sustainability,  Local  Government  Commission,  and  the  Institute  for
Local  Government’s  ‘‘California  Climate  Action  Network,’’  to  develop  measurement
and tracking protocols, planning tools, and best practices to assist local governments
in  planning  for,  quantifying  and  reporting  greenhouse  gas  emissions  reductions.
Using these tools, ARB encourages local governments to set municipal and commu-
nity-wide  2020  greenhouse  gas  reduction  goals  and  adopt  measures  and  best  prac-
tices  to  meet  those  goals.  ARB  will  work  with  local  governments  to  reconcile  local
level  accounting  with  State  and  regional  emissions  tracking  as  the  AB  32  Scoping
Plan is implemented.

Workforce Training
Q2. The U.S. DOT estimates that there are 349 thousand people employed in bridge,
street,  and  highway  construction.  What  impacts  do  the  research  activities  dis-
cussed at the hearing have on these workers? Will implementation of sustainable
transportation technologies require wide-scale training and education? If so, who
is responsible for providing this training?

A2. The  objective  of  research  is  to  find  ways  for  these  people  to  plan,  design,  con-
struct, operate, and maintain the highways faster, safer, and with greater efficiency
and sustainability. For example:

a. Technological  advancements  in  automated  three-dimensional  surveys  (total
station)  reduce  the  exposure  of  survey  workers  to  traffic  and  enable  three-
dimensional  design  and  GPS-guided  construction  equipment.  The  result  is
quicker, more accurate construction with fewer workers needed.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

104

b. Intelligent  Transportation  Systems  will  assist  motorist  in  construction  work

zones and provide a safer environment.

Implementation  of  sustainable  transportation  technologies  requires  two  forms  of
training and education. The first is wide-scale education of the workforce for modern
technologies  such  as  computers,  communications,  and  sustainable  transportation
systems.  Schools  (K–12),  universities,  colleges,  and  trade  schools  have  the  primary
responsibility  with  support  from  industry  and  government.  The  second  is  specific
training for the individual technology. Users of the technology have the primary re-
sponsibility  for  this  training,  with  the  assistance  from  manufacturers,  researchers,
industry organizations, and government.

Coordination
Q3. How  can  RITA  and  the  other  agencies  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  in-
crease  the  coordination  within  the  research  community  and  awareness  of  re-
search results in the broader community?

A3. Caltrans is involved in a number of efforts to improve coordination of transpor-
tation  research,  including  the  AASHTO  Research  Advisory  Committee’s  Coordina-
tion  and  Collaboration  Task  Group.  An  Authorization  Position  Paper  developed  by
this Task Group, and adopted by AASHTO, is attached. We concur with the findings
and recommendations presented in this paper. Among these are the following high-
lights:

• Transportation research coordination and collaboration is needed to:

Æ Transfer knowledge or technology
Æ Prevent research duplication
Æ Identify research gaps
Æ Save time and money.

are unfunded, and administered by volunteers.

• Most current transportation research coordination and collaboration activities
• Congress should fund coordination, collaboration, and deployment of research
efforts to support the transportation sector, including federal, State, and local
transportation organizations.
• Funding should include support for development, maintenance and marketing

of a research collaboration web site.

Operations & Maintenance Costs
Q4. A recurring criticism of some sustainable transportation practices is the need for
regular  maintenance  or  significantly  increased  initial  deployment  costs.  Are
transportation research agencies and centers capable of adequately assessing life
cycle  costs  when  developing  new  technologies  and  processes?  Are  states  and  lo-
calities  meeting  their  current  operations  &  maintenance  requirements  and  do
they  have  the  capacity  to  perform  more?  What  are  the  consequences  of  failing
to perform this work?

A4. The cost of operating and maintaining new technologies after they are deployed
is becoming a greater challenge as time goes on. Caltrans has recently begun consid-
ering  life  cycle  costs  when  making  the  decision  on  whether  or  not  to  deploy  new
technologies in capital projects. In the past, the divisions within Caltrans that were
planning, designing, and constructing the facilities that include new technologies did
not  always  consider  the  needs  of  the  divisions  that  would  operate  and  maintain
these  facilities  over  time.  Therefore,  they  were  not  always  built  with  ease  of  oper-
ation  and  maintenance  in  mind,  which  proved  to  be  a  challenge  for  the  divisions
that inherited them. We’ve been working to improve the coordination between these
two  groups  to  ensure  that  new  facilities  can  be  sustained  over  their  lifetime.  The
answers to your specific questions are shown below.

Capable of assessing life cycle costs?

We  are  keenly  aware  of  the  need  to  estimate  the  life  cycle  costs  of  a  new  tech-
nology as part of the research that develops it, including an evaluation of the trade-
offs  associated  with  one  that  might  have  a  higher  initial  deployment  cost,  but  a
lower  life  cycle  cost  overall.  This  estimate  serves  as  one  of  the  primary  decision-
making criteria when determining whether or not to deploy. The accuracy of the es-
timate  varies,  depending  on  the  type  of  new  technology.  If  it  is  primarily  a  refine-
ment  of  an  existing  product  or  process,  it  is  easier  to  quantify  the  life  cycle  costs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

105

If  it  is  a  revolutionary  new  product  or  process,  it  is  much  more  challenging  to  esti-
mate these costs, and sometimes we must wait until the product or process has been
implemented so that we have a chance to collect historical data.

Meeting current O&M requirements?

We  face  a  challenge  here  in  that  the  funding  mechanisms  for  developing  and  de-
livering  capital  improvements  are  not  linked  to  the  ones  that  fund  operations  and
maintenance,  so  inventories  of  specialized  equipment  and  facilities  can  increase
without  a  corresponding  increase  in  the  resources  necessary  to  operate  and  main-
tain them. We have made some improvements in this arena, by better capturing the
historical  operations  and  maintenance  workload  data  for  each  inventory  item,  and
then  requesting  additional  resources  through  our  budgeting  process.  For  example,
we  know  that  historically  it  takes  a  certain  number  of  hours  per  year  for  a  Traffic
Engineer to observe the operation of a signalized intersection and adjust the timing
plan  to  ensure  the  smooth  movement  of  traffic  through  the  intersection.  However,
in  spite  of  having  this  historical  workload  data  to  support  requests  for  additional
resources, we are sometimes under-resourced for these needs, resulting in a reduced
Level-of-Service  for  the  facility.  In  these  days  of  budget  shortfalls,  it  is  becoming
more  difficult  to  sustain  our  existing  infrastructure,  let  alone  adding  to  it.  We  are
sometimes limited to providing only the level of support that is legally required.

Consequences of failure to perform O&M?

The biggest consequence of failure to perform operations and maintenance is that
the  new  facility  may  not  perform  at  an  optimal  Level-of-Service,  or  that  it  may  not
work at all. For example, we have about 2500 Vehicle Detection Stations (VDS) de-
ployed  statewide,  primarily  using  inductive  loop  technology  for  vehicle  sensing.
These VDSs serve multiple purposes, from collecting traffic counts, to detecting inci-
dents, to providing data for estimating travel times. However, at any one time, only
70–80  percent  of  the  stations  may  be  reporting  valid  data,  due  to  a  variety  of  rea-
sons.  We  do  not  have  enough  resources  to  continuously  maintain  the  stations  that
go down, so we have to prioritize the stations that need maintenance based on their
location, and service those at the top of the list first.

Based on this example, it is easy to see why we are concerned about the reliability
of any new technology that we add to our system. We need to know that it will per-
form  its  intended  function  without  causing  additional  effort  for  either  operation  or
maintenance.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

106

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Robert  L.  Bertini,  P.E.,  Director,  Oregon  Transportation  Research  and
Education  Consortium  (OTREC);  Associate  Professor,  Portland  State  University

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. You note in your testimony that all OTREC research projects have a technology
transfer  plan.  Can  you  provide  additional  detail  on  how  those  plans  are  devel-
oped?  What  would  you  recommend  to  other  researchers  struggling  with  tech-
nology transfer?

A1. In  the  context  of  the  University  Transportation  Center  (UTC)  program,  tech-
nology transfer means making transportation research results available to potential
users  in  a  form  that  can  be  implemented,  utilized  or  otherwise  applied.  Each
OTREC proposal is evaluated in terms of the quality of its plan for research imple-
mentation.  For  most  research  projects  there  are  several  key  ingredients  that  lead
to  successful  technology  transfer,  which  we  recommend  for  anyone  who  is  consid-
ering technology transfer:

• Incorporating  an  external  partner  (transportation  agency,  private  industry,
advocacy group, etc.) into the development of the project proposal. The federal
match requirements encourage this and help ensure that there is an external
advocate who is interested in the project results.

• Creation  of  a  technical  advisory  committee  who  helps  develop  and  refine  the
work plan, monitors the project while the research is conducted, helps resolve
any  problems  and  avoid  pitfalls,  reviews  project  products,  provides  peer  re-
view of final report and assists with project implementation.

• Each  proposal  must  include  a  good  literature  review.  This  helps  ensure  that
there  is  no  duplication  of  effort  and  also  reveals  where  other  researchers  are
working  on  similar  problems.  This  can  encourage  collaboration  and  commu-
nication  with  others  who  are  tackling  similar  research  topics,  and  can  aid  in
technology transfer through established channels.

• Provide travel funding for principal investigators developing presentations for
relevant  conferences  such  as  the  Transportation  Research  Board  Annual
Meeting,  ITS  America  Annual  Meeting,  ITS  World  Congress,  Institute  of
Transportation Engineers Annual Meeting, Women’s Transportation Seminar,
American Society of Engineers, etc. These conferences also provide opportuni-
ties for students to present the results of their research and receive feedback.
• Include project details in national databases including the Transportation Re-
search  Board’s  Research  in  Progress  (RiP)  database  upon  project  inception,
and  upon  completion  the  final  report  is  submitted  to  the  Transportation  Re-
search  Information  Service  (TRIS  Online)  through  the  Bureau  of  Transpor-
tation Statistics’ National Transportation Library.

• Each  final  report  is  posted  on  the  OTREC  web  site  available  for  free
download, and sent to Northwestern University Transportation Library, Volpe
National  Transportation  Systems  Center,  the  Institute  of  Transportation
Studies  Library  at  the  University  of  California  at  Berkeley,  the  TRB  Library
and NTIS.

• In  addition  to  the  final  report,  OTREC  encourages  publications  for  peer-re-
viewed  academic  journals,  professional  publications,  and  conference  pro-
ceedings.  In  addition,  the  OTREC  web  site  includes  a  project  web  page  for
each project that includes the final report and links to any other publications
and presentations. We plan to include short video presentations from each re-
searcher  describing  their  project  and  its  results—these  videos  can  be  sub-
mitted  to  YouTube  for  wide  dissemination.  The  OTREC  newsletter  features
concise, easily digestible articles summarizing the results and benefits of each
project in a way that can be read by nontechnical people and decision-makers.
• Researchers  are  invited  to  present  at  the  Portland  State  University  Center
for  Transportation  Studies  weekly  Transportation  Seminar  that  reaches  not
only the local transportation community but anyone who wishes to participate
via  our  live  video  stream  or  our  archived  seminar  podcasts  which  are  avail-
able free in perpetuity.
• We  encourage  faculty  to  incorporate  research  results  into  their  course  work
and to consider developing new academic and professional courses as new top-
ics  emerge.  OTREC  funds  development  of  courses  and  course  modules,  and

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

107

also works with other organizations to offer and sponsor conferences and pro-
fessional development lectures, workshops and symposia.

• OTREC  encourages  use  of  new  and  emerging  media  for  technology  transfer.
• Close contact with university commercialization officers is also crucial to effi-

ciently move intellectual property into the marketplace as relevant.

Q2. In  order  for  some  intelligent  transportation  systems  to  be  effective  in  reducing
congestion  and  fuel  waste,  there  need  to  be  changes  in  driver  behavior.  For  ex-
ample,  drivers  must  be  willing  to  change  their  route  in  response  to  real  time
traffic  information,  or  must  be  willing  to  slow  down  in  response  to  variable
speed limits. What steps must both researchers and policy-makers take to ensure
that  driver  behavior  changes  in  response  to  intelligent  transportation  systems?
How can you test a given technology to determine whether it works in an imper-
fect, real-world situation?

A2. Over  the  last  20  years,  experience  in  the  U.S.  and  abroad  has  shown  that  cus-
tomers  will  adopt  intelligent  transportation  systems  (ITS)  technologies  and  change
behavior if there are clear benefits for doing so. These benefits may manifest them-
selves  in  the  form  of  reduced  travel  time  (coupled  with  reduced  fuel  consumption,
greenhouse gas emissions and energy use and improved safety), improved travel re-
liability  or  information  that  increases  user  confidence  in  the  overall  transportation
system.  The  best  example  is  the  wide  adoption  of  electronic  toll  collection  tech-
nology.  Users  are  willing  to  adopt  the  technology  knowing  that  they  will  not  have
to stop to pay a toll at a toll booth, nor will they have to fumble for change or open
their window during inclement weather. A similar result has occurred in cities that
have  adopted  smart  cards  used  for  payment  of  transit  fares  or  parking  fees-inte-
grated  payment  systems  offer  clear  benefits  to  users  that  are  well  understood
through  comprehensive  research  and  evaluations  in  advance.  In  this  context,  an-
other  important  element  is  inter-operability.  Whether  one  is  considering  electronic
toll  collection;  smart  card  payment  systems,  truck  pre-clearance  systems  or  any
other transponder-based systems, they should be inter-operable across jurisdictional
boundaries. This is an area where federal influence can help substantially.

The  more  broad  issue  of  encouraging  travelers  to  change  behavior  in  response  to
traveler  information  (this  could  include  both  pre-trip  and  on-route,  and  can  include
changing  a  driver’s  route,  travel  mode,  time  of  travel,  or  the  need  to  travel  at  all)
requires developing a strong trust relationship between the customer and the infor-
mation  provider  (can  be  public  or  private).  It  is  important  that  customers  see  the
information  as  reliable  and  somewhat  customized  to  their  needs.  An  ongoing,  con-
tinuing,  proactive  evaluation  program  that  compares  reported  travel  times  on  the
network  with  actual  experiences  from  drivers  will  help  convey  the  performance  of
the  system  to  users  and  decision-makers.  Often  when  an  ITS  system  is  deployed,
an initial evaluation will be conducted, but it is rare that an ongoing reporting sys-
tem  is  maintained.  We  recommend  partnerships  between  transportation  agencies
and university researchers who can help with such ongoing evaluations.

Some  ITS  applications  aim  to  improve  safety  or  reduce  congestion  by  monitoring
or  reducing  traffic  speed.  For  example,  variable  speed  limit  systems  have  been  de-
ployed in work zones or along urban corridors that experience recurrent congestion.
By  reducing  speeds  at  the  appropriate  times  and  locations,  safety  can  be  improved
and increased throughput can be achieved, which provides benefits in terms of crash
reductions and savings in fuel consumption and greenhouse gas emissions. For these
systems,  good  evaluations  are  needed  to  inspire  customer  confidence,  but  the  most
important  element  is  enforcement.  For  example,  variable  speed  limit  systems  in
Germany include speed cameras that can issue tickets to violating drivers. Funding
for implementation of variable speed limit systems should include funds for evalua-
tions and enforcement.

There are several key steps that are involved in testing a given technology to de-

termine whether it works in an imperfect, real-world situation:

• Develop  plan  for  implementing  technology  in  a  collaborative  environment,
preferably  with  key  representatives  of  transportation  agencies,  the  private
sector,  the  public,  decision-makers  and  ideally  the  university  research  com-
munity.

• Conduct  a  scan  of  international  or  domestic  applications  of  similar  tech-

nologies in order to gain lessons learned.

• Depending  on  the  exact  nature  of  the  technology,  tests  can  be  conducted
through customer focus groups, computerized simulations or driver simulator
environments.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

108

• Incorporate  a  data  collection  component  and  an  evaluation  plan  into  the  ini-
tial  design  of  the  technology  application,  including  the  need  for  data
archiving.  Be  sure  to  include  a  mechanism  for  collecting  ‘‘before’’  data  for
later comparison to ‘‘after’’ data once the system is tested or deployed.
• Sometimes  a  technology  application  can  be  tested  in  a  pilot  study  environ-
ment, and if this is possible it should be done in the context of an evaluation
that  includes  a  sample  of  potential  users.  The  inclusion  of  a  ‘‘feedback’’  look
in  the  pilot  and  ultimate  implementation  can  allow  for  modifications  in  re-
sponse to users and a technical evaluation.

Many  times  a  transportation  technology  can  be  tried  with  low  risk,  and  in  these
cases the real-world, imperfect implementations should be seen as successful as long
as lessons learned are documented and shared with others.
Q3. You  discuss  transportation-related  education  activities  at  partner  universities.
What does the typical curriculum cover? Are energy efficiency and sustainability
in  transportation  infrastructure  included?  If  not,  do  you  think  that  these  goals
should be part of transportation-related curriculum, and who should be involved
in developing new curriculum?

A3. The  broad  array  of  transportation  professionals  in  the  U.S.  receive  education
from  high  schools,  community  colleges,  professional  schools,  certification  programs,
as well as baccalaureate and graduate degree programs at colleges and universities.
Generally  speaking,  there  are  professional  organizations,  accreditation  bodies,  and
university  departments  and  governance  structures  that  oversee  and  influence  cur-
riculum  development  and  content.  Individual  faculty  typically  work  with  their  col-
leagues to develop and propose new courses that can be offered, improved, and then
must  be  approved  at  departmental,  college  and  university  wide  levels  through  the
faculty senate’s curriculum committee structure. Individual degree programs are ac-
credited by national organizations that focus on specific disciplines. Often individual
departments  will  have  external  advisory  boards  made  up  of  industry  professionals
and alumni who can weigh in on course and program offerings.

Our  four  partner  universities  in  our  consortium  offer  three  different  under-
graduate degrees that specifically prepare students for careers in the transportation
field:

• B.S.  in  Civil  Engineering  (PSU,  OSU  and  OIT):  undergraduates  are  required
to  take  two  transportation  engineering  courses  that  include  a  small  amount
of  material  related  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  in  transportation
infrastructure  (historically  not  a  prime  focus  but  this  is  expected  to  change).

• B.A./B.S. in Community Development (PSU)
• B.A. in Supply and Logistics Management (PSU)

At  the  undergraduate  level,  it  is  clear  that  students  are  very  interested  in  the
issues of sustainability and energy efficiency. OTREC and the University of Idaho’s
National  Institute  for  Advanced  Transportation  Technology  (NIATT),  the  Region  X
Transportation  Consortium,  the  Institute  of  Transportation  Engineers,  the  Council
of  University  Transportation  Centers,  and  the  Transportation  Research  Board,  are
all  collaborating  to  sponsor  a  conference  in  June  2009  that  will  focus  on  improving
the  undergraduate  transportation  engineering  course.  We  expect  that  new  modules
dealing with energy efficiency and sustainability will be developed. It is appropriate
that  these  organizations  are  involved  in  developing  new  curricula.  Transportation
agencies  and  private  firms  who  hire  transportation  graduates  should  also  be  in-
volved.

At  the  graduate  level,  our  partner  universities  offer  nine  degrees  at  the  Master’s

level, three doctoral level degrees and one graduate certificate:

OSU)

• Master of Urban and Regional Planning (PSU)
• Master  of  Science  in  Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering  (PSU  and  OSU)
• Master  of  Engineering  in  Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering  (PSU  and
• Master  of  Engineering  in  Civil  and  Environmental  Engineering  Management
• Master of Urban Studies (PSU)
• Master of Community and Regional Planning (UO)
• Dual  Master’s  Degree  in  Urban  and  Regional  Planning  and  Civil  and  Envi-
ronmental Engineering (PSU)
• Ph.D. in Urban Studies (PSU)

(PSU)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

109

• Ph.D. in Civil and Environmental Engineering (PSU and OSU)
• Graduate Certificate in Transportation (PSU)

Graduate  degree  programs  offer  students  the  opportunity  to  specialize  and  take
a  more  diverse  set  of  courses,  as  well  as  the  opportunity  to  pursue  individual  re-
search.  Therefore,  graduate  students  in  these  programs  who  specialize  in  transpor-
tation  are  exposed  to  the  issues  of  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability  in  several
courses. Students are very interested in these topics so it is possible that more spe-
cific course offerings will be developed in the near future. In addition to faculty and
accreditation bodies, transportation industry and agency representatives and profes-
sional organizations should be involved in developing enhanced curricula in the area
of energy efficiency and sustainability. International experience in developing these
types of curricula should also be included.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey

Tech Transfer
Q1. In the end, implementation of new technologies will require local developers and
planning  boards  to  accept  and  cooperate  in  their  use.  Do  local  decision-makers
have  access  to  comprehensive  and  comprehensible  data  on  potential  new  tech-
nologies?  Are  pilot  projects  enough  to  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  wide
variety of weather and built environments?

A1. While  much  of  the  technological  focus  has  been  on  State-operated  freeways
(where  most  of  the  vehicle  miles  of  travel  occur),  it  is  true  that  ultimately  regional
and  local  agencies  will  be  responsible  for  implementing  new  technologies  that  sup-
port the operation of transit systems, and. arterial and local roadways. Fortunately
these  agencies  can  take  some  lessons  from  the  implementations  on  State-operated
facilities,  but  there  are  many  new  and  complicated  issues  that  arise  at  the  local
level.  First,  local  agencies  have  limited  staff,  particularly  with  expertise  in  new
technologies, which requires a more broad educational and experiential background
than past more traditional applications. Local agencies also have limited budgets for
training  and  education  for  their  staff,  and  very  often  have  restrictions  on  out-of-
state travel that prevent staff from attending regional or national conferences, work-
shops or other training opportunities where they can learn about potential new tech-
nologies.

In the Portland metropolitan region in Oregon, there is a regional advisory group
called  the  TransPort  ITS  Advisory  Committee  that  has  been  meeting  monthly  on  a
voluntary  basis  since  1994.  Made  up  of  staff  from  city,  county,  regional,  State,  and
federal transportation agencies, as well as private sector and university representa-
tives, this group has been a critical resource for sharing information and leveraging
funding for collaborative technology implementations. A group such as this could be
expanded to include more local agencies outside of the metro area and could become
a key source of comprehensive and comprehensible information about technology de-
ployment.  State  and  local  chapters  of  professional  organizations  such  as  ITE  and
ITS America also play important roles in this regard. Technology transfer programs
implemented  by  State  departments  of  transportation  and  university  transportation
centers also meet critical needs in transferring and translating information for local
agency  staff.  In  some  cases,  specific  programs  are  aimed  at  training  local  elected
and appointed officials (such as planning commissioners). In Oregon, the local chap-
ter  of  the  American  Planning  Association  sponsors  highly  accessible  and  successful
training presentations for city planning commissioners. Programs like this could be
replicated and expanded through distance learning techniques. There are a lot of ex-
isting resources available from federal and State agencies and universities, but local
officials  may  simply  not  know  how  to  access  them.  In  an  age  of  ‘‘information  over-
load’’ there are challenges in providing information in easily digestible formats.

Visible,  highly  documented  and  evaluated  pilot  projects  that  demonstrate  tech-
nology  applications  are  an  effective  step  toward  determining  whether  the  applica-
tion is appropriate across diverse weather and built environments. But one pilot im-
plementation  can  never  satisfy  the  wide  diversity  of  environments  and  situations
that characterize the U.S. transportation system. Looking across the spectrum from
rural to urban, and from mountainous areas to coastal area, there is no one solution
for  all  problems.  But  this  diversity  should  not  prevent  us  from  implementing  pilot
projects as appropriate in order to test and demonstrate potential solutions to trans-
portation  problems.  Often  lessons  learned  can  be  transferred  from  (for  example)  an
urban  application  to  one  in  a  rural  area,  with  the  understanding  that  the  existing
infrastructure  for  power  supplies  and  communications  will  be  very  different  from

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

110

one locale to another. This is why it is necessary for research and technology trans-
fer to be conducted in both rural and urban areas, with appreciation for the similar-
ities and differences between the two types of location.

Workforce Training
Q2. The U.S. DOT estimates that there are 349 thousand people employed in bridge,
street,  and  highway  construction.  What  impacts  do  the  research  activities  dis-
cussed at the hearing have on these workers? Will implementation of sustainable
transportation technologies require wide-scale training and education? If so, who
is responsible for providing this training?

A2. For  research  to  be  truly  successful,  ultimately  it  must  be  implemented  on  the
ground.  The  responsibility  for  this  implementation  lies  with  the  many  transpor-
tation professionals employed in construction and maintenance. The implementation
of  some  sustainable  transportation  technologies  will  involve  construction  and  main-
tenance  techniques  and  practices  that  are  substantially  similar  to  the  more  tradi-
tional  types  of  transportation  projects.  In  these  instances,  ongoing  training  should
continue to be provided by transportation agency, industry and professional organi-
zations,  along  with  educational  institutions  at  various  levels.  There  will  be  situa-
tions where sustainable transportation technologies that result in life cycle cost and
energy savings will require new construction and maintenance techniques. It should
also  be  noted  that  new  financing  mechanisms  such  as  public  private  partnerships
that  involve  more  focus  on  construction  quality  assurance  may  also  require  new
training  and  education.  In  these  cases,  training  should  continue  to  be  provided  by
the  agencies,  industry  and  professional  organizations,  with  educational  institutions
as  key  partners.  Training  and  education  offerings  can  be  coordinated  both  within
states and across State boundaries. A set of shared calendars for training opportuni-
ties  should  be  developed  along  with  a  central  clearinghouse  for  collecting  and  orga-
nizing training needs. Breaking down barriers and erasing concerns about ‘‘turf’ will
help making these opportunities available to all who need them.

At a broader level, if agencies implement a strong culture of continuous improve-
ment,  they  will  need  to  encourage  and  foster  an  environment  that  appreciates  and
rewards  an  appreciation  for  ongoing  education  and  training  at  the  individual  em-
ployee  level.  This  kind  of  culture  can  inspire  employees  to  better  themselves  and
their team by seeking more training and education. Rewards in terms of promotions,
salary  step  increases,  and  other  incentives  that  are  tied  to  educational  accomplish-
ments should be considered and implemented.

Coordination
Q3. How  can  RITA  and  the  other  agencies  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  in-
crease  the  coordination  within  the  research  community  and  awareness  of  re-
search results in the broader community?

A3. Within the traditional transportation disciplines, there are several existing sys-
tems  that  help  coordinate  ongoing  research  and  allow  for  efficient  dissemination  of
research results. For example the TRB RiP database is a good example of a system
that  allows  researchers  to  conduct  queries  about  ongoing  projects.  Of  course,  any
database is only as good as the data that are entered—so there is a risk that some
projects  are  not  entered  in  a  timely  fashion,  are  not  updated  or  are  not  entered  at
all. The committee structure of TRB allows researchers in a particular narrow area
to be aware of ongoing research and results that are relevant to that particular sub-
discipline  since  researchers  usually  want  and  need  to  present  and  publish  their
work.  USDOT  agency  personnel  typically  participate  in  TRB  committees  and  their
meetings and activities. Further, TRB committees also often develop research prob-
lem  statements  that  are  later  submitted  through  the  AASHTO  research  selection
process for NCHRP projects. The TRIS database is an excellent resource for learning
about  completed,  published  research  results,  and  this  includes  research  conducted
by  State  departments  of  transportation,  university  transportation  centers  and  all
federally  sponsored  research.  Moving  toward  adding  full  text  documents  (e.g.,  PDF
format) for all TRIS entries would help make research results more transparent and
available. Many TRIS entries include links to full text documents but some only pro-
vide abstracts. There may not be funding available for this but it should be consid-
ered in the future, under the auspices of the National Transportation Library.

Now that transportation research is being conducted by increasingly diverse, mul-
tidisciplinary  researchers,  there  is  a  risk  that  dissemination  of  results  may  occur
through  other  channels  not  monitored  by  traditional  transportation  researchers.
There has been an example in the physics community where valuable contributions

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

111

have  been  made  to  the  transportation  field  but  published  in  the  physics  journals
which traditional transportation researchers may not be aware of.

RITA  and  other  USDOT  agencies  are  already  working  toward  coordinating  re-
search  activities  and  promoting  awareness  of  research  results  within  the  context  of
their relatively limited resources. RITA requires the UTCs to aim toward solving na-
tional-level  research  priorities  by  partnering  with  USDOT  agencies.  Further  efforts
toward  developing  a  concrete,  ‘‘official’’  means  of  collaboration  between  UTCs  and
federal  agencies  would  help  improve  this  coordination  and  would  leverage  research
funding toward improved products.

Question submitted by Representative Adrian Smith
Q1. When  using  recycled  materials  in  road  pavement,  how  much  does  this  change

the cost of construction?

A1. There  are  cases  when  considering  life  cycle  costs  that  the  inclusion  of  recycled
materials  in  road  pavement  can  reduce  the  cost  of  construction.  In  other  cases,  the
construction cost may increase slightly but would provide other benefits in terms of
user costs (noise, ride quality, safety) or reduced maintenance costs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

112

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Gerald  F.  Voigt,  P.E.,  President  and  CEO,  American  Concrete  Pave-

ment Association

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. You discussed in your testimony the four voluntary environmental goals adopted
by member companies, which include implementing an auditable and verifiable
environmental  management  system.  Can  you  provide  more  details  on  this  envi-
ronmental  management  system?  What  are  the  impediments  to  implementation?
In  addition  to  environmental  protection,  are  there  other  benefits  or  detriments
to companies that implement these systems?

A1. It  is  important  to  note  that  the  cement  industry  began  to  address  climate
change in the mid-1990s—one of the first industries to do so. Today, the cement in-
dustry  accounts  for  less  than  1.5  percent  of  U.S.  CO2 emissions,  well  below  other
sources  such  as  electric  generation  plants  (33  percent)  and  transportation  (27  per-
cent). The voluntary reduction targets for key environmental performance measures
are  a  part  of  the  progress  that  has  been  made,  which  will  continue  into  the  future.
ACPA  member  companies,  which  also  comprise  the  members  of  the  Portland  Ce-
ment  Association  (PCA)  represent  over  98  percent  of  the  cement  clinker  production
in the U.S., which means that the voluntary action is truly an industry-wide initia-
tive.

In  the  1990’s,  the  cement  industry  joined  the  USEPA  Climate-WISE  program.
This  voluntary  program  assisted  companies  in  improving  energy  efficiency  and  re-
ducing CO2 emissions. As part of this program, an MS-Excel spreadsheet was devel-
oped  for  the  calculation  of  CO2 cement  plant  emissions.  This  effort  was  used  to  de-
velop an international emission calculation spreadsheet. U.S. cement manufacturing
companies are using this international consensus-developed spreadsheet to calculate
current and past CO2 emissions.

The  environmental  management  system  is  a  benchmarking  process  that  U.S.  ce-
ment  manufacturers  are  performing  to  track  their  progress.  By  2020,  the  industry
aims  to  reduce  CO2 emissions  by  10  percent  below  1990  baseline  levels.  To  achieve
this goal, the cement industry has adopted the following strategies:

1. Improve  the  energy  efficiency  by  upgrading  plants  with  state-of-the-art

equipment.

2. Improve  product  formulation  to  reduce  energy  of  production  and  minimize

the use of natural resources.

3. Conduct research and develop new applications for cement and concrete that

improve energy efficiency and durability.

The  industry  fully  recognizes  and  discloses  that  emission  of  CO2 is  a  part  of  the
cement manufacturing process, regardless of what energy source is used for produc-
tion. The chemical reaction that converts limestone and other raw material ingredi-
ents to cement clinker—calcination—releases CO2. However, it is also our industry’s
view  that  these  emissions  are  outweighed  dramatically  by  the  energy-savings  and
sustainability benefits derived from concrete compared to alternative building prod-
ucts,  such  as  asphalt  for  pavements.  To  understand  this  point,  it  is  important  to
recognize  that  cement  represents  only  a  small  fraction  of  the  volume  of  concrete—
roughly about eight percent of the volume of a typical concrete paving mixture.

The  challenges  we  see  with  implementing  the  strategies  noted  above  include  the
communication of these relationships, the cost for new or upgraded equipment, and
the  impact  of  global  competition.  While  the  U.S.  cement  industry  is  working  to  re-
duce CO2 emissions, other countries’ cement industries do not have the same dedica-
tion  to  environmental  stewardship.  In  recent  years,  up  to  20  percent  of  the  cement
sold  in  the  U.S.  has  come  from  imported  sources,  including  China,  India  and  other
areas  with  less  manufacturing  controls  than  are  standard  in  the  U.S.  today.  It  will
be  difficult  for  the  U.S.  cement  industry  to  compete  under  a  system  where  there  is
no balance on the emphasis of environmental stewardship in manufacturing.

Despite these challenges, the environmental management system will continue to
benefit  the  industry  with  a  consistent  tracking  process  and  a  means  to  more  effec-
tively measure and communicate its goals.
Q2. How  do  you  measure  the  impact  of  light-colored  pavement  on  urban  heat  is-
lands?  Does  light-colored  pavement  have  any  negative  impacts  or  associated
problems? Can recycled materials such as fly ash be incorporated into light-col-
ored pavements?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

113

A2. The  temperature  of  any  pavement  surface  depends  upon  the  reflectance  and
emittance of the surface, as well as the amount of solar radiation. The standard test
used  to  measure  the  reflectance  of  a  surface  is  American  Society  for  Testing  and
Materials  (ASTM)  C1549,  Standard  Test  Method  for  Determining  Solar  Reflectance
(ALBEDO)  Near  Ambient  Temperature  Using  a  Portable  Solar  Reflectometer.  The
test  measures  ‘‘ALBEDO,’’  the  ratio  of  reflected  solar  radiation  to  the  total  amount
that falls on that surface, known as incident solar radiation. ALBEDO values range
from 0, for perfect absorbers, to 1, for perfect reflectors; most ALBEDO readings are
expressed as a percentage.

The values for typical paving surfaces1 are as follows:

• Concrete  pavements  produced  with  white  cement  have  ALBEDO  readings  in
the range of 0.70–0.80 when new, and 0.40–0.60 after significant use and ac-
cumulation of dirt, grime, etc.
• Concrete  pavements  produced  with  ordinary  gray  cement  have  ALBEDO
readings  in  the  range  of  0.35–0.40  when  new,  and  0.20  to  0.30  after  signifi-
cant use and accumulation of dirt, grime, etc.
• Asphalt  pavement  has  a  typical  ALBEDO  range  of  0.05–0.10  when  new,  and
0.10–0.15 after oxidation, significant use and accumulation of dirt, grime, etc.,
aged.

Lighter  surfaces  reflect  more  energy  and  do  not  contribute  as  much  heat  to  the
ambient  conditions,  as  do  darker,  more  energy-absorbent  surfaces.  To  measure  the
impact of this additional heat requires calculation of the electric costs to cool urban
buildings  based  on  differing  ambient  temperature  regimes,  as  well  the  cor-
responding  reduction  of  pollution  and  other  effects  of  decreasing  the  necessary  en-
ergy  production.  Lawrence  Berkeley  Laboratory2,3 studies  provide  this  type  of  indi-
cation,  estimating  that  $5  billion  per  year  can  saved  be  through  reduced  cooling
costs. We are also aware that Arizona State University’s Center for National Center
of  Excellence  on  SMART  Innovations  for  Urban  Climate  and  Energy  is  working  to
refine these relationships.

There  are  no  known  negative  impacts  or  associated  problems  with  the  light-col-
ored  pavement  surfaces.  In  addition  to  reducing  the  impact  of  urban  heat  islands,
they  also  improve  on-road  visibility  from  both  vehicle  headlights  and  street  lights,
resulting in enhanced vehicle and pedestrian safety.

Recycled materials, such as fly ash (from coal combustion) and slag cement (a by-
product of the manufacture of iron) are easily incorporated into concrete paving mix-
tures. Fly ash, although typically somewhat darker than ordinary gray cement, does
to  our  knowledge  not  lower  ALBEDO  appreciably.  This  may  be  related  to  the  fact
that  fly  ash  is  typically  incorporated  into  concrete  pavements  in  percentages  (by
weight  of  cementitious  materials)  less  than  20  percent.  However,  slag  cement,  also
routinely used where locally available, sometimes in percentages as high as 50 per-
cent  (by  weight  of  cementitious  material),  generally  elevates  concrete’s  ALBEDO.
Concrete containing slag may yield ALBEDO readings in the ranges similar to those
made from white cements.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey

Tech Transfer
Q1. In the end, implementation of new technologies will require local developers and
planning  boards  to  accept  and  cooperate  in  their  use.  Do  local  decision-makers
have  access  to  comprehensive  and  comprehensible  data  on  potential  new  tech-
nologies?  Are  pilot  projects  enough  to  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  wide
variety of weather and built environments?

A1. Generally speaking, local decision-makers do have access to comprehensive and
comprehensible  data  to  evaluate  and  implement  new  technologies,  although  there
are  considerable  challenges  in  educating  and  transferring  technology  to  a  con-

1 Adapted  from:  Levinson,  R.  and  H.  Akbari.  2001.  ‘‘Effects  of  Composition  and  Exposure  on
the  Solar  Reflectance  of  Portland  Cement  Concrete,’’  Lawrence  Berkeley  National  Laboratory
Report LBNL–48334, Berkeley, CA.

2 Akbari,  H.  ‘‘Energy  Savings  Potentials  and  Air  Quality  Benefits  of  Urban  Heat  Island  Miti-
gation,’’  First  International  Conference  on  Passive  and  Low  Energy  Cooling  for  the  Built  Envi-
ronment, Athens, Greece, May 17–25, 2005.

3 Pomerantz,  M.,  B.  Pon,  H.  Akbari,  and  S.-C.  Chang.  2002.  ‘‘The  Effect  of  Pavements’  Tem-
peratures on Air Temperatures in Large Cities,’’ Lawrence Berkeley National Laboratory Report
LBNL–43442, Berkeley, CA.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

114

stantly-changing workforce. Attrition in the public sector, along with limited funding
for  training,  as  well  as  state-imposed  restrictions  on  travel  for  training,  makes  this
even more challenging.

Access  is  only  one  variable  in  the  equation,  however.  To  truly  adapt  energy  con-
servation  and  sustainability  practices  throughout  the  transportation-construction
community, the culture of considering ‘‘lowest first cost’’—a culture that remains in
many State Departments of Transportation (DOTs)—must change to impact the use
of  innovative  and  current  materials  that  are  more  sustainable.  Traditionally,  State
DOTs have considered the construction and maintenance/preservation of a roadway
as  two  separate  operations,  with  separate  funding  levels  assigned  to  each.  Sound
public  policy  should  ensure  public  monies  are  being  invested  with  the  optimum  re-
turn on the investment through all phases of the pavement life cycle.

Furthermore, when evaluating return on investment, true first costs and life cycle
costs  should  be  evaluated  for  highways,  as  well  as  other  facilities  in  our  nation’s
surface  transportation  infrastructure  overall.  These  evaluations  should  be  made  on
actual  performance  data  and  using  true  costs  to  the  agency,  including  all  factors
such as material price escalators.

Pilot projects are not enough to demonstrate the effectiveness of new technologies,
particularly noting climatic differences, as well as other regional variables, whether
man-made or naturally occurring. However, in road-building, one of the largest hur-
dles  is  getting  previously  unspecified  technology  to  be  used  on  a  project,  and  pilot
projects are extremely beneficial to overcome these hurdles. Never-the-less, it is our
considered opinion that the requisite approaches to the ‘‘tech transfer’’ challenge in-
clude several concerted efforts, including:

• Applied research to evaluate and validate new technologies;
• Pilot programs for proving the new technologies;
• An adequately-funded clearinghouse for research findings that is specific and
germane  to  the  transportation-construction  community.  This  clearinghouse
should  include  research  findings  from  various  stakeholders  and  should  be
available to persons in the public sector, private sector, and academia.
• A  formal,  technology  transfer  and  implementation  program,  specifically  cen-
tered on training public- and private-sector stakeholders in best practices as-
sociated  with  energy  conservation  (and  within  it,  fossil  fuel  reduction)  and
sustainable  highway  construction.  We  feel  this  program  should  be  executed
equally  by  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  and  co-equally  by  the  con-
crete  and  asphalt  pavement  industries  for  purposes  of  educating  State  agen-
cies  and  the  private  sector.  Industry  should  have  the  responsibility  for  pro-
viding training to contractors and others in the private sector, as well as aca-
demia.

Workforce Training
Q2. The  U.S.  DOT  estimates  there  are  349  thousand  people  employed  in  bridge,
street,  and  highway  construction.  What  impacts  do  the  research  activities  dis-
cussed at the hearing have on these workers? Will implementation of sustainable
transportation technologies require wide-scale training and education? If so who
is responsible for providing this training?

A2. The  research  and  development  activities  discussed  at  the  hearings  will  have  a
material  impact  on  workers,  but  only  if  there  is  adequate  training,  positive  incen-
tives  and  a  framework  that  guides  State  and  federal  agencies  to  embrace  both
emerging and existing technologies associated with energy conservation and sustain-
ability.

We  look  forward  to  the  continued  support  of  Congress  on  pavement  research  and
development in future transportation funding bills, and we thank you for supporting
these  provisions  in  past  bills.  We  also  recommend  that  a  significant  focus  of  future
efforts be placed on technology implementation. It is our observation that implemen-
tation  has  been  overlooked  in  the  spectrum  of  research  and  development.  It  has
been  said  by  those  in  the  public  and  private  sector  alike,  that  it  takes  as  many  as
10  to  15  years  to  see  new  technology  implemented  into  wide-spread  practice  across
the 50 states. This record must be improved and this can only be achieved by train-
ing those who have to work with the technology in the field.

We  believe  the  responsibility  of  training  should  be  shared,  because  of  both  the
scale  and  scope  of  the  training  required.  In  our  view,  the  responsibility  of  training
private  sector  workers  should  rest  primarily  with  the  industry  associations  and
other  organizations  like  ACPA,  with  support  provided  from  the  Federal  Highway
Administration and Federal Aviation Administration.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

115

The  agencies  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  should  shoulder  the  load
for  training  workers  of  the  State  departments  of  transportation  with  support  from
industry.  A  significant  challenge  now  exists  with  the  education  of  State  workers.
Most states prohibit their employees from traveling across State lines for education
and  training.  This  burdens  the  process  of  training  (and  ultimately  the  speed  of  im-
plementing  new  technology)  as  it  limits  the  sharing  of  experiences  and  slows  the
process  within  available  resources.  These  barriers  must  be  addressed  so  that  the
education and training can be made more efficient and effective.

Coordination
Q3. How  can  RITA  and  the  other  agencies  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  in-
crease  the  coordination  within  the  research  community  and  awareness  of  re-
search results in the broader community?

A3. RITA  and  other  agencies  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  can
increase the coordination within the research community and awareness of research
results  in  the  broader  transportation-construction  community  by  working  more
closely with local and State agencies and the industry to educate, inform, and other-
wise  support  efforts  to  implement  energy  conservation  and  sustainability  practices.
Pooling  research  funds  is  an  excellent  mechanism  to  leverage  resources  and  ef-
forts, as well as involve more people through the process and bridge the gap for im-
plementation.  When  we  learn  and  put  technology  to  use  together,  it  simply  works
better and faster.

RITA  and  other  agencies  of  the  U.S.  DOT  also  can  have  a  positive  and  profound
effect  by  changing  the  culture  and  reducing  our  nation’s  dependency  on  fossil  fuels
through a balance of policies, training, and outreach to all stakeholders in the trans-
portation-construction community.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

116

ANSWERS TO POST-HEARING QUESTIONS

Responses  by  Christopher  M.  Poe,  P.E.,  Assistant  Agency  Director;  Senior  Research
Engineer, Research and Implementation Division–Dallas, Houston, Texas Trans-
portation Institute, Texas A&M University System

Questions submitted by Chairman David Wu
Q1. You discuss special asphalt mixtures called porous friction courses (PFC) in your
testimony, noting that this material contributes to energy efficiency and sustain-
ability by filtering runoff and extending the lifetime of the pavement? How much
fuel does it take to lay a lane-mile of PFC compared to conventional paving ma-
terials? What are the impediments to deployment of PFC?

A1. Rainwater travels along the surface of most pavements until it reaches the edge
of the pavement where it drains into ditches or storm water utility systems. Porous
friction  courses  (PFC)  are  different  in  that  they  are  about  a  two  inch  thick  asphalt
surface with a very high air void content that allows the water to quickly penetrate
into the surface. The storm water then travels within that surface layer to the edge
of the pavement. This increases safety by helping to reduce the risk of hydroplaning
and  wet  skidding  and  also  decreases  splash  and  spray  from  vehicle  tires.  Because
this  type  of  surface  also  acts  as  a  filter,  the  quality  of  the  storm  water  runoff  can
be improved since many of the suspended solids and pollutants will be trapped with-
in  the  asphalt  layer.  And  because  of  the  high  air  void  content  within  the  surface,
there is a significant reduction in traffic noise which is the primary reason for their
increasing use in Europe.

There  is  no  documented  fuel  savings  associated  with  porous  friction  courses  and
there  is  no  extended  pavement  life.  Their  primary  reason  for  use  is  for  improved
wet weather safety and the noise reduction benefits. Impediments to the use of PFC
include the following:

• The  potential  life  of  PFCs  is  unknown  but  indications  are  that  their  life  is
shorter  than  conventional  paving  mixes  (mainly  because  of  the  effects  of
water  in  the  layer  which  can  have  a  negative  effect  on  pavement  perform-
ance).

• It  is  unknown  how  long  PFCs  can  remain  ‘‘functional.’’  In  other  words,  how
long will these mixtures maintain their drainability and noise reduction bene-
fits before they become clogged with dirt and particulate matter?

• PFC paving mixtures are more expensive than conventional mixes. At a time
when  highway  construction  and  maintenance  budgets  are  stretched,  it  may
be difficult for engineers to justify using a paving surface like PFC when long-
term performance and functionality is unknown.

Questions submitted by Representative Phil Gingrey

Tech Transfer
Q1. In the end, implementation of new technologies will require local developers and
planning  boards  to  accept  and  cooperate  in  their  use.  Do  local  decision-makers
have  access  to  comprehensive  and  comprehensible  data  on  potential  new  tech-
nologies?  Are  pilot  projects  enough  to  demonstrate  effectiveness  across  the  wide
variety of weather and built environments?

A1. Pilot projects that include a formal technology transfer component are effective
at  disseminating  information.  In  addition,  published  material,  webinars,  con-
ferences,  and  training  session  are  all  complimentary  to  the  technology  transfer  ef-
forts. In addition to demonstration of technology effectiveness, local decision-makers
and  transportation  professionals  need  life  cycle  costs  of  new  technologies.  To  make
sound  transportation  decisions,  the  ongoing  maintenance  costs,  replacement  costs,
and time to replacement are all needed to adopt and implement technologies.

Workforce Training
Q2. The U.S. DOT estimates that there are 349 thousand people employed in bridge,
street,  and  highway  construction.  What  impacts  do  the  research  activities  dis-
cussed at the hearing have on these workers? Will implementation of sustainable
transportation technologies require wide-scale training and education? If so, who
is responsible for providing this training?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

117

A2. We  believe  wide-scale  training  and  education  will  be  necessary  to  mainstream
new  technologies  and  research  results.  As  with  much  of  the  training  of  new  trans-
portation ideas and technologies, training will come from a variety of sources includ-
ing the Federal Government (often geared towards State DOTs and MPOs), the pri-
vate  sector,  and  academia.  What  is  often  overlooked  is  the  time  and  resources  re-
quired  to  develop  good  quality  training.  Pilot  tests  and  research  do  not  inherently
result in the production of training materials. Resources must be dedicated to turn-
ing the results from research and pilot programs into training. There is capacity to
deliver  the  training  through  public,  private,  and  academic  instructors;  however,  re-
sources are needed to develop the content for the training materials.

Coordination
Q3. How  can  RITA  and  the  other  agencies  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  in-
crease  the  coordination  within  the  research  community  and  awareness  of  re-
search results in the broader community?

A3. The  coordination  issue  is  one  of  the  concerns  that  led  to  the  creation  of  RITA.
RITA is intended to have purview over the various multi-modal research committees
and councils of USDOT, and is taking a leadership role in determining research pri-
ority  needs  within  the  department.  To  this  end,  the  Communities  of  Interest  were
developed,  identifying  several  research  areas  and  putting  together  groups  of  modal
agencies,  research  centers  and  other  research  entities  with  interest  in  each  area.
The  idea  is  to  facilitate  communication  within  these  groups,  get  the  researchers
talking  to  each  other,  and  stimulate  new  ideas  as  well  as  avoid  duplication.  They
also  take  this  information  back  to  their  customers/partners,  which  helps  the  trans-
portation  community  to  understand  who  is  doing  what,  and  why  they  are  doing  it.
SAFETEA–LU  states  that  ‘‘The  Secretary  shall  coordinate  the  research,  edu-
cation,  and  technology  transfer  activities  that  grant  recipients  carry  out  under  this
section,  disseminate  the  results  of  the  research,  and  establish  and  operate  a  clear-
inghouse  to  disseminate  the  results  of  the  research.’’  [Section  5402  (k)  (1)  Program
Coordination]  To  address  this  legislative  mandate,  RITA  requires  UTCs  to  submit
all  research  to  the  Research  in  Progress  (RiP)  database  and  to  TRIS.  This  makes
ongoing and completed research available to anyone searching the web for informa-
tion on a particular transportation topic and is thought to be one of the most effec-
tive ways that research coordination and dissemination occurs.

In  recent  years,  a  partnership  has  been  created  between  RITA  and  the  Council
of University Transportation Centers (CUTC), and all UTCs are strongly encouraged
to  join.  CUTC  provides  center  development  activities  as  a  part  of  its  annual  meet-
ing,  and  provides  a  venue  for  UTCs  and  other  transportation  centers  to  meet  on  a
regular basis. Because CUTC has an annual newsletter and sponsors a high-profile
event at TRB, RITA’s involvement increases awareness of its research activities.

In  recent  years,  federal  funding  to  sport  TRB  has  been  reduced.  This  along  with
the fiscal constraints on public agencies to send scientists, engineers, and transpor-
tation  professionals  to  the  premier  annual  meeting  to  disseminate  research  results
has hindered further coordination. Funding for TRB and support to public agencies
is needed to continue this coordination, technology transfer, and education.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix 2:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(119)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

120

STATEMENT OF THE ARIZONA DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION

Introduction

In  the  world  of  transportation,  research  and  technology  are  vital  to  providing
safer,  more  efficient,  cleaner  and  less  costly  facilities.  The  challenges  that  the  Na-
tion faces now and in the future—congestion, safety, rising fuel costs, energy supply,
economic demands, environmental impacts, climate change, and growth will require
that  we  all  look  to  new  technologies  and  innovations  to  expand  the  capacity  of  our
infrastructure,  grow  the  economy  and  at  the  same  time  reduce  our  impact  on  the
environment.

Arizona  in  particular  has  seen  incredible  population  growth  as  one  of  the  fastest
growing  states  in  the  Nation.  In  the  face  of  this  growth,  it  is  clear  that  the  chal-
lenges  presented  will  require  innovation  based  on  research.  The  demand  on  today’s
overburdened  transportation  facilities  means  that  transportation  professionals  will
be challenged to sustain the Nation’s mobility. Responding to challenges in an inno-
vative way has always been one of the things that Americans do best.

The  future  presents  both  challenges  and  opportunities.  Rapidly  advancing  tech-
nology will be an essential part of the solution to new problems. Applying this tech-
nology  through  research  will  create  new  opportunities  for  improved  transportation
systems.

Current Research

ADOT’s  research  program  encompasses  a  broad  spectrum  of  topics  relative  to
transportation  systems.  The  research  is  focused  on  advancing  technology,  solving
problems and pursuing practices that will save lives and money. The primary driver
in this program is the Federal Highway Administration (FHWA) State Planning and
Research (SPR) funding. Other important program elements include information de-
rived  from  the  Transportation  Research  Board,  FHWA  research  programs,  and  na-
tional cooperative transportation research programs, such as the National Transpor-
tation  Cooperative  Research  Program  (NCHRP)  and  the  Transit  Cooperative  Re-
search  Program  (TCRP).  Under  the  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and
Transportation  Officials  (AASHTO),  ADOT  participates  in  the  Standing  Committee
on Research (SCOR) and the Research Advisory Committee (RAC).

ADOT’s  Arizona  Transportation  Research  Center  (ATRC)  directs  the  ADOT  re-
search  program.  Under  the  research  program  ADOT  conducts  transportation  re-
search  on  materials,  construction  activities,  structures,  maintenance,  traffic,  intel-
ligent  transportation  systems,  safety,  environmental  topics,  planning,  administra-
tion,  and  computer  systems.  ATRC  publishes  reports  on  completed  research  and
maintains a library of transportation resources.

The  following  are  examples  of  innovative  research  and  technology  applications
that  ADOT  is  using  for  materials  and  products,  intelligent  transportation  systems
and computerized information systems:

Materials and Products

– The ATRC coordinates ADOT’s product evaluation program as part of the re-
search  program.  The  ATRC  Product  Resource  Investment  Deployment  and
Evaluation  (PRIDE)  program  was  established  to  provide  a  framework  for  in-
troducing  new  products.  The  PRIDE  program  provides  a  centralized  system
for  evaluating  a  wide  range  of  products  used  by  ADOT.  Through  the  PRIDE
program  ADOT  increases  its  ability  to  select  cost-effective,  safe  products  for
use  on  the  State  highway  system  and  roll  them  out  throughout  the  agency.
– Arizona  was  the  first  state  to  implement  a  pilot  in  partnership  with  FHWA
to  test  the  noise  reduction  capabilities  of  rubberized  asphalt  on  115  miles  of
selected freeways in the Phoenix area. We have used rubberized asphalt since
1988 to resurface roads across the state, at various elevations and in different
climates and found that it reduced traffic noise.
Data collected for the pilot has shown an average noise reduction of five deci-
bels  in  residential  neighborhoods.  By  participating  in  the  pilot  ADOT  aims
to confirm that the noise reduction is sustainable over the average 10–12 year
life  of  a  pavement  overlay.  Now  Illinois  is  piloting  the  use  of  rubberized  as-
phalt as well.
Rubberized asphalt consists of a mixture of aggregate combined with asphalt
cement  and  crumb  rubber  from  discarded  tires.  As  a  result  of  utilizing  this
resurfacing application, more than 15 million tires have been recycled in Ari-
zona since 1988.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

121

– ADOT has converted most of our traffic and pedestrian signals from incandes-
cent  light  bulbs  to  LED  (light-emitting  diode)  signals  which  are  environ-
mentally  friendly,  reduce  energy  costs  significantly  and  provide  cost  savings
to  taxpayers.  This  has  allowed  us  to  convert  the  cabinets  to  include
uninterruptible power supply and has reduced energy consumption for traffic
signals by 80 percent. We also use LED lighting on most of our heavy trucks
and on vehicles with emergency lights.

Information Technology Systems

– In  March  2002,  Arizona  launched  its  statewide  511  System  through  ADOT’s
Traffic  Operation  Center.  The  511  system  provides  information  both  on-line
and  through  the  phone  system  to  motorists  about  road  closures,  restrictions,
construction  locations,  traffic-related  maintenance  activities,  weather-related
road  closures,  and  traffic  incidents.  Last  year,  ADOT  implemented  the  So-
nora/5–1–1  system  which  is  the  first  to  reach  beyond  U.S.  borders  to  allow
motorist to access information on traffic issues in Arizona’s neighboring State
of Sonora Mexico.

– An  important  technology  that  ADOT  uses  to  inform  and  ensure  the  safety  of
motorist  is  the  Variable-Message  Sign.  The  signs  are  capable  of  quickly
changing messages remotely making it a simple and quick way to inform mo-
torists  of  accidents,  closures,  detours  or  most  recently  drive  times  in  Metro-
politan  Phoenix.  Our  Variable-Message  Signs,  directional  arrow  signs,  and
weather stations all use solar power.

– ADOT  uses  driving  simulators  to  train  and  refine  operating  skills  on  equip-
ment such as snow plow trucks. The equipment is mobile so it may be moved
from  site  to  site.  Use  of  the  simulators  saves  fuel,  reduces  equipment  wear
and  tear  and  helps  to  reduce  accidents  by  providing  training  in  a  variety  of
simulated  weather  and  traffic  conditions.  Some  ADOT  on-road  heavy  equip-
ment  is  equipped  with  on-board  crash  avoidance  sensors  which  detect  front,
rear and side obstacles.

– Global Positioning Systems (GPS) and Automated Vehicle Locator (AVL) Sys-
tems  are  now  being  used  to  track  snow  plows  and  paint  striper  trucks  to
identify equipment location, speed and productivity.

– Geographic  Information  Systems  (GIS)  are  also  being  used  to  track  snow
plows and striper plows to identify depth and type of material used, allowing
for  better  analysis  of  productivity.  GIS  also  monitors  ambient  air  tempera-
tures allowing the operator to better determine the amount of material need-
ed  based  on  air  temperature.  GIS  also  displays  information  on  traffic  inci-
dents  so  it  can  be  seen  on-line  and  facilitate  detours  and  information  to  mo-
torist.

Computerized Information Systems

– ADOT is among a very few State DOTs actively developing a Feature Inven-
tory  System  (FISDC).  This  system  incorporates  Global  Positioning  System
(GPS) data collection with the power of Geographic Information System (GIS)
for  inventory  purposes  and  easy  access  and  presentation  of  geographic  and
manmade  features  that  exist  within  ADOT’s  right-of-way.  The  system  will
provide  an  accurate  inventory  for  the  existing  features  as  maintained  by  the
individual districts. After the completion of the system, the inventory will be
tied  to  the  State  plane  coordinate  system  and  the  data  can  be  easily
downloaded  and  used  by  planners,  designers,  contractors  and  maintenance
personnel,  giving  districts  a  better  tool  to  manage  their  resources  and  plan
their  maintenance  activities.  We  were  recently  contacted  by  Maryland  DOT
who  is  seeking  information  on  asset  management  systems  and  to  learn  from
the experience gained by ADOT in this field.

– An innovative, state-of-the-art maintenance management system, Pecos IV, is
scheduled for roll-out in March 2009. Our new system will incorporate state-
of-the-art design and programming tools. Innovative features include:

• map-based displays
• improved information retrieval and reporting capabilities
• improved  information  accuracy,  audit  ability,  reconcilability  and  timeli-
• better data entry validation

ness

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

122

allocation, activity, equipment, and labor

• better business processes for purposes such as indirect costs tracking and
• improved trend analysis
• better tracking of contracts utilization and time
• Geo-Coding of work report location

– The  Maintenance  Budgeting  System  (MBS)  provides  ADOT  with  a  state-of-
the  practice,  performance-based  method  for  quantitatively  assessing  the  im-
pact  of  maintenance  activities.  Road  condition  is  related  to  Level-of-Service
(LOS),  providing  a  way  to  link  maintenance  program  budgeting  to  customer
expectations and legislative interest in the maintained road network. Assess-
ments of the existing LOS, and projections of target LOS based on ADOT pri-
orities and desired improvements, provide a way to meet customers’ expecta-
tions while allocating maintenance resources in a cost-effective manner.
This effort involves the definition of customer-oriented levels of service (LOS),
where  LOS  is  defined  in  each  program  category  as  the  percentage  of  main-
tained items that meets minimum criteria. The LOS concept is used to char-
acterize the status of roadway system based upon observed conditions. Future
LOS  values  can  also  be  projected  in  relation  to  planned  budget  levels  to  ex-
press  targets  for  future  maintenance  performance.  This  innovative  approach
enables  ADOT  to  compare  the  actual  level  of  service  achieved  in  the  future
to the target LOS value that has been forecast at the approved budget level,
providing  accountability  for  the  maintenance  expenditures  in  each  program.
– ADOT  is  beginning  to  fully  populate  the  Electronic  Contract  Management
System  (e-CMS)  with  contract  data  during  State  fiscal  year  2009  and  devel-
oping  safeguards  in  the  system  to  promote  data  integrity  and  to  assist  with
timely contract close-outs. These processes will result in helping to reduce the
backlog by over five percent.

– A  Cost-Negotiations  Cross  Functional  Team  has  been  formed  to  develop  an
automated  tool  to  assist  Project  Managers  to  develop  independent  contract
cost  estimates  (hours)  to  compare  with  those  submitted  by  consultants.  A
standardized automated cost proposal template will also be developed and in-
tegrated  into  the  system  to  be  used  by  consultants  to  submit  their  cost  pro-
posals  on-line.  Once  these  tools  have  been  developed  and  Project  Managers
and  consultants  are  trained,  it  is  expected  that  the  time  required  to  analyze
and negotiate agreed upon estimates to do the work can be reduced by about
five percent or seven (7) calendar days. Significant double digit improvements
are expected in FY10 and beyond once the systems have become standard op-
erating procedures.

– Our  Statewide  Project  Management  Office  is  using  various  web  sites  to  host
project  documents,  outline  process  descriptions,  and  maintain  a  people  direc-
tory  for  better  communication,  cross  functional  training,  higher  productivity
and succession planning. This group also uses blog, webinar and instant mes-
sage to enhance our communication in project development. The next genera-
tion  of  project  managers  will  be  able  to  learn  from  project  history  for  future
process innovation. A search engine will be built to link all websites.

– ADOT’s  Right  of  Way  Operations  (ROW)  Section  is  implementing  two  new
databases.  The  first  is  an  accounting  database  to  prepare  and  track  all  non-
EPS  payments  processed  by  the  unit.  This  replaces  an  antiquated  system
that used both paper and computers. The second is a checks database to track
all  payments  received  in  ROW  Operations.  The  new  systems  will  greatly  re-
duce processing time for accounting transactions in Right of Way. Also, as the
new system interfaces with the Department’s accounting system there will be
a drop in the number of errors.

– The Roadway Engineering Group is working to utilize a Portal with electronic
documents  and  files  for  all  studies.  Information  stored  in  the  Portal  is  com-
patible  with  and  can  easily  be  uploaded  into  the  Project  Reference  Manual
once  a  project  moves  to  a  design  phase.  Within  the  coming  months,  all  Pre-
design study documents will be transmitted electronically for reviews.

– The  Roadway  Engineering  Group  is  also  implementing  electronic  signatures
on final study documents. The Drainage Section has efforts underway to scan
all  drainage  reports  so  that  they  will  be  available  to  internal  staff,  consult-
ants and other agencies. This alone will generate a large savings in time and
resources. The Roadway Design Section continues to use electronic plans sub-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

123

mittals and will be further evaluating the practice of supplying electronic de-
sign data to the contractor. The Roadway Engineering Group will also utilize
electronic  submittals  for  project  cost  proposals  and  payments  for  supple-
mental service personnel.

– The Engineering Fields Survey Section will soon utilize a PDA with a terrain
navigator. The test results show that the PDA will save paperwork and facili-
tate survey crews in finding targets in the field.

– A  cross-functional  team  has  recommended  Engineering  Field  Surveys  pilot
several major projects in FY09 to deliver design level engineering surveys be-
fore the design kickoff meetings. This effort is expected to eliminate some du-
plication of survey effort during the design phase of projects.

Research Issues

Technology  demonstration  projects  are  vital  to  ensuring  we  find  better  and  more
efficient ways to meet the growing demand on the transportation infrastructure. Ar-
izona  is  one  of  the  most  requested  states  for  pilots  and  demonstration  because  of
our hot climate and varied terrain. When we participate in pilot or demonstrations,
ADOT typically provides ongoing information on the web such as our rubberized as-
phalt  pilot  at  www.quietroads.com.  We  also  maintain  records  and  reports  that  are
provided on request.

Some of the biggest impediments to the use of new materials and technologies re-
late  to  the  federal  interpretation  for  procurement.  There  is  a  greater  emphasis  on
ensuring competition between vendors than on innovation. Competition is important
but a balanced approach that recognizes and rewards innovation is necessary.

The  transportation  community  would  be  more  effective  at  innovation  if  the  Fed-
eral  Government  would  allow  a  broader  interpretation  of  23  CFR  Ch.  1,  Section
635.411.

Over 15 State transportation departments submitted a Public Interest Finding to
use a specific type of high performing sign sheeting, but were denied by the FHWA.
Because the product is new and innovative the cost of the product is slightly higher
but it also has a higher level of performance. Because of price the product, it is not
currently  allowed  for  use  on  federally  funded  projects.  Again,  balancing  initial  cost
against long-term cost and productivity would open the door for innovation.

In addition, a demonstration or pilot on new techniques or materials does not in-
clude funding if the test does not work leaving the agency to fix or replace the prob-
lem. Failure is an important part of the innovative process and can provide valuable
information. Punishment is the wrong response. In addition, federal web sites need
to keep on-line information on research and pilots up to date.

In  order  for  State  departments  of  transportation  and  local  governments  to  make
use of new technologies and innovations to facilitate improvements to our transpor-
tation  system,  it  is  critical  that  states  are  provided  with  the  flexibility  to  pilot  and
implement new technologies. University research facilities should consult with State
departments  of  transportation  on  direction  and  needs  to  ensure  that  research  sup-
ports what is happening in the field.

Research Needs

As part of our strategic plan ADOT has identified the following as vital to achiev-
ing  our  vision  of  being  ‘‘the  standard  of  excellence  for  transportation  systems  and
services.’’

operations.

strategies to manage congestion.

• Technology—ADOT must maximize the use of technology in all aspects of its
• Congestion  Management—ADOT  must  deploy  the  best  mix  of  multi-modal
• Customer Service—ADOT must maintain a strong customer service focus.
• Highway Safety—ADOT must always strive to make Arizona’s transportation
• Environmental  Stewardship—ADOT  must  deploy  the  best  environmental
management  techniques  into  its  business  practices.  This  also  includes  explo-
ration of a balanced and multi-modal system.
Some of ADOT’s major priorities for research are:

infrastructure safe.

• Inter-operable  communication  systems  to  better  coordinate  with  the  Depart-
ment  of  Public  Safety,  local  police  and  the  fire  department  during  incidents
on State highways.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

124

• Evacuation  planning  to  ensure  that  in  the  event  of  a  disaster,  ADOT  can  fa-
cilitate a quick and effective way to move people away from the site.
• Cheaper alternative recyclable pavement, materials and equipment.
• Development of alternative fuel infrastructure for E–85 fuels.

Conclusion

Research  and  technology  play  an  enormous  role  in  the  transportation  industry.
These tools will be the most critical part of moving to a new tomorrow for transpor-
tation. For the next reauthorization increased funding for research and greater flexi-
bility for the development and use of innovative technologies and processes are vital
to meeting the Nation’s growing transportation needs.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

125

PRESIDENT, NATIONAL ASPHALT PAVEMENT ASSOCIATION (NAPA)

STATEMENT OF MIKE ACOTT

On  behalf  of  the  National  Asphalt  Pavement  Association’s  1,200  member  compa-
nies,  the  association  would  like  to  thank  Chairman  Wu  and  Ranking  Member
Gingrey  for  holding  this  hearing  to  examine  ways  to  reduce  energy  costs  and  envi-
ronmental  impacts  through  improved  pavement  technologies.  I  am  Mike  Acott,
President of NAPA.

NAPA  represents  asphalt  pavement  producers  and  related  industries  at  the  na-
tional  level.  Asphalt  pavement  material  is  composed  of  approximately  five  percent
asphalt  cement  and  95  percent  stone,  sand  or  gravel.  Of  the  2.6  million  miles  of
paved  roads  in  the  United  States,  over  94  percent  are  surfaced  with  asphalt.  Ap-
proximately  85  percent  of  the  Nation’s  airfield  pavements  and  85  percent  of  the
parking  lots  are  also  surfaced  with  asphalt  pavement.  There  are  approximately
4,000  asphalt  plants  located  in  the  United  States  producing  annually  500  million
tons of asphalt pavement material and employing directly or indirectly 300,000 U.S.
workers.

NAPA  has  a  long  history  in  developing  and  promoting  innovations  that  improve
sustainability,  energy  efficiency,  and  virtually  every  other  aspect  of  asphalt.  Today,
the  industry  produces  a  sustainable,  environmentally  friendly  material  that  is
adaptable to different climates, traffic loads, and end-use applications.

Moreover, asphalt pavement is America’s most recycled product. Each year, about
100  million  tons  are  reclaimed,  and  95  percent  of  that  total  is  reused  or  recycled.
NAPA  has  supported  an  active  research  program  designed  to  answer  questions
about  environmental  issues  and  to  improve  the  quality  of  asphalt  pavements  and
paving  techniques  used  in  the  construction  of  roads,  streets,  parking  lots,  airports,
and other facilities.

The  asphalt  industry  has  been  engaged  with  product  improvement  through  tech-
nological  innovation  for  many  years.  In  1986,  the  industry  founded  the  National
Center  for  Asphalt  Technology  (NCAT)  at  Auburn  University,  Alabama,  by  means
of  a  $10,000,000  endowment  from  companies  and  individuals  in  the  asphalt  indus-
try. Today NCAT is at the forefront of technological breakthroughs that are of ben-
efit  to  contractors,  agencies,  and  taxpayers.  Its  current  operating  budget  is  about
$5,000,000 annually, mostly through research funding.

The  NAPA  Committee  for  Asphalt  Research  and  Technology  (CART)  was  formed
in  1996  to  provide  a  forum  for  industry-identified  research  topics  to  be  discussed
and put forward for funding.

Recently,  CART  partnered  with  the  Federal  Highway  Administration  (FHWA)  to
produce  the  National  Asphalt  Roadmap  for  Research  and  Technology.1 The  asphalt
industry’s research agenda is embodied in this document. In addition to FHWA, the
partners in developing the document included the Asphalt Institute (AI), the Amer-
ican Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials (AASHTO), and the
National Stone, Sand & Gravel Association (NSSGA). This is considered to be a liv-
ing  document,  and  already  many  of  the  research  projects  identified  within  it  have
been  approved  for  funding  by  FHWA  and  the  National  Cooperative  Highway  Re-
search  Program.  The  asphalt  pavement  industry  would  like  to  see  continued  vig-
orous  federal  research  programs  to  address  the  issues  that  have  been  identified
within the National Asphalt Roadmap.

As  requested  by  the  Subcommittee,  NAPA’s  testimony  will  answer  the  following

questions:

1. How  can  paving  materials  contribute  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability

in the transportation sector?

2. What  are  the  technical  challenges  and  what  ongoing  or  future  research  and
development  projects  will  improve  the  sustainability  of  pavement  materials
and address these challenges?

3. What actions can the Federal, State, and local governments take to overcome
these  impediments?  What  is  the  role  for  industry  and  academia,  especially
in technology transfer?

1. How  can  paving  materials  contribute  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustain-

ability in the transportation sector?

1 National  Asphalt  Roadmap  for  Research  and  Technology,  National  Asphalt  Pavement  Asso-

ciation, Lanham, Maryland, 2007.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00129 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

126

2. What  are  the  technical  challenges  and  what  ongoing  or  future  research
and  development  projects  will  improve  the  sustainability  of  pavement
materials and address these challenges?
With  over  94  percent  of  paved  roads  in  the  United  States  surfaced  with  asphalt,
even  relatively  small  but  widely  applicable  advances  in  asphalt  pavement  tech-
nologies  could  contribute  greatly  to  energy  efficiency  and  sustainability.  Examples
of such advances include Superpave and stone-matrix asphalt.

As  mentioned  previously,  the  National  Asphalt  Roadmap  for  Research  and  Tech-
nology  was  published  in  2007.  The  Roadmap  is  the  result  of  a  public-private  part-
nership and encapsulates the shared vision to ‘‘Develop improved asphalt pavement
technologies  that  ensure  the  continued  delivery  of  safe  and  economical  pavements
to satisfy our nation’s needs.’’

Some of the intrinsic attributes of asphalt pavement make it a natural choice for
sustainability. The asphalt industry has also invested heavily in making this mate-
rial  more  environmentally  friendly.  The  committee  may  wish  to  consider  additional
factors in this regard.
Recycling. The asphalt industry is America’s number one recycler. Recycling saves
precious  natural  resources  and  reduces  the  carbon  footprint  of  pavement  construc-
tion. Of the 100 million tons of asphalt pavement reclaimed each year, about 75 mil-
lion  tons  is  mixed  with  virgin  materials  and  incorporated  into  new  asphalt  pave-
ment. This is called the highest and best use because the asphalt cement in the old
pavement is reactivated, becoming part of the binder for the new pavement and re-
placing some of the virgin binder that would otherwise be required. Another 20 mil-
lion tons of reclaimed asphalt pavement, or ‘‘RAP,’’ is reused in other ways in high-
way  building.  Aside  from  recycling  its  own  product,  the  asphalt  industry  incor-
porates materials from other industries, including used tires, waste roofing shingles,
glass,  and  many  others,  into  high-quality  pavements.  With  Portland  cement,  how-
ever, the binder cannot be rehydrated after its initial use. Therefore, once the steel
reinforcing material is extracted from reclaimed concrete, it is a low-value material
which can be used only as aggregate in limited applications.
Perpetual  Pavement.  Advancements  in  milling,  recycling,  and  asphalt  pavement
technology  over  the  last  few  decades  have  created  asphalt  pavements  that  perform
better,  longer,  and  at  lower  life  cycle  cost  than  was  previously  possible.  Today’s  as-
phalt  pavements  can  be  designed  literally  to  last  in  perpetuity.  Total  pavement  re-
construction  is  rendered  virtually  obsolete  with  a  perpetual  asphalt  pavement.  In-
stead, the asphalt pavement is engineered and built to last without requiring major
structural  rehabilitation  or  reconstruction,  and  needing  only  periodic  surface  re-
newal in response to distresses confined to the top of the pavement. Perpetual pave-
ment is environmentally friendly because it is extremely long-lasting. When the sur-
face is renewed, the material that is removed is recycled. Perpetual pavement is also
budget-friendly and has a lower life cycle cost than conventional asphalt or concrete
pavements.

Studies  from  Kansas,2 Oregon,3 Washington,3 Ohio,4 and  Minnesota5 all  show
that  asphalt  pavements  last  as  long  as  or  longer  than  concrete  pavements.  In  Or-
egon,  the  average  age  of  concrete  pavements  on  the  interstates  is  about  30  years,
the  oldest  being  about  50  years.  Asphalt  pavements  on  interstate  routes  in  Oregon
are,  on  average,  about  40  years  old,  with  the  oldest  pavements  being  between  50
and  60  years  old.  In  Washington,  the  asphalt  pavements  average  an  age  between
35 and 40 years, with the oldest being about 50 years, and concrete pavements’ av-
erage age is about 35 years with the oldest being about 50 years.

What  is  more,  the  studies  from  Kansas6 and  Ohio7 show  that  asphalt  pavements
have  a  lower  cost  over  their  lives  than  do  concrete  pavements.  Decades  ago,  using

2 Cross,  Steven  A.  and  Robert  L.  Parsons,  Evaluation  of  Expenditures  on  Rural  Interstate
Pavements  in  Kansas,  Kansas  University  Transportation  Center,  University  of  Kansas,  Law-
rence, Kansas, February, 2002.

3 Transportation  Research  Board,  Pavement  Lessons  Learned  from  the  AASHTO  Road  Test
and  Performance  of  the  Interstate  Highway  System,  Transportation  Research  Circular  E–C118,
Washington, DC, July 2007.

4 Gibboney, Willis B., Flexible and Rigid Pavement Costs on the Ohio Interstate Highway Sys-

tem, Westerville, Ohio, 1995.

5 Lukanen, E., Performance History of HMA Pavements with Aggregate Base and Portland Ce-
ment  Concrete  Pavements,  Minnesota  Asphalt  Pavement  Association,  New  Brighton,  MN,  2002.
6 Cross,  Steven  A.  and  Robert  L.  Parsons,  Evaluation  of  Expenditures  on  Rural  Interstate
Pavements  in  Kansas,  Kansas  University  Transportation  Center,  University  of  Kansas,  Law-
rence, Kansas, February, 2002.

7 Gibboney, Willis B., Flexible and Rigid Pavement Costs on the Ohio Interstate Highway Sys-

tem, Westerville, Ohio, 1995.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00130 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

127

technology  available  at  the  time,  an  asphalt  pavement  would  generally  last  12  to
18  years  before  the  first  overlay  was  needed.  Recent  improvements  brought  about
by  better  technology  have  been  credited  with  extending  the  time  to  the  first  resur-
facing  of  an  asphalt  pavement  to  over  20  years.  And,  unlike  with  concrete,  resur-
facing an asphalt pavement can be done when traffic levels are at their lowest and
the road can be turned back to traffic during rush hours. This enhances safety and
convenience to the traveling public by minimizing delays for motorists.

In  addition,  many  asphalt  pavements  built  decades  ago  are  functioning  as  per-
petual  pavements.  As  mentioned  above,  perpetual  pavements  are  designed  so  that
the  pavement  structure  will  last  in  perpetuity.  Total  pavement  reconstruction  is
rendered virtually obsolete. Instead, the asphalt pavement is engineered so that dis-
tresses  are  confined  to  the  top  layer  of  the  pavement.  At  infrequent  intervals,  the
surface is removed for recycling, and replaced with a smooth, safe new surface. The
Asphalt  Pavement  Alliance  has  awarded  its  Perpetual  Pavement  Award  to  over  27
agencies since 2001. In order to qualify for this award, the agency must submit doc-
umentation  showing  that  the  pavement  has  lasted  more  than  35  years  with  no
structural  failure.  These  sustainable  pavements  use  fewer  resources  and  have  a
lower lifetime cost than conventional pavements.
Asphalt’s  Low  Energy  Footprint.  A  meaningful  study  of  the  energy  footprint  of
any product must consider all phases in that product’s life cycle. The gold standard
for  such  analyses  is  the  environmental  performance  tool  provided  by  the  National
Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST).8

The NIST tool is based on an extensive analysis of total life cycle energy require-
ments  and  CO2 emissions  associated  with  different  pavement  types  and  designs.
This analysis has been vetted at the highest public levels and EPA supports its use
through  the  Environmentally  Preferable  Purchasing  (EPP)  Program,  which  is
charged  with  carrying  out  Executive  Order  13423,  Strengthening  Federal  Environ-
mental, Energy, and Transportation Management.

Using  the  NIST  software  to  compare  different  pavement  types,  there  is  little
doubt  about  the  environmentally  superior  life  cycle  performance  of  asphalt  pave-
ments as compared to concrete.

Very  little  energy  is  required  to  produce  asphalt,  as  a  refinery  typically  expends
energy to obtain products like gasoline, fuels, and lubricants; in some refineries, as-
phalt  is  the  product  remaining  after  all  others  have  been  extracted.  However,  the
Department  of  Energy’s  Energy  Information  Administration  (EIA)  assigns  energy
consumption values to the production of asphalt, and these are very low. According
to  the  EIA,  all  carbon  in  asphalt  is  considered  ‘‘sequestered.’’ 9 In  fact,  due  to  the
perpetual  ability  to  reclaim  and  reuse  asphalt  pavement,  the  carbon  (and  energy)
embodied in asphalt will likely remain sequestered indefinitely.

Asphalt  pavements  contribute  to  an  energy-conscious  environment  in  many  other
ways  as  well.  Because  asphalt  pavements  are  faster  to  construct  and  rehabilitate,
construction  work  can  be  accomplished  during  off-peak  hours,  reducing  traffic  con-
struction  congestion  and  commensurately  reducing  use  of  fuel  and  production  of
emissions.  Because  a  new  or  newly  rehabilitated  asphalt  pavement  can  be  opened
to traffic as soon as it has been compacted and cooled, there is no question of wait-
ing  for  days  or  weeks,  with  traffic  being  detoured  or  squeezed  into  fewer  lanes,  for
the  material  to  cure.  Technologies  such  as  rubblization  of  concrete  pavement  with
an  asphalt  overlay  save  energy  because  the  rubblized  pavement  does  not  need  to
be  hauled  away,  new  base  material  does  not  need  to  be  trucked  in,  and  landfill
space  is  saved.  In  addition,  the  need  for  mining  and  processing  of  virgin  materials
is reduced.

In a side-by-side life cycle analysis, using the environmental performance software
from the National Institute for Standards and Technology, the amount of CO2 emis-
sions associated with constructing and maintaining a 50-year life cycle of an asphalt
pavement  is  only  about  30  percent  of  that  associated  with  a  concrete  pavement.10
Smooth  Roads  Save  Fuel.  We  know  that  smooth  roads  conserve  energy  and  ex-
tend the life of pavements. Studies at a pavement test track in Nevada have shown
that driving on smoother surfaces can reduce fuel consumption in the neighborhood
of  4.5  to  five  percent  compared  to  fuel  consumption  on  a  rough  pavement.  A  five

8 Building  for  Environmental  and  Economic  Sustainability;  National  Institute  of  Standards
(http://www.bfrl.nist.gov/oae/software/bees/please/bees¥please.html.

Technology; 

and 
Downloaded July 2, 2008.)

9 The  Department  of  Energy’s  Energy 

www.eia.doe.gov/oiaf/1605/archive/87-92rpt/chap2.html

Information  Administration 

(EIA)  http://

10 Prowell,  Brian,  Greening  the  Blacktop,  Using  Asphalt’s  Environmental  Qualities  to  Com-

pete, HMAT Magazine, May/June, 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00131 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

128

percent  fuel  saving  is  the  equivalent  of  a  $0.20  per  gallon  reduction  in  fuel  costs,
assuming that fuel costs $4.00 per gallon.11 Experts also estimate that a 25 percent
increase in smoothness can result in a 10 percent increase in the life of pavements.
In other words, smooth roads conserve fuel, save money, and last longer.

Many studies have shown that, more than any other factor, pavement smoothness
can help reduce fuel consumption. It is sometimes said, however, that concrete pave-
ments  provide  better  fuel  efficiency  for  larger  trucks.  The  study  most  often  cited  in
support  of  this  assertion,  which  was  conducted  in  Canada,  has  several  flaws  which
are noted in the body of the report. For instance, the researchers noted that the var-
iability  of  the  data  was  too  great  to  show  conclusive  differences.  Also,  the  asphalt
pavement studied was considerably rougher than the concrete pavements.

In  the  end,  the  Canadian  study  proved  what  had  already  been  shown  in  studies
such as the one conducted in Nevada, that pavement roughness, not pavement type,
is  responsible  for  differences  in  fuel  mileage.  The  Nevada  study11  concluded  that
trucks  running  on  a  smooth  pavement  could  save  4.5  percent  on  fuel  consumption.
Smoother pavements also result in longer pavement life by as much as 10 to 25 per-
cent,  resulting  in  lower  maintenance  costs.  As  a  rule,  asphalt  pavements  are
smoother  than  concrete  pavements.  Smoothness  measurements  on  interstate  high-
ways in Oregon and Washington showed that asphalt pavements are on average 33
percent smoother in Oregon, and over 50 percent smoother in Washington.3

Smoothness also means that truck tires don’t bounce on the pavement and deliver
the  kind  of  impact  loading  they  would  on  a  rougher  pavement.  Some  experts  esti-
mate  that  increasing  pavement  smoothness  by  25  percent  results  in  a  nine  percent
to  10  percent  increase  in  the  life  of  pavements.  Long  life  contributes  to  asphalt’s
sustainability.
Urban Heat Island Effect. Urban heat island mitigation is not a black and white
issue. According to the United States Environmental Protection Agency, ‘‘there is no
official  standard  or  labeling  program  to  designate  cool  paving  materials,  and  re-
search in this area is in an early stage. While studies show that pavements can af-
fect the urban heat island and resulting air quality, results are complicated by sev-
eral  factors.  These  include  the  impact  of  shadows  from  nearby  structures;  changes
in pavement characteristics over time; and the absorption by buildings of solar radi-
ation reflected from the pavement surface.’’ 12

Density,  heat  capacity,  thickness,  porosity,  and  a  myriad  of  other  factors  affect
pavement  surface  temperature  as  well.  In  2005,  the  co-directors  of  the  National
Center of Excellence: SMART Innovations for Urban Climate and Energy, published
an article in Public Works magazine emphasizing that factors other than pavement
color  play  a  large  role  in  urban  heat  island  mitigation.13 EPA  sponsors  and  looks
to  the  National  Center  as  leaders  in  this  area.  Not  specifically  mentioned  in  the
Public Works article, but clearly identified in a satellite image illustrating the arti-
cle, the hottest surface temperature signature in Phoenix is the airport with its 23-
inch-thick  concrete  runways.  In  the  same  article,  the  authors  point  out  that  open-
graded asphalt pavement surfaces placed on top of concrete freeways are highly suc-
cessful  in  reducing  pavement  surface  temperature.  EPA  also  recognizes  that
‘‘[p]orous, or permeable, pavements benefit from the cooling effect of evaporation.’’ 12
In addition, open-graded pavement systems have been shown to reduce the amount
of pollutant loads.14

Role  of  State  Departments  of  Transportation  in  Pavement  Type  Selection.
NAPA’s view is that State DOTs do an outstanding job of providing the best pos-
sible  infrastructure  for  local  conditions,  and  the  asphalt  industry  whole-heartedly
supports  them.  It  is  our  strong  opinion  that  a  federal  pavement  selection  policy  is
not  a  prudent  way  to  approach  sustainability.  The  challenges  faced  by  agencies
throughout  the  U.S.  demands  that  those  administrators  have  the  autonomy  to
choose the paving material that best suits their needs.

Legislating  one  standard  for  dissimilar  environments  removes  the  flexibility  nec-
essary to build the most environmentally and economically sustainable, highest-per-

11 Sime,  M.,  et  al.,  WesTrack  Track  Roughness,  Fuel  Consumption,  and  Maintenance  Costs.

Tech Brief published by Federal Highway Administration, Washington, DC. January 2000.

12 USEPA Heat Island web site, Cool Pavements: (http://www.epa.gov/heatisland/strategies/

coolpavement.html Downloaded July 2, 2008)

13 Golden,  Jay  S.,  and  Kamil  E.  Kaloush,  A  Hot  Night  in  the  Big  City,  How  to  Mitigate  the
Urban Heat Island, Public Works Magazine, December 1, 2005. (http://www.pwmag.com/indus-
try-news.asp?sectionID=760&articleID=268116&artnum=1 Downloaded July 2, 2008.)

14 Barrett,  Michael,  et  al.,  Pollutant  Removal  on  Vegetated  Highway  Shoulders  Center  for
Transportation  Research,  The  University  of  Texas  at  Austin,  October  2005,  Rev.  January  2006
(http://www.utexas.edu/research/ctr/pdf¥reports/0¥4605¥1.pdf, Downloaded July 2, 2008.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00132 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

129

forming,  safest  roads.  It  is  our  opinion  that  Congress  and  the  Federal  Government
should not dictate pavement selection.

The  DOTs  are  highly  professional  organizations  which  are  assembling  factual  in-
formation  so  that  they  can  perform  life  cycle  cost  analysis.  NAPA  supports  the  use
of life cycle cost analysis based on factual information.

NAPA’s position is that local conditions require the existing oversight of the State
and  local  governments  to  remain  in  place.  The  asphalt  pavement  industry  is  proud
to be a partner of the State DOTs, the American Association of State Highway and
Transportation  Officials  (AASHTO),  and  the  Federal  Highway  Administration
(FHWA)  in  these  agencies’  quest  for  continuing  improvement  in  providing  pave-
ments that meet the Nation’s needs.
In addition, consider the following:

Reducing Congestion. Highway work zones reduce the capacity of a road to han-
dle traffic, especially during rush hours. Asphalt pavements can be designed so that
they  only  need  periodic  resurfacing,  and  the  work  to  accomplish  this  can  be  sched-
uled during non-rush hours, facilitating the movement of vehicles through the work
zone, reducing fuel consumption, and improving safety. Since asphalt does not need
to  cure  in  order  to  have  the  strength  to  support  traffic,  new  or  newly  rehabilitated
pavements can be opened to traffic as soon as they have been compacted and cooled.
Safety.  Open-graded  asphalt  surfacings  are  widely  used  on  highways  to  enhance
safety.  Ensuring  the  safety  of  our  highways  is  always  a  top  priority  with  agencies
and  contractors  alike.  Using  porous  friction  courses  on  pavement  surfaces  helps  to
eliminate  tire  splash  and  spray  in  rainstorms.  Not  only  does  this  enhance  tire-to-
pavement contact, and therefore safety, it also improves drivers’ visibility. In a high-
accident area in Texas, replacement of a typical non-porous surface with porous fric-
tion  course  reduced  wet  weather  accidents  by  93  percent  and  reduced  fatalities  by
86 percent.
Porous Asphalt Pavement. The same open-graded pavement type that is used to
surface  highways  can  also  be  used  in  porous  asphalt  pavement  systems  for
stormwater  management.  Placing  a  porous  asphalt  pavement  on  top  of  a  recharge
bed allows stormwater to percolate through the pavement surface into the recharge
bed, where it is stored until it can infiltrate into the soil. Porous asphalt pavements
decrease runoff and increase filtration, improving water quality. A porous pavement
parking  system  tested  at  the  University  of  New  Hampshire  Stormwater  Center  ex-
ceeded 95 percent removal efficiency for total suspended solids. In addition, a recent
study  by  the  Texas  Department  of  Transportation  found  a  90  percent  reduction  in
total  suspended  solids  by  using  a  porous  asphalt  surface  on  a  highway  pavement.
Open-graded and porous pavements hold great promise for water quality improve-
ment.  To  date,  a  successful  concrete  open-graded  surfacing  material  for  high-speed
pavements  has  not  been  developed  because  concrete’s  brittleness  causes  it  to  crack
and  ravel  under  traffic.  Porous  asphalt  pavements  of  both  types—open-graded  sur-
faces  for  highways,  and  porous  pavement  systems  for  stormwater  management—
have  been  used  widely  for  over  20  years  with  an  excellent  record  of  success.  We
need  research  to  better  quantify  the  benefits  of  porous  asphalt  pavements  and  to
better design these environmentally friendly pavements.
Quiet  Pavements.  As  developable  real  estate  becomes  increasingly  scarce  in  the
urban  and  suburban  landscape,  more  residents  find  themselves  in  closer  proximity
to  high-speed  highways  and  their  noise.  A  major  component  of  that  noise  is  gen-
erated  at  the  tire-pavement  interface.  Many  times,  very  expensive  noise  walls  are
constructed between the development and the highway. Often times these walls cost
as  much  as  $50,000  per  affected  household.  However,  such  noise  walls  have  very
limited effectiveness in reducing noise from the roadway, especially for residents liv-
ing  farther  away.  Using  a  low-noise  asphalt  surface  means  that  the  volume  can  be
turned down at the source, and that noise walls can be reduced in height. For every
one  decibel  reduction,  the  noise  wall  can  be  reduced  by  three  feet.  If  one  considers
all  the  miles  of  urban  roadways  in  the  U.S.,  the  savings  could  be  in  the  hundreds
of  millions  dollars  or  more.  It  has  been  shown  that  asphalt  pavements  in  the  U.S.
are  quieter  than  concrete,  anywhere  from  one  to  10  decibels.15,16,17 This  reduction
in  noise  is  of  great  importance  to  those  residents’  quality  of  life.  It  is  an  important

15 Hansen, D.I., R.S. James, and B. Waller, Tire/Pavement Noise Study for Arkansas APA, As-

phalt Pavement Alliance, Lanham, MD, January 2005.

16 Hansen,  D.I.,  R.S.  James,  and  B.  Waller,  Oklahoma  Tire/Pavement  Noise  Study,  Asphalt

Pavement Alliance, Lanham, MD, January 2005.

17 Hansen, D.I., R.S. James, and B. Waller, Kansas Tire/Pavement Noise Study, Asphalt Pave-

ment Alliance, Lanham, MD, June 2005.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00133 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

130

societal  and  budgetary  issue  that  researchers  continue  to  find  ways  to  mitigate
roadway noise through better surfacing materials.
Rubblization.  When  confronted  with  reconstruction  or  major  rehabilitation  of  a
concrete  pavement,  rubblization  in  place  of  the  concrete  with  an  asphalt  overlay  is
the  easiest,  lowest  cost,  and  most  effective  way  to  rehabilitate  the  pavement  in  the
shortest amount of time. The State of Arkansas estimated that it saved $1.3 million
per  mile  on  rubblization  projects  totaling  over  318  miles  as  compared  to  removing
and  replacing  the  existing  concrete  pavement.  However,  rubblization’s  benefits  go
beyond  just  the  considerable  money  saved  in  construction;  it  also  saves  time  and
money  for  road  users  because  they  spend  less  time  in  traffic  during  the  rehabilita-
tion  of  the  road.  Spending  less  time  in  traffic  means  that  vehicles  produce  a  lower
level  of  excess  emissions.  In  addition,  rubblization  conserves  stone  by  reusing  the
old concrete roadbed as the new road’s base. Because the old roadbed does not have
to  be  hauled  away,  and  new  material  trucked  in,  further  fuel  savings  and  emission
reductions are realized.
Warm-mix  Asphalt  Technologies.  The  asphalt  industry  is  keenly  interested  in
processes that improve its energy efficiency and environmental friendliness. In addi-
tion to recycling, the industry is working on a new set of technologies to reduce the
production  temperature  of  its  material.  Known  as  warm-mix  asphalt,  these  tech-
nologies reduce emissions and lower energy consumption. They also offer the poten-
tial for better performance and an extended paving season. Continued research and
demonstration projects will be required to assist in the full implementation of warm-
mix asphalt.
Automation  of  Construction  Practices.  Another  facet  of  research  needed  is  in
the automation of construction practices. Such improvements may improve not only
efficiency,  but  also  worker  safety  at  plants  and  in  the  roadway  work  zones.  Gains
in  efficiency  would  translate  into  less  fuel  consumption  and  lower  production  of
greenhouse  gas  emissions.  NAPA  is  very  supportive  of  national  efforts  such  as  the
development  of  intelligent  compaction,  automated  sampling  and  testing,  and  other
tools to enhance worker safety.
3. What actions can the Federal, State, and local governments take to over-
come these impediments? What is the role for industry and academia, es-
pecially in technology transfer?
The planning, design, construction, and operation of highways have changed dra-
matically  and  will  continue  to  evolve.  Historically,  State  departments  of  transpor-
tation, in cooperation with the Federal Highway Administration, have been the pub-
lic-sector  leaders  in  defining  contracting  procedures,  material  specifications,  and
construction  specifications.  The  procedures  of  State  Departments  of  Transportation
(DOTs)  are  often  adopted  by  county  and  local  governments  and  in  many  cases  are
also used in private construction activities.

Many changes have occurred in the technology associated with asphalt pavements
over  the  last  50  years.  These  changes  have  led  to  the  continuous  improvement  of
asphalt  pavements  through  new  products,  analytical  tools,  and  testing  procedures.
As  many  of  our  nation’s  highways  and  bridges  exceed  their  design  life,  they  will
require  significant  improvements.  An  ongoing  research  and  technology  program
aimed at continuous improvement in the performance of asphalt pavements is vital
to the national interests.
Federal  Research  Program.  Significant  progress  in  asphalt  pavements  can  only
be achieved through a federally led, nationally coordinated research and implemen-
tation  effort.  In  addition,  an  inclusive,  well-coordinated  national  effort  is  necessary
to  foster  a  strong  legacy  of  technological  advancement  in  asphalt  pavement  knowl-
edge.  A  focused  program  for  asphalt  research  should  be  based  on  broad  intellectual
competition,  should  be  of  substantial  breadth  and  depth,  and  should  be  directed  by
a consensus of stakeholders.

As  Members  of  this  subcommittee  know,  research  also  leads  to  a  better  educated
workforce.  There  is  an  ongoing  need  for  hiring  and  retaining  engineers  and  techni-
cians  to  design  and  analyze  asphalt  pavements.  The  training  of  professors,  engi-
neers, and technicians is facilitated by research.

Within the next 30 years, improved asphalt pavement technologies must be devel-
oped to ensure the continued delivery of safe, environmentally sustainable, economi-
cal pavements that satisfy our nation’s needs.

As  previously  stated,  with  over  94  percent  of  the  roads  and  highways  in  the
United States surfaced with asphalt, even relatively small but widely applicable ad-
vances  in  asphalt  technologies  through  a  robust  research  and  technology  program
could  save  many  more  millions  of  dollars,  enhance  sustainability,  and  result  in  a

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00134 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

131

pavement  infrastructure  system  that  serves  the  Nation’s  economy  and  citizens  in
the years ahead.

NAPA respectfully urges the Committee on Science and Technology to reauthorize
the existing asphalt research program under the Federal-aid Highway Program and
increase the funding to achieve the vision as outlined in the National Asphalt Road-
map  for  Research  and  Technology.  A  strong  federal  partner  with  adequate  funding
will foster asphalt pavement research and implementation as outlined in the Road-
map, resulting in a more sustainable, environmentally friendly pavement.

Thank you for your time and attention. NAPA appreciates the opportunity to sub-
mit this testimony on these important issues and is available to discuss these issues
further with the Subcommittee at your convenience.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 16:59 Sep 11, 2008 Jkt 042962 PO 00000 Frm 00135 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\T&I08\062408\42962 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

